ATLANTA — The number of guns confiscated at airports across the United States is on the rise, the Transportation Security Administration says.A record-setting 1,500 firearms were detected by security screeners in 2012, according to the agency. That number is up from about 1,300 in 2011. And nearly 85 percent of the weapons were loaded."It does concern us that this number is rising," said Lisa Farbstein, an agency spokeswoman. "But we will not speculate on the causes."The agency allows passengers with proper permits to fly with guns that are unloaded and stored in hard-sided checked baggage. The police are called when weapons are found in carry-on luggage or on a passenger.The world's busiest airport, Hartsfield-Jackson Atlanta International Airport here, topped the list, with more than 100 guns confiscated in 2012, followed by 75 guns at Dallas/Fort Worth International Airport and 50 guns at Phoenix.In the New York area, where firearm laws are stricter, the number of detected guns declined this year. Three guns were confiscated at La Guardia Airport, two at Newark Liberty International, and none at Kennedy International.The most common type of confiscated gun was a .380 semiautomatic pistol. Airport officials also detected stun guns, grenades and rocket launchers.From Dec. 14 to 21, the week after a school massacre in Newtown, Conn., there was a slight increase in weapons. Screeners caught 11 passengers with stun guns, 3 with grenades and 34 with guns.
DENVER — Nearly six months after a mass shooting in a Colorado movie theater stirred cries for action on gun violence and mental illness, and with last month's killings at Connecticut's Sandy Hook Elementary School still fresh in people's minds, Gov. John W. Hickenlooper of Colorado called Thursday for universal background checks on all gun sales in the state."We can learn from tragedy and make changes," Mr. Hickenlooper, a Democrat, said in his annual State of the State address at the gold-domed Capitol here.After the massacre at Columbine High School in a Denver suburb in 1999, Colorado voters passed regulations requiring background checks at gun shows, which were already required for sales at retail gun stores. But background checks are still not required for individual, private sales of firearms — estimated by some lawmakers to make up 40 percent of gun sales in the state.Democrats, who now control both houses of Colorado's Legislature, rose to their feet and applauded the governor's proposal while Republicans sat silently — an illustration of the divisions in a state that tipped to Democrats in the last two presidential elections, but that still values hunting, sport-shooting and the frontier values wrapped up in gun ownership."It is an  infringement on our Second Amendment rights," said Scott Renfroe, a Republican state senator from Greeley, in northern Colorado. "You can't make enough laws to stop the criminals. Criminals never obey the law. All you're doing is making it harder for citizens to enjoy the rights they have in this country."Mr. Hickenlooper, a former mayor of Denver, geologist and brewpub owner, also reiterated calls for the Legislature to pass civil union legislation for same-sex couples — a near certainty given the new Democratic majorities in both houses. Last May, Republicans, who then controlled the State House of Representatives, defeated a civil unions bill.He said that Colorado's economy was back from the depths of the recession, though the state unemployment rate is still 7.7 percent, on par with the national level, according to the most recent data from the Bureau of Labor Statistics. He also said that regulators were working to determine the legal and policy effects of a voter-approved measure that legalized small amounts of marijuana and called for new laws to guard against people who drive while impaired.In large part, the governor's speech was shaped by a year tainted by tragedy.He led a moment of silence for the 12 people killed and scores wounded in the Aurora theater shooting in July. He discussed a drought that destroyed fields and crops, and summertime wildfires that charred hundreds of homes and forced thousands of people to flee.Over the last several months, Mr. Hickenlooper has slowly waded into the emotionally charged debate over gun control.Immediately after the July 20 shootings, he said the time was not right to talk about passing new gun restrictions, saying in an appearance on "Meet the Press" that tougher laws would not have prevented the gunman from carrying out his rampage.In recent weeks, the governor has proposed significant changes to the state's mental health system, including new mental health centers, a new statewide crisis line and a plan to make mental health records easily available for background checks of potential gun owners. He has also implored lawmakers to begin tackling the debate over gun control.The governor's call for universal background checks reflects similar ideas put forth by Gov. Andrew M. Cuomo of New York and Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. after the Connecticut shootings. Mr. Hickenlooper, however, stopped short of proposing a ban on assault weapons or outlawing high-capacity ammunition magazines, which are being pursued in New York.
WASHINGTON — While President Obama pledged to crack down on access to what he called "weapons of war" in the aftermath of last month's schoolhouse massacre, the White House has calculated that a ban on military-style assault weapons will be exceedingly difficult to pass through Congress and is focusing on other measures it deems more politically achievable.As a task force led by Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. readies recommendations on reducing gun violence for delivery to the president next week, White House officials say a new ban will be an element of whatever final package is proposed. But given the entrenched opposition from gun rights groups and their advocates on Capitol Hill, the White House is trying to avoid making its passage the sole definition of success and is emphasizing other new gun rules that could conceivably win bipartisan support and reduce gun deaths.During a day of White House meetings on the issue on Thursday, including one with the National Rifle Association, Mr. Biden focused publicly on universal background checks for gun purchases and the need for more federal research on gun violence. In 15 minutes of public remarks, Mr. Biden made no mention of curbing the production and sale of assault weapons, even though he was a prime author of such a law that passed in 1994 and expired 10 years later. Both he and the president say they strongly support an assault weapons ban.But Mr. Biden noted that his former colleagues in the Senate have long been "pretty universally opposed to any restrictions on gun ownership or what type of weapons can be purchased." He said they now seem more open to limits on the purchase of high-capacity magazines.A spokesman for Mr. Obama said later in the afternoon that the vice president's remarks merely reflect a desire for a broad approach to gun violence."President Obama has been clear that Congress should reinstate the assault weapons ban and that avoiding this issue just because it's been politically difficult in the past is not an option," said Matt Lehrich, the spokesman. "He's also stressed that no single piece of legislation alone can solve this problem, which is why he has asked Vice President Biden to explore a wide array of proposals on topics ranging from gun laws to mental health to school safety."The calculation on the assault weapons ban underscores the complicated politics of guns on Capitol Hill despite public outrage after a gunman killed 26 people, including 20 children, at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, Conn., in December. While the shootings prompted some pro-gun lawmakers to endorse limits on assault weapons, Republicans who control the House Judiciary Committee still oppose such limits.A statement by the N.R.A. after Thursday's meeting underscored the political challenges. The group accused the White House of having an "agenda to attack the Second Amendment," and said it would go to the halls of Congress in its efforts to stop gun restrictions."We will now take our commitment and meaningful contributions to members of Congress of both parties who are interested in having an honest conversation about what works — and what does not," the statement said.The calibrated public focus by Mr. Biden also reflects a tension within the administration and Democratic circles, with some gun control advocates pressing for a robust effort on the assault weapon ban and others leery of being caught in a losing cause at the expense of other measures with more chances of success. While Mr. Biden has included Attorney General Eric H. Holder Jr., Janet Napolitano, the Homeland Security secretary, and other cabinet officials in his working group, officials said the process is being driven by the White House.In addition to limits on high-capacity magazines and expanded background checks, Mr. Biden's group is looking at ways of keeping guns out of the hands of the mentally ill and cracking down on sales that are already illegal. One possibility is tougher laws against straw purchasing with longer prison terms for those who buy guns for others. Some officials would like to expand mandatory minimum sentences for gun law violations, but the White House in general does not like such sentences. Mr. Biden's group is also considering seeking additional money to enforce existing laws.
As Washington focuses on what Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. will propose next week to curb gun violence, gun and ammunition sales are spiking in the rest of the country as people rush to expand their arsenals in advance of any restrictions that might be imposed.People were crowded five deep at the tiny counter of a gun shop near Atlanta, where a pastor from Knoxville, Tenn., was among the customers who showed up in person after the store's Web site halted sales because of low inventory. Emptying gun cases and bare shelves gave a picked-over feel to gun stores in many states. High-capacity magazines, which some state and federal officials want to ban or restrict, were selling briskly across the country: one Iowa dealer said that 30-round magazines were fetching five times what they sold for just weeks ago.Gun dealers and buyers alike said that the rapid growth in gun sales — which began climbing significantly after President Obama's re-election and soared after the Dec. 14 shooting at a school in Newtown, Conn., prompted him to call for new gun laws — shows little sign of abating.December set a record for the criminal background checks performed before many gun purchases, a strong indication of a big increase in sales, according to an analysis of federal data by the National Shooting Sports Foundation, a gun industry trade group. Adjusting the federal data to try to weed out background checks that were unrelated to firearms sales, the group reported that 2.2 million background checks were performed last month, an increase of 58.6 percent over the same period in 2011. Some gun dealers said in interviews that they had never seen such demand."If I had 1,000 AR-15s I could sell them in a week," said Jack Smith, an independent gun dealer in Des Moines, referring to the popular style of semiautomatic rifle that drew national attention after Adam Lanza used one to kill 20 children and 6 adults at a Newtown school. "When I close, they beat on the glass to be let in," Mr. Smith said of his customers. "They'll wave money at me."Mr. Smith said many people were stocking up on high-capacity magazines in anticipation that they might be banned. Two weeks ago, he said, a 30-round rifle magazine was $12, but it now fetches $60. Popular online retailers were out of many 20- and 30-round rifle magazines.In Washington, Mr. Biden said the task force he leads is "shooting for Tuesday" to make its recommendations to President Obama about preventing gun violence. The Brady Campaign to Prevent Gun Violence, one of the nation's leading gun control groups, said its top priority was to close the loopholes that currently allow 40 percent of gun sales to be made without background checks.Some groups that support gun control urged the White House not to focus too much energy on an assault weapons ban, which they said could be hard to persuade Congress to pass. Officials at Third Way, a left-leaning research group in Washington, urged the president to save his political capital for higher-priority goals like universal background checks and cracking down on gun trafficking.Outside Greta's Guns, a gun store in Simi Valley, Calif., about an hour northwest of downtown Los Angeles, several customers said that they opposed any assault weapons ban, but would support more thorough background checks.George Gray, 60, who said that he already owned "more arms than arms to bear them," said that he was in favor of more background checks. "If you own a weapon, you should be stable," said Mr. Gray, who said he had come from Los Angeles to buy a gun for his daughter. "You should be accountable for your actions. I don't mind stricter background checks. What we've done with the mental health in this country — these people used to get care and were in facilities. And in most of these instances, it's been people with mental problems."
SANTA ROSA, Calif. — A California congressman leading a House Democratic task force on gun violence wrapped up a series of heated and packed town hall meetings on gun control here Thursday night, providing a glimpse into how the debate is resonating beyond Washington after last month's massacre at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, Conn.Representative Mike Thompson, the congressman, who was recently appointed by Nancy Pelosi, the House minority leader, to seek new curbs on guns, said he would use information gleaned from three meetings this week in his district north of San Francisco to issue a set of recommendations early next month. His efforts join those by the White House and by politicians in states from New York to California to draft a legislative response to the mass killing even as the National Rifle Association and other gun rights supporters gather their forces.More than 200 people jammed into an auditorium at a government building here, spilling into the hallways and speaking for three hours. Just a few hours earlier, in Taft, a central California town, a 16-year-old high school student was arrested after entering a classroom armed with a shotgun and shooting another student, though not fatally.At the meetings, which were held in a heavily Democratic part of California, the state with the nation's strictest gun regulations, advocates of gun rights clearly outnumbered supporters of stricter regulations. Many had responded to calls by the N.R.A. to attend the meetings and hewed to the organization's talking points, trying to steer the debate to what they say is the real source of violence in America: mental health problems, a lack of personal responsibility, and violent video games and the news media.This week's meetings ran smoothly and were generally free of the shouting and chaos that marked the town hall meetings surrounding the nation's last polarizing debate, over health care in 2009.Still, gun rights supporters sometimes drowned out advocates of stricter regulations. Several warned of a coming civil war and said they were "willing to fight." There were a few tense moments that Mr. Thompson — a Purple Heart recipient in the Vietnam War, a gun owner and hunter — defused."Look, I have 30 seconds. I'll do what I want, O.K.? You work for me; I pay your salary," said one gun rights supporter to cries of "yeah!" from the audience as he stood before the congressman."I'll give you a buck and a half and pay you back right now," the congressman told the man.Mr. Thompson, a Democrat and a member of the centrist Blue Dog Coalition, supports banning the kind of assault weapons used in the Connecticut shootings. But he cautioned that there is "no one bill that could be passed, no magic wand." While he described Sandy Hook as "the worst gun tragedy" in his lifetime, he added that hundreds of Americans "have been killed with firearms" in the four weeks since the massacre.On Thursday, gun rights advocates here rejected any attempts to restrict access to high-powered guns. Echoing statements by the N.R.A., they stressed that the roots of the violence lay elsewhere, particularly in the lack of mental health care.A man from Santa Rosa strongly endorsed the N.R.A.'s call to arm school guards. "The only thing that can stop a bad guy with a gun is a good guy with a gun," he said to both applause and boos from the audience.Like the N.R.A., other speakers blamed violent video games and the news media. "Every time you get somebody killing 10 people, somebody wants to kill 20 people," one man said. "Get the media to quit naming the names."Still, other self-identified gun owners expressed an openness to restrictions on assault weapons."I know from personal experience that the N.R.A. does not speak for all gun owners," one woman said. "The N.R.A. is mostly a lobbying organization and represents gun manufacturers, and is mostly motivated by profit. The time is now."A man who described himself as a hunter and a former member of the N.R.A. said: "If you need more than three rounds when you're hunting, you need to spend some time at the range before going out."Several speakers accused "a tyrannical government" of trying to take away their guns, each time to loud applause. "It's like you're being controlled by a foreign operation or something, you're voting for somebody other than the American people here," one man told the congressman."Don't give that man a gun," said a man in the audience.Another responded immediately, "He can have mine!"Supporters of greater gun control sometimes had a hard time making their points."There is not a tyrannical government trying to take away your guns," one man said. "Everybody needs to be respectful here and give everybody a chance to speak."One woman, voicing support for a ban on assault weapons, said that gun rights supporters were trying to shift the debate away from guns. "I hear a lot about personal responsibility," she said. "But what's really being said is: 'Trust no one but ourselves and our assault weapons. Every man for himself.' That's not a community. That can't raise our children to be healthy. That's an insane asylum."
WASHINGTON — Nearly 80,000 Americans were denied guns in 2010, according to Justice Department data, because they lied or provided inaccurate information about their criminal histories on background-check forms. Yet only 44 of those people were charged with a crime.The staggeringly low number of prosecutions for people who "lie and try," as it is called by law enforcement officials, is being studied by the Obama administration as it considers measures to curb gun violence after the Connecticut elementary school shootings in December.A task force headed by Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. is expected to offer proposals to President Obama as early as Tuesday. It is looking at a wide range of issues linked to gun crimes, including violence in video games and movies, and gaps in mental health treatment and background checks.The most contentious initiatives, like reviving a ban on assault weapons, would require Congressional approval and have drawn fierce opposition from gun rights groups and Republican lawmakers, making passage a long shot."I would say that the likelihood is that they are not going to be able to get an assault weapons ban through this Congress," David Keene, the president of the National Rifle Association, said Sunday on the CNN program "State of the Union."In the face of those difficulties, the White House has said it is looking for actions it can take without Congressional approval. Increasing the number of prosecutions for lying on background-check forms is an effort that the administration can undertake largely on its own, in part by pressing federal prosecutors to pursue such cases. It is also one measure that both sides of the gun-control debate have agreed upon.It is a felony to deliberately provide false information in an effort to buy a gun, and studies financed by the Justice Department show that people who do so are more likely than the average person to commit violent crimes after they are denied a firearm purchase.At a meeting Mr. Biden held with gun control advocates on Wednesday, the group Mayors Against Illegal Guns recommended to the administration that it should instruct the Justice Department to investigate those who are denied guns and who have a history that suggests they might commit violence.In a memorandum provided to the administration, the group suggested that "armed career criminals who have at least three prior violent felonies and/or serious drug offenses and would qualify for a mandatory sentence of 7 to 15 years" should be prosecuted if they lie on background-check forms. The group said that it provided a similar recommendation to the Obama administration in 2009.The memorandum said that more than 800 mayors in the United States "support more aggressive prosecution of those who fail background checks.""This is not like looking for a needle in a haystack — these are people you know are too violent to buy a gun," John Feinblatt, an official with the mayors' group who met with Mr. Biden on Wednesday, said in a telephone interview. "Once they have been rejected, they go online or to a private seller or a gun show and get a gun."The low number of prosecutions in 2010, the most recent year for which data are available, is consistent with other years. Prosecuting these cases has proved challenging because to get a conviction "you have to prove that the person knew they were lying when they tried to purchase the firearm," said a senior Justice Department official, who spoke on the condition of anonymity to discuss matters related to gun control before Mr. Biden's proposals are announced.A conviction usually carries a maximum sentence of just six months, the official said, adding that with a limited number of federal prosecutors the government has to prioritize its use of resources.Although gun control advocates have been more vocal about the issue, the N.R.A. also supports similar action, arguing that the administration should enforce the gun laws that already exist before making new ones."It has been a longstanding frustration of the National Rifle Association that there's no follow-through or follow-up on these cases and criminals, and those who shouldn't be trying to buy guns have been getting away scot-free," said Andrew Arulanandam, an N.R.A. spokesman.Mr. Arulanandam said that the N.R.A. has "for decades been trying to get prior administrations — Republicans and Democrats — to take action on the matter but there seems to be no will by the Justice Department to enforce existing gun laws."
DENVER — With politicians in Washington deeply divided over new gun regulations, an urgent national debate ignited by the massacre at Sandy Hook Elementary School is storming into state legislatures across the country. And nowhere is that debate more emotionally charged or politically consequential than here in Colorado, a reluctant crucible for the battle over guns.This state, one of hunters and sport shooters, has endured two of the most horrific mass shootings in American history, and this year for the first time in more than a decade it could pass major gun-control legislation.Gun-control advocates say it is a moment forged in part by the massacre inside a suburban Denver movie theater in July that left 12 people dead and dozens wounded. But it is also one created by demographics, of population shifts that have nudged the political center left while transforming traditionally rural, conservative swaths of the West."We've had it with mass shootings," said Beth McCann, a Democratic state representative. "People just don't want to hear about another massacre. This is enough."To lawmakers and advocates on both sides of the debate, Colorado is becoming a national test case for what kind of gun regulations — if any — can gather support from lawmakers, law enforcement officials and a public whose relationship with guns has been forged by tradition as much as tragedy.This is a place where even the horrors of the 1999 attack at Columbine High School in suburban Denver only temporarily shifted the debate on guns. In 2000, Colorado voters passed new restrictions on purchases made at gun shows, but a few years later, the General Assembly relaxed gun laws by making it easier for people to carry concealed weapons and limited the ability of towns and cities to pass strict gun laws.Gun ownership here crosses generations and political divisions. Liberal Denver lawyers own handguns, and the Democratic governor takes his son to hunting safety classes. A popular family shooting range sits in the center of Cherry Creek State Park, drawing some sport shooters who voted for President Obama, others who insist he is a communist.As legislators across the country reconvene, heavily Democratic states like New York, New Jersey and California are considering proposals to restrict assault weapons and ammunition that are far more aggressive than anything likely to pass in Colorado, even with Democrats in control of the Statehouse.Gov. John W. Hickenlooper, a first-term Democrat, has called for universal background checks of private, individual gun sales, in addition to the checks now required at gun shows and at retail establishments. But in an interview, he said he was unsure about proposals from Democratic lawmakers to ban high-capacity ammunition magazines."Even saying that puts some people into a frenzy," Mr. Hickenlooper said. "People in the West have a very strong, deeply anchored belief in people's right to bear arms."That division came into sharp relief when Mr. Hickenlooper called for universal background checks in his State of the State address on Thursday. Democrats in one half of the chamber leapt to their feet and applauded while members of the Republican minority sat in stony silence.Democratic lawmakers have not formally introduced their gun-control measures, but have said they are writing bills that would create background checks for private, person-to-person sales and restrict high-capacity magazines like those used by the gunman in the movie theater, in Aurora.Mayors Against Illegal Guns, a national gun-control organization, has hired a Denver lobbying firm to support new gun-control laws here.State Senator Greg Brophy, a Republican, said the attention from outside groups would make Colorado "ground zero for gun control in the United States."Republican supporters of gun rights have bristled at the push for tighter gun laws. One of the first bills introduced in the legislature would allow teachers with concealed-weapons permits to carry guns inside their classrooms (with a school district's permission). Mr. Brophy was one who recoiled at the universal background checks, saying the only way to enforce such a system would be to require all gun owners to register their firearms.
WASHINGTON — President Obama this week will embrace a comprehensive plan to reduce gun violence that will call for major legislation to expand background checks for gun purchases and lay out 19 separate actions the president could take by invoking the power of his office, lawmakers who were briefed on the plan said Monday.Lawmakers and other officials said that the president could use a public event as soon as Wednesday to signal his intention to engage in the biggest Congressional fight over guns in nearly two decades, focusing on the heightened background checks and including efforts to ban assault weapons and their high-capacity clips. But given the difficulty of pushing new rules through a bitterly divided Congress, Mr. Obama will also promise to act on his own to reduce gun violence wherever possible.Actions the president could take on his own are likely to include imposing new limits on guns imported from overseas, compelling federal agencies to improve sharing of mental health records and directing the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention to conduct research on gun violence, according to those briefed on the effort.White House aides believe Mr. Obama can also ratchet up enforcement of existing laws, including tougher prosecution of people who lie on their background checks.At a news conference on Monday, exactly one month after the school massacre in Newtown, Conn., Mr. Obama said a task force led by Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. had "presented me now with a list of sensible, common-sense steps that can be taken to make sure that the kinds of violence we saw at Newtown doesn't happen again. He added: "My starting point is not to worry about the politics. My starting point is to focus on what makes sense, what works."The administration's strategy reflects the uncertainty of gun politics in America and the desire by White House officials to address the Connecticut shooting while also confronting the broader deficiencies in the country's criminal justice and mental health systems.By proposing to use the independent power of his office, Mr. Obama is inviting political attacks by gun owners who have already expressed fear that he will abuse that authority to restrict their rights. Representative Steve Stockman, Republican of Texas, threatened Monday to file articles of impeachment if the president seeks to regulate guns with executive orders. "I will seek to thwart this action by any means necessary," Mr. Stockman said in a statement.White House officials and Democratic lawmakers said that there are clear limits to what the president can and cannot do, and that Mr. Obama has no plans to push beyond what he would need Congressional authority to accomplish.On Capitol Hill, Mr. Obama's legislative effort will face intense opposition from gun rights groups, including the National Rifle Association, and the lawmakers they support with millions of dollars at election time and who see gun rights as a defining issue in their districts. But Mr. Obama's allies see a rare opening for tighter gun rules after Congress has shied away from the politically charged issue for years."He's putting together a pretty comprehensive list of what could be done to make a difference in this area," said Representative Mike Thompson of California, who is heading a Democratic task force in the House. "There's some huge, huge holes in the process that are set up to keep communities safe. We need to close those holes."Representative Jackie Speier, Democrat of California, said Vice President Biden had informed lawmakers during a two-hour briefing on Monday that there are "19 independent steps that the president can take by executive order." Ms. Speier said the executive action is part of the "most comprehensive gun safety effort in a generation."Rahm Emanuel, the mayor of Chicago and Mr. Obama's former chief of staff, joined the debate on Monday and said that the president should "clear the table" by doing whatever he can administratively so small issues do not get in the way of the bigger legislative fights over access to guns.
WASHINGTON — President Obama this week will embrace a comprehensive plan to reduce gun violence that will call for major legislation to expand background checks for gun purchases and lay out 19 separate actions the president could take by invoking the power of his office, lawmakers who were briefed on the plan said Monday.Lawmakers and other officials said that the president could use a public event as soon as Wednesday to signal his intention to engage in the biggest Congressional fight over guns in nearly two decades, focusing on the heightened background checks and including efforts to ban assault weapons and their high-capacity clips. But given the difficulty of pushing new rules through a bitterly divided Congress, Mr. Obama will also promise to act on his own to reduce gun violence wherever possible.Actions the president could take on his own are likely to include imposing new limits on guns imported from overseas, compelling federal agencies to improve sharing of mental health records and directing the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention to conduct research on gun violence, according to those briefed on the effort.White House aides believe Mr. Obama can also ratchet up enforcement of existing laws, including tougher prosecution of people who lie on their background checks.At a news conference on Monday, exactly one month after the school massacre in Newtown, Conn., Mr. Obama said a task force led by Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. had "presented me now with a list of sensible, common-sense steps that can be taken to make sure that the kinds of violence we saw at Newtown doesn't happen again. He added: "My starting point is not to worry about the politics. My starting point is to focus on what makes sense, what works."The administration's strategy reflects the uncertainty of gun politics in America and the desire by White House officials to address the Connecticut shooting while also confronting the broader deficiencies in the country's criminal justice and mental health systems.By proposing to use the independent power of his office, Mr. Obama is inviting political attacks by gun owners who have already expressed fear that he will abuse that authority to restrict their rights. Representative Steve Stockman, Republican of Texas, threatened Monday to file articles of impeachment if the president seeks to regulate guns with executive orders. "I will seek to thwart this action by any means necessary," Mr. Stockman said in a statement.White House officials and Democratic lawmakers said that there are clear limits to what the president can and cannot do, and that Mr. Obama has no plans to push beyond what he would need Congressional authority to accomplish.On Capitol Hill, Mr. Obama's legislative effort will face intense opposition from gun rights groups, including the National Rifle Association, and the lawmakers they support with millions of dollars at election time and who see gun rights as a defining issue in their districts. But Mr. Obama's allies see a rare opening for tighter gun rules after Congress has shied away from the politically charged issue for years."He's putting together a pretty comprehensive list of what could be done to make a difference in this area," said Representative Mike Thompson of California, who is heading a Democratic task force in the House. "There's some huge, huge holes in the process that are set up to keep communities safe. We need to close those holes."Representative Jackie Speier, Democrat of California, said Vice President Biden had informed lawmakers during a two-hour briefing on Monday that there are "19 independent steps that the president can take by executive order." Ms. Speier said the executive action is part of the "most comprehensive gun safety effort in a generation."Rahm Emanuel, the mayor of Chicago and Mr. Obama's former chief of staff, joined the debate on Monday and said that the president should "clear the table" by doing whatever he can administratively so small issues do not get in the way of the bigger legislative fights over access to guns.
A new federal assault weapons ban and background checks of all gun buyers, which President Obama is expected to propose on Wednesday, might have done little to prevent the massacre in Newtown, Conn., last month. The semiautomatic rifle that Adam Lanza used to shoot 20 schoolchildren and 6 adults complied with Connecticut's assault weapons ban, the police said, and he did not buy the gun himself.But another proposal that Mr. Obama is expected to make could well have slowed Mr. Lanza's rampage: banning high-capacity magazines, like the 30-round magazines that the police said Mr. Lanza used, which have been factors in several other recent mass shootings.Those shootings, whose victims have included a member of Congress in Arizona, moviegoers in Colorado and first graders in Connecticut, have horrified the country and inspired Washington to embark on the most extensive re-examination of the nation's gun laws in a generation. But some of the proposals that Mr. Obama is expected to make at the White House on Wednesday, which are likely to include a call for expanded background checks, a ban on assault weapons and limits on high-capacity clips, will be intended not only to prevent high-profile mass shootings, but also to curb the more commonplace gun violence that claims many thousands more lives every year."The president has made clear that he intends to take a comprehensive approach," Jay Carney, the White House press secretary, said Tuesday. Mr. Carney said the proposals were aimed, broadly, at what he called "the scourge of gun violence in this country."While semiautomatic rifles were used in several recent mass shootings, including those in Newtown and in Aurora, Colo., where 12 people were killed at a movie theater in July, a vast majority of gun murders in the United States are committed with handguns.In 2011, 6,220 people were killed by handguns, and 323 by rifles, according to the Federal Bureau of Investigation. So while the administration is expected to try to restrict some types of assault weapons, it is also focusing on ways to keep more commonly used firearms out of the hands of dangerous criminals and people with mental illness.Of course, the administration must keep political realities in mind as it drafts its proposals: getting any new gun regulations through Congress, particularly through the Republican-controlled House, is seen as difficult. So the White House must not only weigh the effectiveness of its proposals, but also their political feasibility.The top priority of many gun control groups is to expand the background checks so that they apply to all buyers. All federally licensed firearms dealers are required to run background checks through the computerized databases that comprise the National Instant Criminal Background Check System. But the requirement does not cover guns that are sold by unlicensed sellers at gun shows and in other private sales, which account for about 40 percent of gun purchases in the country.Better background checks would have had little effect on several recent mass shootings — both Mr. Lanza, in Connecticut, and Jacob T. Roberts, who opened fire on a mall full of Christmas shoppers a few days earlier in Clackamas, Ore., were using weapons that they did not buy. But gun control groups say that expanded background checks would help keep guns out of the hands of dangerous criminals and people with mental illness, and would go a long way toward increasing public safety and could help prevent mass shootings.Gun control groups have encouraged the administration to look beyond mass shootings. When the Brady Campaign to Prevent Gun Violence, a leading gun control group, issued its recommendations to Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr., who has been developing the administration's proposals, it urged him to develop ideas that could help curb everyday gun violence as well."Every death is a tragedy, whether in a mass shooting that horrifies our entire nation, or one of the 32 gun murders or 90 gun deaths in our communities and homes every day," it wrote.With many of the proposals in Washington expected to be somewhat limited in scope, some public health researchers and gun control advocates said it was difficult to know what impact the recommendations might have.
WASHINGTON — When the Brady Campaign to Prevent Gun Violence wanted to promote more restrictions on firearms after the Connecticut school shootings in December, it turned to a firm to help publicize its position. The firm's name? Point Blank Public Affairs.When Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. promised ideas for responding to the massacre, he said he was "shooting for Tuesday" — even as he warned that there is "no silver bullet" for stopping gun violence. When President Obama noted that he was reviewing those ideas, he said on a different topic that he would not negotiate "with a gun at the head."No wonder it is hard to get rid of gun violence when Washington cannot even get rid of gun vocabulary. The vernacular of guns suffuses the political and media conversation in ways that politicians and journalists are often not even conscious of, underscoring the historical power of guns in the American experience. Candidates "target" their opponents, lawmakers "stick to their guns," advocacy groups "take aim" at hostile legislation and reporters write about a White House "under fire."The ubiquitous nature of such language has caused people on both sides of the emotional debate in recent weeks to take back, or at least think twice about the phrases they use, lest they inadvertently cause offense in a moment of heightened sensitivity."It's almost second nature," said Andrew Arulanandam, director of public affairs for the National Rifle Association. "They're such mainstream phrases, you almost have to check yourself and double-check yourself."But it also says something about the long American romance with guns and the nation's self image. "All of that ties into the frontier tradition, rugged individualism, a single American with a flintlock or a gun of some kind holding off the Indians or fighting off the British," said Robert Spitzer, a scholar of gun control at the State University of New York at Cortland.While Mr. Spitzer called that more mythology than reality, even he found himself using such references in a recent speech responding to comments by Wayne LaPierre, the N.R.A.'s vice president, after the Sandy Hook Elementary School attack. "My opening line was, his speech was a misfire; he missed the target," Mr. Spitzer recalled. "I liked using the gun metaphor because I think it's doubly appropriate for him."In that case, of course, he was doing it deliberately. And others use double entendre purposefully. The National Shooting Sports Foundation says on its Web site that it is "always shooting for more" to promote the future of sport shooting. For an editorial last week criticizing Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the Democratic leader, for his past solidarity with the N.R.A., The New York Times used the headline, "Senator Reid Takes Fresh Aim."But much of the time, such phrases come spilling out without apparent irony. Candy Crowley, the CNN anchor, introduced an interview by highlighting "our conversation with N.R.A. point man Asa Hutchinson." Christiane Amanpour on the same network featured a story about a Tennessee lawmaker known for supporting gun rights. "So why did the N.R.A. take aim at her?" she asked.After Alex Jones, a gun rights advocate, erupted during an interview with Piers Morgan, the Internet lit up. As of Tuesday, the phrase "Alex Jones goes ballistic" drew 357,000 hits on Google.The Brady Campaign found itself in the awkward position of using a firm called Point Blank when it needed help last month. Point Blank, named for the Bruce Springsteen song, had an archery bull's-eye on its Web site. But it has since dissolved and one of its principals, Debra DeShong Reed, has founded a new firm, called Five by Five Public Affairs, that is now working for the Brady Campaign.The Brady Campaign's own name attests to the sensitivity of language in the gun debate. Gun control advocates these days generally do not use the term gun control; instead, they talk about curbing gun violence, recognizing that "control" stirs opposition among legal gun owners who fear their rights being trampled.The use of gun symbolism has at times provoked controversy. After Representative Gabrielle Giffords of Arizona was shot in the head by a gunman in 2011, many criticized Sarah Palin, the former vice-presidential nominee, for using cross hairs on her Web site to identify Democrats like Ms. Giffords who she said should be defeated for re-election.Gun control advocates like Mr. Obama and Mr. Biden tend to draw less criticism when they use the language of guns. "We know that there is no silver bullet," Mr. Biden said last week about stemming gun violence. But he said he planned to present an array of ideas to Mr. Obama that he hoped would make a difference. "I'm shooting for Tuesday," he said.At a news conference on Monday, Mr. Obama said he would review those ideas. But during a discussion on fiscal talks, he too used the terminology of firearms. "What I will not do is have that negotiation with a gun at the head of the American people," he said.Gun control advocates said such lapses are not surprising. "We do it, too," said Mark Glaze, director of Mayors Against Illegal Guns, an advocacy group co-founded by Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York. "We notice and laugh, and we don't think it goes to our core motivations. We kind of accept that there's a piece of us that will always be based in the Old West."Mr. Glaze said he had slipped plenty of times. "I stopped feeling guilty about it a while ago when one of the survivors we work with somehow managed to squeeze in at least four gun references into a sentence that had nothing to do with guns," he said. "Since then, I've let it go."
WASHINGTON — President Obama indicated on Wednesday that along with asking Congress to pass measures like an assault weapons ban, he would be increasing pressure on lawmakers to do something they have refused to do for the past six years: confirm a permanent director of the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives .At a news conference, the president unveiled a series of executive actions and legislative proposals to help reduce gun violence, and he said he would nominate the agency's acting director, B. Todd Jones, to be its permanent leader."Congress needs to help, rather than hinder, law enforcement as it does its job," Mr. Obama said on Wednesday.Mr. Jones, 55, a former Marine who is also the United States attorney in Minnesota, has led the beleaguered agency since August 2011, when he was appointed by the administration to take over in the aftermath of the scandal surrounding the bungled gun trafficking investigation known as Operation Fast and Furious, in which agents lost track of firearms they were allowing to pass into Mexico.Until 2006, the president had the power to install a director of the firearms bureau without Congressional approval. But under pressure from gun lobbyists, Congress changed the law that year to require Senate confirmation. Since then, the Senate has failed to confirm any nominee by either President George W. Bush or Mr. Obama as senators who support gun rights have used their powers to delay nomination votes; Mr. Jones is the bureau's fifth acting director since 2006.One of the more vocal critics of the Justice Department and the firearms agency, Senator Charles E. Grassley, Republican of Iowa, said Wednesday that he agreed with the president that it was time for the Senate to confirm a permanent director of the agency, but he raised questions about Mr. Jones's credibility."The new nominee, B. Todd Jones, is a familiar face to the committee, but his ties to the Fast and Furious scandal raise serious questions," Mr. Grassley said."In any case, he'll receive a thorough and fair vetting by the Judiciary Committee," said Mr. Grassley, the committee's senior Republican.For years, the A.T.F. has been battered by scandals and has had its authority undercut by gun lobbyists, who have pushed to limit its power and cut its funding. The bureau most recently came under scrutiny in 2011 for its handling of Fast and Furious after; two of the firearms used in the investigation were found at the scene of a shootout in which a United States Border Patrol agent was killed in Arizona.Mr. Jones said in a meeting with reporters in September that during his tenure the agency had refocused its efforts on fighting violent crime and was "recalibrating" how it did business by revamping its policies and procedures."We are well on our way to tightening up our unity of effort and our communications," Mr. Jones said, adding that senior officials in Washington now had more oversight over the agency's field offices.Mr. Jones said that some procedures had not been updated in 15 to 20 years."We are back to the basics, and that is what I have been working very hard at, the fundamentals," he said, "and the fundamentals for us is protecting the American public from violent crime."Mr. Jones has told the agency's offices to work closely with police departments in large cities to combat sudden increases in crime and "to focus on cases that will have the greatest impact," a senior agency official said in a recent interview.This year, A.T.F. agents have been part of so-called surges of law enforcement officers in the country's most violent cities, including Oakland, Calif., and Philadelphia, working to make arrests and seize guns.
WASHINGTON — Four days before taking the oath of office, President Obama on Wednesday staked the beginning of his second term on an uphill quest to pass the broadest gun control legislation in a generation.In the aftermath of the Connecticut school massacre, Mr. Obama vowed to rally public opinion to press a reluctant Congress to ban military-style assault weapons and high-capacity magazines, expand background checks, and toughen gun-trafficking laws. Recognizing that the legislative fight could be long and difficult, the president also took immediate steps by issuing a series of executive actions intended to reduce gun violence.Surrounded by children who wrote him letters seeking curbs on guns, Mr. Obama committed himself to a high-profile and politically volatile campaign behind proposals assembled by Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. that will test the administration's strength heading into the next four years. The first big push of Mr. Obama's second term, then, will come on an issue that was not even on his to-do list on Election Day when voters renewed his lease on the presidency."I will put everything I've got into this," Mr. Obama said, "and so will Joe."The emotionally charged ceremony, attended by family members of those killed at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, Conn., reflected a decision by the White House to seize on public outrage to challenge the political power of the National Rifle Association and other forces that have successfully fought new gun laws for decades.The White House is planning a multifaceted effort to sell its plans, including speeches around the country by the president and vice president and concerted lobbying by interest groups to influence several dozen lawmakers from both parties seen as critical to passage. The White House created a Web page with video testimonials from victims of gun violence and a sign-up for supporters to help advocate the president's plan."I tell you, the only way we can change is if the American people demand it," Mr. Obama said. "And, by the way, that doesn't just mean from certain parts of the country. We're going to need voices in those areas, in those Congressional districts where the tradition of gun ownership is strong, to speak up and to say this is important. It can't just be the usual suspects."The N.R.A. made clear that it was ready for a fight. Even before the president's speech, it broadcast a provocative video calling Mr. Obama an "elitist hypocrite" for opposing more armed guards in schools while his daughters had Secret Service protection. After the speech the group said it would work to secure schools, fix the mental health system and prosecute criminals but criticized the president's other proposals. "Attacking firearms and ignoring children is not a solution to the crisis we face as a nation," the N.R.A. said in a statement. "Only honest, law-abiding gun owners will be affected, and our children will remain vulnerable to the inevitability of more tragedy."Mr. Obama's plan included 4 major legislative proposals and 23 executive actions that he initiated on his own authority to bolster enforcement of existing laws, improve the nation's database used for background checks and otherwise make it harder for criminals and people with mental illness to get guns.Mr. Obama asked Congress to reinstate and strengthen a ban on the sale and production of assault weapons that passed in 1994 and expired in 2004. He also called for a ban on the sale and production of magazines with more than 10 rounds, like those used in Newtown and other mass shootings. Mr. Obama's plan would require criminal background checks for all gun sales, closing the longstanding loophole that allows buyers to avoid screening by purchasing weapons from unlicensed sellers at gun shows or in private sales. Nearly 40 percent of all gun sales are exempt from the system.He also proposed legislation banning the possession or transfer of armor-piercing bullets and cracking down on "straw purchasers," those who pass background checks and then forward guns to criminals or others forbidden from purchasing them.For Mr. Obama, the plan represented a political pivot. While he has always expressed support for an assault weapons ban, he has made no real effort to pass it on the assumption that the votes were not there. But he and the White House are banking on the idea that the Newtown shooting has changed the dynamics. "I have never seen the nation's conscience so shaken by what happened at Sandy Hook," Mr. Biden said Wednesday. "The world has changed and is demanding action."
One obstacle President Obama may face in proposing a new federal ban on assault weapons could lie in the use of the term "assault weapon" itself.The label, applied to a group of firearms sold on the civilian market, has become so politicized in recent decades that where people stand on the gun issue can often be deduced by whether they use the term.On Internet forums there is perhaps no more fiercely discussed topic than the question of what constitutes an assault weapon. And some argue that it would be impossible to come up with a definition comprehensive enough to effectively remove the weapons from the market.Advocates of an assault weapons ban argue that the designation should apply to firearms like those used in the Newtown, Conn., shootings and other recent mass killings — semiautomatic rifles with detachable magazines and "military" features like pistol grips, flash suppressors and collapsible or folding stocks.Such firearms, they contend, were designed for the battlefield, where the goal is to rapidly kill as many enemy soldiers as possible, and they have no place in civilian life."When the military switched over to this assault weapon, the whole context changed," said Tom Diaz, formerly of the Violence Policy Center, whose book about the militarization of civilian firearms, "The Last Gun," is scheduled for publication in the spring. "The conversation became, 'Is this the kind of gun you want in the civilian world?' And we who advocate for regulation say, 'No, you do not.' "But Second Amendment groups — and many firearm owners — heatedly object to the use of "assault weapon" to describe guns that they say are routinely used in target shooting and hunting. The term, they argue, should be used only for firearms capable of full automatic fire, like those employed by law enforcement and the military. They prefer the term "tactical rifle" or "modern sporting rifle" for the semiautomatic civilian versions.They argue that any attempt to ban "assault weapons" is misguided because the guns under discussion differ from many other firearms only in their styling."The reality is there's very little difference between any sporting firearm and a so-called assault weapon," said Steven C. Howard, a lawyer and firearms expert in Lansing, Mich.The semantics of the assault weapon debate are so fraught that they can trip up even those who oppose a ban.Phillip Peterson, a gun dealer in Indiana and the author of "Gun Digest Buyer's Guide to Assault Weapons" (2008), said he had fought with his publishers over the use of the term in the title, knowing that it would only draw the ire of the gun industry.After the passage of the 1994 federal ban on assault weapons, Mr. Peterson said, the gun industry "moved to shame or ridicule" anyone who used "assault weapon" to describe anything other than firearms capable of full automatic fire.His instinct proved correct: The National Rifle Association refused to sell the book on its Web site, he said. So in 2010, Mr. Peterson produced another version that contained "90 percent of the same info," but was retitled "Gun Digest Buyer's Guide to Tactical Rifles." That book made it onto the N.R.A. site, he said.Equally controversial are the definitions for which firearms should qualify as assault weapons. Most assault weapons bans have been primarily aimed at rifles like the AR-15, a semiautomatic version of the military's M-16 sold on the civilian market, although certain pistols and shotguns have also been included.The most basic criteria have to do with a firearm's ability to fire multiple rounds quickly. Because of this, the firearms included under any assault weapons ban are usually semiautomatic, meaning that a new round is automatically reloaded into the chamber but is not fired until the trigger is pulled again. The weapons also have detachable magazines, allowing them to fire 10, 20, 30 rounds or more without the need to insert a new magazine.After that, however, the definition becomes more difficult. In calling for a renewed ban, Mr. Obama on Wednesday singled out "military style" weapons.
WASHINGTON — The National Rifle Association provoked a furious response from the White House on Wednesday by releasing a video accusing President Obama of being an "elitist" and a "hypocrite" because he opposes posting armed guards at schools, while his daughters have Secret Service protection.The video also prompted commentary on social media about whether the gun rights organization might have been too strident, even for its own members.The White House lashed out at the N.R.A. even as Mr. Obama stood with young children to unveil broad proposals to create tougher gun laws and use the power of the presidency to keep guns out of the hands of criminals."Most Americans agree that a president's children should not be used as pawns in a political fight," said Jay Carney, the White House press secretary. "But to go so far as to make the safety of the president's children the subject of an attack ad is repugnant and cowardly."The N.R.A. video refers to Mr. Obama's strong reservations about the group's idea to prevent school massacres by posting armed guards at all of the nation's schools."I am skeptical that the only answer is putting more guns in schools," Mr. Obama said during a recent interview on the NBC News program "Meet the Press." "And I think the vast majority of the American people are skeptical that that somehow is going to solve our problem."The video, posted at a Web site called N.R.A. Stand and Fight, starts by asking, "Are the president's kids more important than yours?" The video does not show Mr. Obama's daughters, Malia, 14, and Sasha, 11, but it suggests that Mr. Obama holds their safety to a different standard than he is willing to offer for other children.The N.R.A. does not appear to have spent much money paying for the video to run as an advertisement on television. But it still generated ire among Democrats and gun control advocates who said it improperly dragged the president's daughters into the national debate over guns.Kim Anderson, a top official with the National Education Association, a teachers' union, said the video "demonstrates a level of insensitivity and disrespect that N.E.A. members wouldn't tolerate in any classroom in America."The video prompted quick declarations of outrage among liberal talk show hosts and on Twitter, with many people saying that the N.R.A. had gone too far by referring to the president's children.But the video also generated expressions of support, with some conservatives criticizing the president for standing with children at his event. On Twitter, N.R.A. backers used the hashtag #standandfight to express support."Patriots, we must back the #NRA in their efforts to preserve our liberties," one person wrote on Twitter.The N.R.A. has been the subject of intense criticism in some quarters since the shooting in Newtown, Conn., last month. Shortly after the massacre, Wayne LaPierre, the chief executive and vice president of the N.R.A., held a news conference in which he called for more security in schools and an end to the "gun-free zones" that are common around school buildings."The only thing that stops a bad guy with a gun is a good guy with a gun," Mr. LaPierre said at the time.But the organization has said that its rejection of any new restrictions on guns has led to a surge in new members, suggesting that its influence on Capitol Hill is not about to wane.In a second video posted to its Stand and Fight Web site on Wednesday afternoon, the organization replays parts of Mr. LaPierre's news conference and suggests that the "elite" news media and the president are out of touch with everyday Americans."America agrees with Wayne and the N.R.A.," the four-and-a-half-minute video says.
The massacre of children at an elementary school in Newtown, Conn., appears to be profoundly swaying Americans' views on guns, galvanizing the broadest support for stricter gun laws in about a decade, according to a New York Times/CBS News poll.As President Obama tries to persuade a reluctant Congress to pass new gun laws, the poll found that a majority of Americans — 54 percent — think gun control laws should be tightened, up markedly from a CBS News poll last April that found that only 39 percent backed stricter laws.The rise in support for stricter gun laws stretched across political lines, including an 18-point increase among Republicans. A majority of independents now back stricter gun laws.Whether the Newtown shooting — in which 20 first graders and 6 adults were killed — will have a long-term effect on public opinion of gun laws is hard to assess just a month after the rampage. But unlike the smaller increases in support for gun control immediately after other mass shootings, including after the 2011 shooting in Tucson that severely wounded Representative Gabrielle Giffords, the latest polling results suggest a deeper, and possibly more resonating, shift.In terms of specific gun proposals being considered, the poll found even wider support, including among gun owners.The idea of requiring background checks on all gun purchases, which would eliminate a provision that allows about 40 percent of guns to be sold by unlicensed sellers without checks, was overwhelmingly popular. Nine in 10 Americans would favor such a law, the poll found — including 9 in 10 of the respondents who said that there was a gun in their household, and 85 percent whose households include National Rifle Association members.A ban on high-capacity magazines, like the 15- and 30-round magazines that have been used in several recent mass shootings, was supported by more than 6 in 10, and by a majority of those who live in households with guns. And just over half of all respondents, 53 percent, said they would support a ban on some semiautomatic weapons.After the mass shootings at Virginia Tech in 2007 and Tucson in 2011, polls found that 47 percent of Americans favored stricter gun laws."I'm from a rural area in the South, I grew up in a gun culture, my father hunted," Leslie Hodges, a 64-year-old graphic artist who lives in Atlanta and has a gun, said in a follow-up interview. "However, I don't believe being able to have a gun keeps you from thinking reasonably about changes that would keep someone from walking into a school and being able to kill 20 children in 20 seconds. I think that we can say, O.K., we want the freedom to have guns in this country, but there are rules we can all agree to that will make us all safer."The poll also gave an indication of the state of play in Washington at the outset of what is expected to be a fierce debate over the nation's gun laws, as the National Rifle Association and several members of Congress, particularly Republicans in the House, have criticized the gun control measures that Mr. Obama proposed Wednesday and have vowed to block them.Americans said that they trusted the president over Republicans in Congress to make the right decisions about gun laws by a margin of 47 percent to 39 percent, the poll found.The National Rifle Association, the powerful gun lobby, is viewed favorably by nearly 4 in 10 Americans, the poll found. All told, 38 percent said that they had a favorable opinion of the group, while 29 percent had a negative view and the rest had no opinion. The N.R.A. was viewed positively by 54 percent of those with guns in their homes.But the group is deeply unpopular with people in households without guns, who were twice as likely to have a negative view of the N.R.A. as a positive one: 41 percent of them expressed a negative view of it, while only 20 percent expressed a positive one.The survey underscored how common guns in America are: 47 percent of those surveyed said that they or someone in their household owned a gun, and 31 percent had close friends or relatives who did. The top reasons cited for owning guns were protection and hunting.The national poll was conducted by land lines and cellphones from Jan. 11 to Jan. 15, before the president announced his proposals to curb gun violence. It surveyed 1,110 adults and has a margin of sampling error of plus or minus three percentage points.Some gun owners, like Sally Brady, a 69-year-old retired teacher who lives in Amissville, Va., explained in follow-up interviews why they would support some restrictions on ammunition or more thorough background checks of all gun buyers."I see no reason for high-capacity magazines if you want to go hunting," said Mrs. Brady, an independent who owns a hunting rifle. "The purpose of hunting is sport, and you don't need a whole big bunch of bullets to shoot a deer or a squirrel. If you're that poor of a shot, stay out of the woods."Despite the higher support for stricter gun laws, many Americans do not think the changes would be very effective at deterring violence. While most Americans, 53 percent, said stricter gun laws would help prevent gun violence, about a quarter said they would help a lot.Other steps were seen as being potentially more effective. About three-quarters of those surveyed said that having more police officers or armed security guards would help prevent mass shootings in public places. And more than 8 in 10 said better mental health screening and treatment would help prevent gun violence.Violence in popular culture is seen by a large majority of Americans, 75 percent, as contributing to gun violence in the United States, including about 4 in 10 who say it contributes a lot.
WASHINGTON — Some mayors spoke about the bad feeling they got with each call that there had been another shooting in their city. Others described the pain of burying police officers who had worked for them. Many recalled their attempts to console grieving families.So as mayors from around the nation gathered here on Thursday for the 81st winter meeting of the United States Conference of Mayors, many said they were heartened by President Obama's call for new laws to curb gun violence, which included several measures that the conference had sought for decades. Many said they planned to urge Congress to enact them."Far too often it is the mayor who gets the call about a tragic crime committed with an illegal gun that's resulted in a loss of life," Mayor Michael Nutter of Philadelphia, the president of the conference, said in a speech. "It may be the life of a child. A police officer. A young black man. A young woman. It could be anyone in our cities. But it's the mayor who visits the family members who have had their hearts torn out, and the mayor who attends funeral after funeral after funeral."Mayor Ron Littlefield of Chattanooga, Tenn., recalled a police officer who was shot to death while responding to a robbery at a pawnshop. Mayor Sly James of Kansas City, Mo., lamented what he called the "slow-motion mass murder" that claims the lives of more than 100 young people in his city each year. And Mayor R. T. Rybak of Minneapolis said he had "heard too many eulogies for amazing people whom I will never know."The mayors gave a standing ovation to Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr., who praised the work they had done over the years on gun issues and urged them to push for the passage of the president's proposals."There are some who say the most powerful voice in this debate belongs to the gun lobby and those who demand a stop to these common-sense approaches to save lives," Mr. Biden told the Conference of Mayors. "I think they're wrong.""Newtown has shocked the nation," the vice president said. "The carnage on our streets is no longer able to be ignored. We're going to take this fight to the halls of Congress. We're going to take it beyond that. We're going to take it to the American people."Many mayors said they were eager at the prospect that new gun laws might pass.Mayor Joseph P. Riley Jr. of Charleston, S.C., who has been in office for more than three decades, said he hoped that the country would "seize this moment.""I know that no police officer wants to be confronted with an assault weapon," he said. "They would be out-ammoed. And I think that it's time for our country to deal with this, it's time for Congress to deal with this."But even here, at a meeting of a group that has advocated stricter gun laws for decades, there was not unanimity. Mayor Mick Cornett of Oklahoma City, a Republican, said he did not believe that the gun control proposals being discussed would "resolve the problem they're trying to resolve.""There are larger issues out there, and more specific issues, and I really would like to see us get a better handle on mental health," he said. "I think the way that has trended in the last 10 years, the way that filters out into our jails and types of violence like this needs to be addressed. I wish they'd concentrate on that."One thing the mayors who are seeking new gun laws seem to lack is a high-profile sitting Republican mayor who agrees with them — the way, say, Mayor Rudolph W. Giuliani became an influential voice in the debate in the early 1990s when he expressed his support for an assault weapons ban. (Mr. Giuliani reiterated his support for such a ban in an interview this month on NY1, the New York cable news channel.)But some Republican mayors from smaller cities support tighter gun laws. Mayor Richard Ward of Hurst, Tex., a Republican, came here to lobby Congress with Mayors Against Illegal Guns, an advocacy group led by Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York and Mayor Thomas M. Menino of Boston.Mr. Ward, a gun owner who said he enjoyed "blasting away" at targets, said that after he joined the group, he got more than 100 letters from constituents who belonged to the National Rifle Association urging him to leave it."The next election I got 90 percent of the vote," he said, chuckling. "After that I got 86 percent — they're gaining on me!"Mr. Rybak, the Minneapolis mayor, suggested that his counterparts, who buy thousands of guns to arm their police departments, should use their clout with the gun industry."We buy a boatload of guns in this country," he said Wednesday at a news conference called by Mayors Against Illegal Guns. "If the gun lobby comes here to Congress and starts throwing their weight around about what's going to happen with guns, well, the mayors of America are going to stand up: we buy a lot more guns than almost anybody in this country."
WASHINGTON — As Congressional Democrats shape their strategy for considering President Obama's proposals to curb gun violence, sharp divisions are forming between lawmakers who believe the best path to success is through narrowly written bills and a meticulous legislative process, and those who advocate a more guerrilla approach.Many Democrats, and some Senate Republicans, believe the only legislation that has a whisper of a chance of passing would be bills that are tightly focused on more consensus elements like enhancing background checks or limits on magazines, subjected to debate in committee and then brought to a vote after building bipartisan support.That would be a departure from recent years, when the leadership often sidestepped committees and sought to take fights directly to the floor.Others, particularly those senators who have long fought for gun control measures, believe a plodding process allows too much time for opposition to build, and prefer to fast-track measures by adding them as amendments to other bills, even blocking bills in ways that have angered Democrats, until they are granted votes on those ideas."We can't sit around for months talking and letting the gun lobby run out the clock," said Senator Frank R. Lautenberg, Democrat of New Jersey. "If we're going to make progress, it's essential that we move quickly and start voting as soon as possible."Democrats are united on one point: For any legislation to reach the Senate floor, Mr. Obama will have to put the full weight of his office and bully pulpit behind it.Without constant public pressure and a concerted effort to woo conservative Democrats, especially those up for re-election in red states in two years, there will be little impetus, numerous Democrats said, to move legislation along. Democrats also may be forced to decide whether to endure a lengthy legislative battle on guns at the expense of priorities like immigration.Recognizing that public pressure is going to be required to move such contentious measures, the president's former campaign aides in the weeks ahead will convert the Obama for America operation into a different kind of outside political group led by Jim Messina, Mr. Obama's former campaign manager, according to people familiar with the plans. The new organization will be able to raise money for grass-roots campaigning on behalf of the president's second-term agenda, they said.Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader who has spearheaded other legislation desired by the White House, will take a more passive role with any gun legislation, aides to Senate Democrats say, letting the administration set the agenda and allowing senators to press ahead through their committee leadership or interest in the issue.Mr. Reid, who was deeply disturbed by the shootings last month in Newtown, Conn., is a longstanding gun rights supporter, a necessity for any statewide official from Nevada.Mr. Obama's efforts on Capitol Hill will provide the most crucial test of whether the mass shooting in Newtown, and the obdurate response from the National Rifle Association, has ushered in a new chapter in a legislative era that began in 2004 with the expiration of the assault weapons ban. Since that time, most new gun legislation has emerged in statehouses, and Washington has largely enforced gun rights.The political sensitivity around guns can be gauged somewhat through the measured statements of lawmakers long associated with gun rights."Some have asked whether I will try to block or filibuster this debate because of my support of the Second Amendment," said Senator Tom Coburn, Republican of Oklahoma, who in 2009 sponsored a successful measure that repealed a gun ban in national parks. "My goal is the opposite. I believe Congress has a responsibility to review all of our laws and make adjustments as necessary in a transparent, open and deliberative manner."Senator Patrick J. Leahy, the Vermont Democrat who is chairman of the Judiciary Committee and has a mixed legislative record on guns, said the first hearings he would schedule in the new Congress would be on gun legislation. Mr. Leahy was the only senator to attend an event with Mr. Obama this week to announce his push on gun laws.
The latest New York Times/CBS News Poll is based on telephone interviews conducted Jan. 11 through Jan. 15 with 1,110 adults throughout the United States.The sample of land-line telephone exchanges called was randomly selected by a computer from a complete list of more than 72,000 active residential exchanges across the country. The exchanges were chosen so as to ensure that each region of the country was represented in proportion to its share of all telephone numbers.Within each exchange, random digits were added to form a complete telephone number, thus permitting access to listed and unlisted numbers alike. Within each household, one adult was designated by a random procedure to be the respondent for the survey.To increase coverage, this land-line sample was supplemented by respondents reached through random dialing of cellphone numbers. The two samples were then combined and adjusted to assure the proper ratio of land-line-only, cellphone-only and dual phone users.Interviewers made multiple attempts to reach every phone number in the survey, calling back unanswered numbers on different days at different times of both day and evening.The combined results have been weighted to adjust for variation in the sample relating to geographic region, sex, race, Hispanic origin, marital status, age, education and number of adults in the household. Respondents in the land-line sample were also weighted to take account of the number of telephone lines into the residence.In theory, in 19 cases out of 20, overall results based on such samples will differ by no more than three percentage points in either direction from what would have been obtained by seeking to interview all American adults. For smaller subgroups, the margin of sampling error is larger. For the 504 respondents in gun-owning households it is plus or minus four points. Shifts in results between polls over time also have a larger sampling error.In addition to sampling error, the practical difficulties of conducting any survey of public opinion may introduce other sources of error into the poll. Variation in the wording and order of questions, for example, may lead to somewhat different results.Michael R. Kagay of Princeton, N.J., assisted The Times in its polling analysis. Complete questions and results are available at nytimes.com/polls.
CINCINNATI — Outside a squat Cincinnati church within sight of an elementary school, dozens of people with guns braced against the Tuesday morning cold, waiting. They had guns in their hands and guns in their handbags, guns swaddled in blankets and guns plopped in plastic bags. A .22 here, a sawed-off there, guns everywhere, a few still loaded.Inside the church, two private security professionals with Glocks at the hip went over the ground rules for the gun buyback program about to begin. No police on the premises, no questions asked and no more than 10 people in the lobby at a time. Guns must be deemed operable before being exchanged for a $100 gift card. Oh, and the guns must be kept in bags, with muzzles down."I don't want them coming in with the weapon and just saying, 'Here you go,' " explained Michael Brooks, 44, an electrician by trade and the day's lead security man, whose job was to create a controlled environment out of dozens of strangers walking into a church with guns.The doors to the President Drive Church of Christ opened, and the first in line took seats in the cramped lobby's welcoming warmth, some chatting, others silent. A burly man in hunting attire cradled two rifles in zippered cases. A slight man in a hooded sweatshirt clutched a plastic bag that drooped from the weight of metal. An older woman held a pocketbook in her lap.Before long, Mr. Brooks summoned the woman to a foldout table propped just outside the church's small kitchen, now an arsenal-in-waiting. She removed a handgun from her pocketbook. He held the gun up and away, determined it to be operable and empty, and said, "Thank you, ma'am."She was escorted into the church's sanctuary, where a table covered with gift cards sat before a large cross on the back wall. Soon her transaction was completed with no questions asked, beyond, Walmart, Target or Kroger?So began another gun buyback program in the wake of last month's schoolhouse massacre in Newtown, Conn. Across the country, programs like this modest event, held on the birth date of the shooting victim Martin Luther King Jr., have become a familiar — and controversial — attempt at gentle gun control, often organized by people who do not know what else to do.On Sunday, a front-page article in The Cincinnati Enquirer questioned the effectiveness of gun buybacks in a country that it said was awash with more than 300 million guns. It quoted criminologists who said that heightened police patrols and intervention with known criminals have more impact, and that buyback programs usually collect guns not likely to be used in crimes.But the event's central organizer, Ennis Tait, a local pastor, stood his ground. Some of the guns might be old rifles traded in by hunters looking to upgrade, or ancient .22s tucked away in sock drawers, he conceded. But every gun collected — and turned over to the police to be destroyed — is a gun not found by a curious child, not reached for in a fit of anger over a slight on the street.Over all, crime has been declining in Cincinnati, but this city of nearly 300,000 still had more than 50 homicides last year, most of them by bullet. On Christmas Day, for example, a 20-year-old woman was shot to death while visiting relatives not far from here."You get tired of going to funerals," Mr. Tait said, underscoring the point that for the volunteers running this buyback program, guns are not a theoretical concern.Saying hello at the door was Mitch Morris, 56, who did prison time many years ago ("I was in a gun battle," he said, "and somebody didn't make it home."), and now helps others find alternatives to violent street life. Saying goodbye at the exit was J. C. Battle III, 65, a third-generation funeral home director in the city who knows too well the aesthetic challenges created by bullets.Serving as host was the church's longtime pastor, Everett Brewer, 66, who just two weeks ago heard neighborhood gunfire greeting the new year. And supervising it all was Mr. Tait, 42, the pastor of the Church of the Living God, several miles closer to downtown, who is one of those forces of purpose often toiling in poor urban neighborhoods, working two cellphones, trying to nudge things forward.
WASHINGTON — As Senate Democrats grapple with how much of President Obama's broad gun control agenda is politically achievable, or even desirable, Senator Patrick J. Leahy of Vermont, chairman of the committee with jurisdiction over gun laws, said that moving to tighten background checks should be a top priority."One of the first things you want to do is close the gun-show loophole," said Mr. Leahy, in an interview for C-SPAN's "Newsmakers," referring to a legal provision that permits unlicensed gun sellers to sell to people without conducting background checks. The loophole is a small piece of a much broader agenda introduced by Mr. Obama on Wednesday, one that faces considerable, though not insurmountable, odds on Capitol Hill.The view of Mr. Leahy, a Democrat with a history of supporting some gun rights, is crucial because the work of his Judiciary Committee will be central to advancing any new gun legislation.He declined to detail precisely how the committee, which will hold hearings on potential gun legislation this month, would proceed with Mr. Obama's request to push legislation that includes a renewal of an assault weapons ban, a limit on magazine size and universal background checks.Mr. Leahy's plans will also be closely watched by senators with their own gun control legislative agendas, lawmakers who may decide to push their own bills if the committee process does not yield the results they seek.The 2004 expiration of the assault weapons ban tipped off the beginning of a new era in gun rights, one in which legislation began to tilt in favor of laws that strengthened, rather than chipped away at, gun owners' rights to own all types of weapons, as well as where and how they could be carried. An attempt to renew that law, which opponents in both parties say did little to stem gun violence in the 10 years it was in effect, faces formidable opposition.Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, who finds himself trapped between the desires of Mr. Obama and those of his conservative Democratic colleagues who would prefer not to have to vote on gun measures, has already signaled that that particular element of Mr. Obama's agenda is in trouble."Is it something that can pass the Senate?" he said recently on a Nevada television program about a renewed assault weapons ban. "Maybe. Is it something that can pass the House? I doubt it."Mr. Leahy said, "I have told my staff I'd like to get a definitive answer if we can: 'Did an assault weapon ban work?' "It is a question that many Democrats and Republicans alike continue to pose.It is possible that the Obama administration, which spent its first four years negotiating with Congress by offering its strongest hand up front, may use that legislation as a bargaining chip that it is willing to sacrifice to obtain the rest of its agenda.Some Democrats, particularly Senator Charles E. Schumer of New York, believe the best path to pursue is universal background checks for gun owners, which Mr. Schumer called "the sweet spot" among legislative paths. But such legislation would be scrutinized carefully for its details.For example, in many states and rural areas, guns frequently change hands privately through sales to family members or neighbors, which could complicate background check procedures. But if written narrowly, a background check provision could potentially win bipartisan support.One of the clearest impediments to mass killings, gun control advocates say, is a limit on the size of magazines permitted for civilian gun owners. "I've never known a gun owner in Vermont who says, 'No, I've got to have 30 rounds,' " Mr. Leahy said.A measure limiting magazines has been drawing bipartisan backing since the school massacre in Newtown, Conn. "I'm going to support the limitation on the size of the clips," said Senator Susan Collins, Republican of Maine. Such a bill, narrowly written, "might well pass," she said.Senator Angus King of Maine, the newly elected Independent, has said that he supports universal background checks and limits on high-capacity ammunition magazines as well, but is waiting to see specific legislative language on all of the proposals, including an assault weapons ban.The biggest problem may be marrying too many components in one bill. For example, a measure that Senator Dianne Feinstein, Democrat of California, is working on would reinstitute the ban on assault weapons but also limit magazines. Such a measure would probably enjoy the support of some big-city mayors and the like, but could be met coolly by other Democrats, particularly those from conservative states who are up for re-election in 2014.Any legislation that managed to get through the Senate would have a tougher ride in the House."The necessity of having that legislation here instead of in the states is lost on me," said Representative Rob Woodall, Republican of Georgia. "Folks in New York may have less of that grandfather-to-grandson exchange that we have in Georgia that takes place under the Christmas tree every year."Mr. Leahy said legislation would be shaped after he heard from a range of witnesses in his hearings. He said he had invited Wayne LaPierre, the chief executive of the National Rifle Association.The N.R.A. did not respond to an inquiry about whether Mr. LaPierre would attend.
Last week, the day after Gov. Andrew M. Cuomo of New York approved a broad package of gun-control measures that made New York's tough gun laws even tougher, the Texas attorney general, Greg Abbott, began running Internet advertisements in Manhattan and Albany asking New York gun owners to consider moving to Texas.The two ads — displayed on news sites and aimed at Web users with Manhattan and Albany ZIP codes — promote the state's low taxes and gun culture, with one asking, "Is Gov. Cuomo looking to take your guns?" The other reads, "Wanted: Law abiding New York gun owners looking for lower taxes and greater opportunity."When clicked on, the ads lead users to a Facebook page where a letter from Mr. Abbott, the state's chief law enforcement official, promotes Texas's strong economy and lack of an income tax, allowing transplanted gun owners "to keep more of what you earn and use some of that extra money to buy more ammo."The ads are a rare burst of political theater from Mr. Abbott, a former State Supreme Court justice who has built a reputation as a gentlemanly yet fiercely conservative litigator eager to challenge the Obama administration, and who, in a speech last year, described his job this way: "I go to the office. I sue the federal government. And then I go home."Mr. Abbott has been laying the groundwork and raising millions of dollars for a possible run for governor in 2014, regardless of whether Gov. Rick Perry, his ally and fellow Republican, decides to seek re-election.Mr. Abbott's ads were paid for not by the attorney general's office but by his political campaign, Texans for Greg Abbott. A campaign spokesman, Eric Bearse, said the ads began running on Wednesday and were "interest targeted" to those in Manhattan and Albany who visited several news sites, including The Wall Street Journal and The New York Times.Mr. Bearse said the ads were created in response to New York's new gun-control laws as well as the executive actions that President Obama announced the same day to curb gun violence. He declined to say how much they had cost Mr. Abbott, whose campaign account has grown to $18 million."It's a somewhat unconventional method to weigh in on a very serious issue," Mr. Bearse said. "It makes the point that Texans value freedom, and specifically their freedom to protect themselves. Our state has experienced the largest population growth in the country from places like California and New York because our culture does value freedom."The ads illustrate the extent to which the debate over guns and gun violence since the mass shooting at an elementary school in Newtown, Conn., has played out differently in Texas than it has in other parts of the country.In Texas, guns and the right to carry them continue to be closely linked to the state's self-image. Those licensed to carry a concealed weapon can do so in restaurants, shopping malls and even the Capitol building here in Austin.Responding to Mr. Obama's gun proposals, Mr. Perry said in a statement that he was disgusted to see the political left and the news media use the school shooting to advance a pre-existing agenda, and he suggested that prayers rather than laws were in order.A day after the president unveiled his proposals, a different sort of gun debate unfolded here, after a Republican state senator from Granbury, Brian Birdwell, filed a bill to allow those with a concealed handgun license to carry their firearms on college campuses.Mr. Abbott posted his ads on his Facebook page, creating an impromptu cross-state forum and occasional shouting match between New Yorkers and Texans on both sides of the issue. A woman from Jarrell, Tex., called the ads "another embarrassing example" of politicians in the state. Another woman in Texas complained of Yankees and their liberal attitudes, adding, "Stay up North we don't want you in Texas."And one Republican New Yorker wrote that she was sick of Mr. Cuomo, ready to move to Texas and would greatly appreciate "any info, regarding employment, schools, and city to live in."New Yorkers moving to Texas might find that the two places have more in common than they expect: each is as much a state of mind as it is an actual state. The century had barely gotten started when Mr. Perry declared in his inaugural address in 2011 that historians would look back and call it "the Texas century." New Yorkers are as New York-centric as Texans are Texas-centric.And there is at least one place where newly arrived New Yorkers might feel strangely at home: New York, Tex., an unincorporated community amid the green acres of East Texas, about 1,500 miles from Times Square. It is made up of a handful of houses, a cemetery, a church and Reynolds New York Store.Carolyn Reynolds, who runs the feed and fertilizer store, paused when asked for the population. She started counting under her breath. "Right now, I'd consider it 11," she replied.Still, Mr. Abbott said in a statement, because of the state's low taxes and gun laws, "our New York is better than their New York."
WASHINGTON — Wayne LaPierre, the executive director of the National Rifle Association, angrily accused President Obama on Tuesday of demonizing law-abiding gun owners and of wanting to put "every private personal firearms transaction right under the thumb of the federal government."In a fiery speech at a hunting conference in Nevada, Mr. LaPierre criticized Mr. Obama's Inaugural Address on Monday when the president said Americans should not "mistake absolutism for principle."That reference, Mr. LaPierre said, was intended as an attack on the N.R.A. and gun owners who believe that the Second Amendment to the Constitution provides an absolute right to bear arms."I urge our president to use caution when attacking clearly defined absolutes in favor of his principles," Mr. LaPierre said. "When absolutes are abandoned for principles, the U.S. Constitution becomes a blank slate for anyone's graffiti."Speaking on the same day that a gunfight on a Texas college campus left four people hospitalized, Mr. LaPierre gave voice to some of the resistance on Capitol Hill from Republicans who oppose efforts by the president to seek tougher restrictions on firearms.That debate is likely to begin in the days ahead as Mr. Obama's allies in Congress formally introduce legislation seeking a ban on assault weapons, limits on high-capacity magazines and an enhanced and expanded background check system for gun purchases.Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the Democratic majority leader and a supporter of gun rights, said Tuesday that he would not stand in the way of such legislation and would make sure that gun-control legislation was allowed to come to the floor of the Senate.But Mr. LaPierre angrily accused Mr. Obama of seeking to substitute his own beliefs for the absolute principles that the framers of the Constitution had established in the Bill of Rights.He said there were only two reasons government would want to expand the background check system, which he said would collect the names of gun owners into a huge federal registry.The reasons, he said: "Either to tax them, or to take them."Mr. LaPierre said that the president had twisted the definition of the word "absolutist," turning it into the same as the word "extremist." He said the president's goal was to get guns out of the hands of law-abiding citizens, leaving them only in the hands of criminals and the wealthy."If the only way he can force you to give them up is through scorn and ridicule, believe me, he is more than willing to do it," Mr. LaPierre said.He also accused the president of protecting the wealthy like Mr. Obama and his allies — who he said have protection for their families — by taking the guns away only from those who cannot afford paid protection."We are told that wanting the same technology that the criminals and our elites are protected by for themselves is a form of absolutism," Mr. LaPierre said. "Barack Obama is saying that the only principled way of making children safe" is making other people less safe, he said.
BECKLEY, W.Va. — Talk of stricter gun control has stirred up a lot of unease here, a place where hunters vie for top prize (a 26-inch LED television) in the Big Buck Photo Contest, and ads for a gun-simulator game ask, "Feel like shooting something today?"But before Senator Joe Manchin III invited a group of 15 businessmen and community leaders to lunch last week to discuss the topic, he had only a vague idea of how anxious many of his supporters were."How many of you all believe that there is a movement to take away the Second Amendment?" he asked.About half the hands in the room went up.Despite his best attempts to reassure them — "I see no movement, no talk, no bills, no nothing" — they remained skeptical. "We give up our rights one piece at a time," a banker named Charlie Houck told the senator.If there is a path to new gun laws, it has to come through West Virginia and a dozen other states with Democratic senators like Mr. Manchin who are confronting galvanized constituencies that view any effort to tighten gun laws as an infringement.As Congress considers what, if any, laws to change, Mr. Manchin has become a barometer among his colleagues, testing just how far they might be able to go without angering voters.On Thursday a group of Democratic senators led by Dianne Feinstein of California plans to introduce a bill that would outlaw more than 100 different assault weapons, setting up what promises to be a fraught and divisive debate over gun control in Congress in the coming weeks. But a number of centrist lawmakers like Mr. Manchin have already thrown the measure's fate into question, saying that all they are willing to support for now is a stronger background check system.As a hunter with an A rating from the National Rifle Association, Mr. Manchin gave advocates for new weapons laws reason for optimism after he said last month that gun firepower and magazine capacity might need to be limited.But now, Mr. Manchin, who affirmed his support for gun rights by running a campaign commercial in 2010 showing him firing a rifle into an environmental bill, says he is not so sure. One of his local offices has been picketed, and even some of his most thoughtful supporters are cautioning him that stronger background checks are about all the gun control they can stomach.And on the afternoon the 15 residents met with Mr. Manchin in the conference room of a local arts center, they told him that going after guns and ammunition capacity would be much like banning box cutters after the Sept. 11 attacks, or limiting whiskey and six-pack sales to cure alcoholism."It takes about a second and a half to change a clip," said Frank Jezioro, a former special agent with the Office of Naval Intelligence and now director of the state Division of Natural Resources.Mr. Jezioro likened gunmen in mass shootings to suicide bombers: they will always find a way. "A guy can walk through this door right here with your Beretta five-shot automatic, and cut the barrel off at 16 inches, and put five double-ought buckshots in there and kill everybody in here in a matter of seconds," he said. "And you don't have to aim it."As it happened, there were at least two guns in the room. One was on the hip of a Beckley police detective who was invited to the lunch, the other at the side of the West Virginia state trooper who stood guard at the door.Others at the lunch said that laws did little to help even the most violent societies. "Mexico, for instance, has got some of the strictest gun control laws in North America," said Rick Johnson, the owner of a river expedition company. "They'll put you in jail for a bullet in Mexico. And look how well it's worked.""I can take my A.R.," Mr. Johnson said, referring to his assault rifle, "load it, put one in the chamber and throw it up on this table, and the only way it's going to hurt anybody is if I miss and hit someone in the head. The gun doesn't hurt anybody. It's the person pulling the trigger."After talking with the group for nearly two hours, Mr. Manchin left the meeting saying he was not at all comfortable with supporting the assault weapons ban favored by many of his colleagues in Congress.
WASHINGTON — During a lengthy and at times emotionally wrenching news conference, Senator Dianne Feinstein of California on Thursday announced legislation that would ban the sale and manufacture of 157 types of semiautomatic weapons, as well as magazines holding more than 10 rounds of ammunition.The bill, which Ms. Feinstein introduced in the Senate later in the afternoon, would exempt firearms used for hunting and would grandfather in certain guns and magazines. The goal of the bill, she said, is "to dry up the supply of these weapons over time."Surrounded by victims of gun violence, colleagues in the Senate and House and several law enforcement officials, and standing near pegboards with several large guns attached, Ms. Feinstein acknowledged the difficulty in pursuing such legislation, even when harnessing the shock and grief over the shooting of 20 schoolchildren in Newtown, Conn., last month. "This is really an uphill road," Ms. Feinstein said.Since the expiration of a ban on assault weapons in 2004, lawmakers have been deeply reluctant to revisit the issue. They cite both a lack of evidence that the ban was effective and a fear of the gun lobby, which has made significant inroads at the state and federal levels over the past decade in increasing gun rights.Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, recently said that he was skeptical about the bill. Ms. Feinstein immediately called him to express her displeasure with his remarks.Many lawmakers, including some Democrats, prefer more modest measures to curb gun violence, like enhanced background checks of gun buyers or better enforcement of existing laws.One such measure has been introduced by Senator Patrick J. Leahy, Democrat of Vermont and chairman of the Senate Judiciary Committee, who will begin hearings next week on gun violence. Among the witnesses will be Wayne LaPierre, the chief executive of the National Rifle Association."Senator Feinstein has been trying to ban guns from law-abiding citizens for decades," said Andrew Arulanandam, a spokesman for Mr. LaPierre. "It's disappointing but not surprising that she is once again focused on curtailing the Constitution instead of prosecuting criminals or fixing our broken mental health system."More legislation is expected to arise over the next week or two, and some of it will have bipartisan support. Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, and Senator Mark Kirk, Republican of Illinois, have agreed to work together on gun trafficking legislation that would seek to crack down on illegal guns. Currently, federal law does not define gun trafficking as a crime.Mr. Kirk is also working on a background check proposal with Senator Joe Manchin III, Democrat of West Virginia, who is considered somewhat of a bellwether among Democrats with strong gun-rights records.Mr. Leahy's bill would give law enforcement officials more tools to investigate so-called straw purchasing of guns, in which people buy a firearm for others who are prohibited from obtaining one on their own.Ms. Feinstein was joined on Thursday by several other lawmakers, including Representative Carolyn McCarthy of New York, who will introduce companion legislation in the House, and Senator Richard Blumenthal of Connecticut, who emotionally recalled the day when the children and adults were gunned down in Newtown. "I will never forget the sight and the sounds of parents that day," he said. Several gun violence victims, relatives of those killed and others gave brief statements of support for the bill.Ms. Feinstein's bill — which, unlike the 1994 assault weapons ban, would not expire after being enacted — would also ban certain characteristics of guns that make them more lethal. More than 900 models of guns would be exempt for hunting and sporting.Such a measure is vehemently opposed by the N.R.A. and many Republican lawmakers, as well as some Democrats. "I don't think you should have restrictions on clips," said Senator Tom Coburn of Oklahoma, who has said he welcomes a Senate debate on guns. "The Second Amendment wasn't written so you can go hunting, it was to create a force to balance a tyrannical force here."Proponents of the ban argue that in spite of claims to the contrary, the 1994 measure, of which Ms. Feinstein was a chief sponsor, helped curb gun violence. "The original bill, though flawed, had a definite impact on the number of these weapons faced by the police on streets and used in crimes," said Adam Eisgrau, who helped write the 1994 ban while serving as Judiciary Committee counsel to Ms. Feinstein. The new bill, with more explicit language on the types of features on banned weapons, "is far more respectful of firearms for recreation uses," he said.Bans on assault weapons and high-capacity magazines were among the proposals unveiled by President Obama and Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. last week. Mr. Biden took the campaign for tougher gun laws to the Internet on Thursday in an online video chat that was part of an effort by the White House to build public support for its guns package. Mr. Biden, who developed the plans embraced by Mr. Obama, will host a round-table event in Richmond, Va., on Friday, and officials have said that Mr. Obama will travel at some point to promote the package.
Threatened by long-term declining participation in shooting sports, the firearms industry has poured millions of dollars into a broad campaign to ensure its future by getting guns into the hands of more, and younger, children.The industry's strategies include giving firearms, ammunition and cash to youth groups; weakening state restrictions on hunting by young children; marketing an affordable military-style rifle for "junior shooters" and sponsoring semiautomatic-handgun competitions for youths; and developing a target-shooting video game that promotes brand-name weapons, with links to the Web sites of their makers.The pages of Junior Shooters, an industry-supported magazine that seeks to get children involved in the recreational use of firearms, once featured a smiling 15-year-old girl clutching a semiautomatic rifle. At the end of an accompanying article that extolled target shooting with a Bushmaster AR-15 — an advertisement elsewhere in the magazine directed readers to a coupon for buying one — the author encouraged youngsters to share the article with a parent."Who knows?" it said. "Maybe you'll find a Bushmaster AR-15 under your tree some frosty Christmas morning!"The industry's youth-marketing effort is backed by extensive social research and is carried out by an array of nonprofit groups financed by the gun industry, an examination by The New York Times found. The campaign picked up steam about five years ago with the completion of a major study that urged a stronger emphasis on the "recruitment and retention" of new hunters and target shooters.The overall objective was summed up in another study, commissioned last year by the shooting sports industry, that suggested encouraging children experienced in firearms to recruit other young people. The report, which focused on children ages 8 to 17, said these "peer ambassadors" should help introduce wary youngsters to guns slowly, perhaps through paintball, archery or some other less intimidating activity."The point should be to get newcomers started shooting something, with the natural next step being a move toward actual firearms," said the report, which was prepared for the National Shooting Sports Foundation and the Hunting Heritage Trust.Firearms manufacturers and their two primary surrogates, the National Rifle Association of America and the National Shooting Sports Foundation, have long been associated with high-profile battles to fend off efforts at gun control and to widen access to firearms. The public debate over the mass shootings in Newtown, Conn., and elsewhere has focused largely on the availability of guns, along with mental illness and the influence of violent video games.Little attention has been paid, though, to the industry's youth-marketing initiatives. They stir passionate views, with proponents arguing that introducing children to guns can provide a safe and healthy pastime, and critics countering that it fosters a corrosive gun culture and is potentially dangerous.The N.R.A. has for decades given grants for youth shooting programs, mostly to Boy Scout councils and 4-H groups, which traditionally involved single-shot rimfire rifles, BB guns and archery. Its $21 million in total grants in 2010 was nearly double what it gave out five years earlier.Newer initiatives by other organizations go further, seeking to introduce children to high-powered rifles and handguns while invoking the same rationale of those older, more traditional programs: that firearms can teach "life skills" like responsibility, ethics and citizenship. And the gun industry points to injury statistics that it says show a greater likelihood of getting hurt cheerleading or playing softball than using firearms for fun and sport.Still, some experts in child psychiatry say that encouraging youthful exposure to guns, even in a structured setting with an emphasis on safety, is asking for trouble. Dr. Jess P. Shatkin, the director of undergraduate studies in child and adolescent mental health at New York University, said that young people are naturally impulsive and that their brains "are engineered to take risks," making them ill suited for handling guns."There are lots of ways to teach responsibility to a kid," Dr. Shatkin said. "You don't need a gun to do it."
NEWPORT, N.H. — When the New Hampshire Association of Chiefs of Police was looking to raise money for an annual cadet training program, it sold raffle tickets for $30 apiece. The drawing was scheduled for May, but by Jan. 12 all 1,000 tickets had been sold.The prize: 31 guns, with a new winner drawn each day of the month.The fund-raiser, sponsored by the association in partnership with two New Hampshire gun makers, Sig Sauer and Sturm, Ruger & Company, has prompted a chorus of protests from lawmakers and gun-control advocates questioning why the police are giving away guns, even in the name of a good cause.Some in law enforcement have also raised questions. When Chief Nicholas J. Giaccone Jr. of Hanover pulled up information about the raffle on the Internet, he said, he was flabbergasted."I looked at the first weapon and Googled that one," said Chief Giaccone, who recalled using an expletive when he pulled up information about the Ruger SR-556C, a semiautomatic weapon. "It's an assault rifle."In a letter to the editor of The Eagle-Tribune, which covers southern New Hampshire, Richard J. O'Shaughnessy of Salem wrote, "People who should know better are adding to the glorification of the gun culture in this state."And referring to the shootings last month at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Connecticut, State Representative Sharon L. Nordgren, a Hanover Democrat, said, "They're just the same kind that were used in Newtown."The Ruger that caught Chief Giaccone's attention is an AR-15-style rifle, which is the most popular style of gun in America, according to dealers, and was the type used by Adam Lanza to kill 20 children and six adults at the elementary school. Another gun in the raffle, the Sig Sauer P226 handgun, was also carried by Mr. Lanza, according to the Connecticut State Police."It's just ironic that that would be their choice of the kind of gun that they're raffling," Ms. Nordgren said.Organizers of the raffle are standing firm. In a statement released this month, Chief Paul T. Donovan of Salem, the president of the association, defended the fund-raiser, saying that all winners would be required to meet all applicable rules for gun ownership."While this raffle falls on the heels of the recent tragedy in Newtown, Conn., the New Hampshire Association of Chiefs of Police extends their deepest sympathies to the families and first responders," Chief Donovan wrote. "New Hampshire Chiefs of Police feel the issues with these tragic shootings are ones that are contrary to lawful and responsible gun ownership."The proceeds from the raffle go toward a cadet program involving participants ages 14 to 20 who are given instructions in various kinds of police skills and procedures. Some of them go on to pursue careers in law enforcement.The guns will be distributed through another raffle partner, Rody's Gun Shop, a windowless outpost here in Newport, a town that comes to life when employees of Ruger, which is one of its main employers, leave work for the day."Around here, most people are into guns," said Michael Gaffney, an employee of a nearby hardware store who won a rifle in a raffle years ago. "You get a chance to win a free gun! It's like any raffle, very much akin to trailer raffles, snowmobile raffles or turkey raffles."On a recent weeknight, the Rody's parking lot was filled with idling cars, their occupants waiting for the store to open at 6 o'clock. The store filled up immediately. Customers, some with their children in tow, browsed the shotguns and rifles on the walls and discussed the possibility of gun bans. While the shop's owner would not comment on the raffle, his customers were nonchalant."Honestly, I don't see what the big deal is — they're just talking about it because of Sandy Hook," said Lorraine Peterson of Litchfield. "I don't mean to sound insensitive. This is New Hampshire. This is a sport."Gun raffles are business as usual here and in many other parts of the country — frequently used by hunting clubs and sometimes by athletics booster clubs to raise money and anchor galas."We host raffles like this all the time," said Richard Olson Jr., the president of the New Hampshire Wildlife Federation and the Londonderry Fish and Game Club. "Anybody that's speaking up is using the Newtown massacre as a pretext to poke at the issue negatively."Mr. Olson said that he once planned a gun raffle to raise money for a fishing derby and that he was considering using one to raise money for the wildlife federation's conservation efforts on New England cottontail rabbits.Shifting economic and political conditions have spread gun raffles to other spheres, too. Josh Harms, a Republican state representative in Illinois, intends to raffle three guns in March to raise money for his campaign treasury.Greg Hay, a firefighter from Quincy, Ill., said his union decided last January to hold a gun raffle to replenish its accounts after a drawn-out arbitration. He said the sluggish economy had limited fund-raising from the union's annual country music concert."We didn't really want to have any more assessments, so we needed to start looking at better moneymakers," said Mr. Hay, who expects the union, Quincy Firefighters Local 63, to take home about $25,000 from the raffle, which started last June and awards one gun per week for a year.The fund-raiser has been so successful that the union had planned to sponsor a second one until a recent increase in gun prices — fueled by increased demand amid fears of gun bans in the wake of the Newtown shooting — made the effort less promising."Maybe we'll hold off until gun prices go down and start to go back to a decent level," Mr. Hay said.Opponents of the raffle in New Hampshire are quick to say it is not the guns they oppose, but the fact that the police are conducting it."I think in some respects it shows the wrong message," said State Representative Stephen Shurtleff, Democrat of Merrimack. "For law enforcement, normally they're dealing with firearms in a negative way. For that reason, it's just not an appropriate thing. We're trying to get guns off the street."
CHICAGO — Not a single gun shop can be found in this city because they are outlawed. Handguns were banned in Chicago for decades, too, until 2010, when the United States Supreme Court ruled that was going too far, leading city leaders to settle for restrictions some describe as the closest they could get legally to a ban without a ban. Despite a continuing legal fight, Illinois remains the only state in the nation with no provision to let private citizens carry guns in public.And yet Chicago, a city with no civilian gun ranges and bans on both assault weapons and high-capacity magazines, finds itself laboring to stem a flood of gun violence that contributed to more than 500 homicides last year and at least 40 killings already in 2013, including a fatal shooting of a 15-year-old girl on Tuesday.To gun rights advocates, the city provides stark evidence that even some of the toughest restrictions fail to make places safer. "The gun laws in Chicago only restrict the law-abiding citizens and they've essentially made the citizens prey," said Richard A. Pearson, executive director of the Illinois State Rifle Association. To gun control proponents, the struggles here underscore the opposite — a need for strict, uniform national gun laws to eliminate the current patchwork of state and local rules that allow guns to flow into this city from outside."Chicago is like a house with two parents that may try to have good rules and do what they can, but it's like you've got this single house sitting on a whole block where there's anarchy," said the Rev. Ira J. Acree, one among a group of pastors here who have marched and gathered signatures for an end to so much shooting. "Chicago is an argument for laws that are statewide or, better yet, national."Chicago's experience reveals the complications inherent in carrying out local gun laws around the nation. Less restrictive laws in neighboring communities and states not only make guns easy to obtain nearby, but layers of differing laws — local and state — make it difficult to police violations. And though many describe the local and state gun laws here as relatively stringent, penalties for violating them — from jail time to fines — have not proven as severe as they are in some other places, reducing the incentive to comply.Lately, the police say they are discovering far more guns on the streets of Chicago than in the nation's two more populous cities, Los Angeles and New York. They seized 7,400 guns here in crimes or unpermitted uses last year (compared with 3,285 in New York City), and have confiscated 574 guns just since Jan. 1 — 124 of them last week alone.More than a quarter of the firearms seized on the streets here by the Chicago Police Department over the past five years were bought just outside city limits in Cook County suburbs, according to an analysis by the University of Chicago Crime Lab. Others came from stores around Illinois and from other states, like Indiana, less than an hour's drive away. Since 2008, more than 1,300 of the confiscated guns, the analysis showed, were bought from just one store, Chuck's Gun Shop in Riverdale, Ill., within a few miles of Chicago's city limits.Efforts to compare the strictness of gun laws and the level of violence across major American cities are fraught with contradiction and complication, not least because of varying degrees of coordination between local and state laws and differing levels of enforcement. In New York City, where homicides and shootings have decreased, the gun laws are generally seen as at least as strict as Chicago's, and the state laws in New York and many of its neighboring states are viewed as still tougher than those in and around Illinois. Philadelphia, like cities in many states, is limited in writing gun measures that go beyond those set by Pennsylvania law. Some city officials there have chafed under what they see as relatively lax state controls.In Chicago, the rules for owning a handgun — rewritten after the outright ban was deemed too restrictive in 2010 — sound arduous. Owners must seek a Chicago firearms permit, which requires firearms training, a background check and a state-mandated firearm owner's identification card, which requires a different background review for felonies and mental illness. To prevent straw buyers from selling or giving their weapons to people who would not meet the restrictions — girlfriends buying guns for gang members is a common problem, the police here say — the city requires permitted gun owners to report their weapons lost, sold or stolen.Still, for all the regulations, the reality here looks different. Some 7,640 people currently hold a firearms permit, but nearly that many illicit weapons were confiscated from the city's streets during last year alone. Chicago officials say Illinois has no requirement, comparable to Chicago's, that gun owners immediately report their lost or stolen weapons to deter straw buyers. Consequently those outside the city can, in the words of one city official, carry guns to gang members in the city with "zero accountability."
WASHINGTON — The universe of potential changes to federal gun laws seemed to shrink Wednesday during an occasionally tense Senate hearing on gun violence as lawmakers and proponents of more gun rules tussled with gun rights advocates over the availability of some types of weapons and ammunition. In the end, chances for a ban on assault weapons dimmed, and compromise seemed elusive.The hearing, the first held by the Senate Judiciary Committee since the mass shooting last month at a Newtown, Conn., school, began on a poignant note as former Representative Gabrielle Giffords, who was critically injured in a 2011 shooting, addressed the committee slowly but with passion, essentially begging panel members to come up with legislation to address gun violence."Too many children are dying," she said to a packed, hushed hearing room. "Too many children."After Ms. Giffords's brief testimony, the four-hour hearing quickly devolved into a litany of competing statistics and chilling anecdotes, laying bare the deep national divide between those who believe gun availability contributes to the nation's most violent crimes and those who think it helps prevent them.Wayne LaPierre, the chief executive of the National Rifle Association, spoke ruefully of the many years he has spent trotting to Capitol Hill to testify about gun violence, and grew irritated under the questions of friend (Senator Ted Cruz of Texas, a vocal supporter of gun rights) and foe (Senator Richard J. Durbin of Illinois, where an honor student in Chicago was fatally shot hours before the hearing).Mr. LaPierre said he did not support the measure that appeared to be gaining the most support among both parties — enhanced background checks for gun buyers — raising the prospect that perhaps even modest changes to gun laws would be hard to accomplish. "Universal background check, which sounds, whatever," he said, "ends up being a universal federal nightmare imposed upon law-abiding people all over this country.Mr. LaPierre's strong defense of existing gun laws, which he argued were poorly enforced, and his occasional pique were a contrast with Ms. Giffords's husband, Mark Kelly, a gun-owning former Navy captain and a retired astronaut, who quietly pulled, bit by bit, at the arguments against stronger background checks, which he and Ms. Giffords seek."I've been shot at dozens of times," Mr. Kelly said. "I would suspect that not many members of this panel, or even in this room, for that matter, have been in any kind of a firefight. It is — it is chaos. I think there are really some very effective things we can do. And one is, Senator, the background check. Let's make it difficult for the criminals, the terrorists, and the mentally ill to get a gun."The greatest area of disagreement centered around the availability of so-called assault weapons, which some Democratic senators seek to ban, and restrictions of large-size magazines, which several Republican senators and their witnesses argued would endanger potential victims of crime and infringe on the rights of law-abiding Americans.Ms. Giffords, who made her way through the hearing room slowly, passing by several senators to bid them hello and give them a kiss, sat next to her husband and slowly began her remarks."This is an important conversation for our children, for our communities," Ms. Giffords said. "For Democrats and Republicans. Speaking is difficult, but I need to say something important. Violence is a big problem," she continued. "We must do something. It will be hard. But the time is now," she said, emphasizing the last word. "You must act. Be bold. Be courageous. Americans are counting on you."With that, Ms. Giffords made her way quietly out of the room.Senator Patrick J. Leahy, Democrat of Vermont and chairman of the committee, began by noting that "the Second Amendment is secure and will remain secure and protected," adding, "Americans have the right to self-defense and to have guns in their homes to protect their families."Mr. Leahy, who has a record of supporting measures like an assault weapons ban but also of defending the rights of gun owners in his largely rural state, said: "No one can or will take those rights or our guns away," and added: "But lives are at risk when responsible people fail to stand up for laws that will keep guns out of the hands of those who will use them to commit mass murder. I ask that we focus our discussion on additional statutory measures to better protect our children and all Americans."Mr. Leahy promoted his own bill that would give law enforcement officials more tools to investigate so-called straw purchasing of guns, in which people buy firearms for others. But he did not push for a ban on assault weapons, and except for Senator Dianne Feinstein of California, who has her own bill in which a ban renewal is central, most people's comments focused on background checks and mental health provisions to prevent the wrong people from obtaining guns.Senator Charles E. Grassley, Republican of Iowa, set the tone for gun-rights advocates by noting that while the tragedy of Newtown has shocked and rattled the nation, the events should not "be used to put forward every gun-control measure that has been floating around for years."The hearing took some turns into gender and class politics, as Mr. LaPierre suggested that armed security details were the purview of the wealthy and the well connected, leaving regular Americans in peril."If you're in the elite, you get bodyguards," he said, adding, "Criminals don't obey the law anyway." He also said that to the hard-working American "we're going to say you can have a bolt-action rifle, but you can't have an AR-15."While advocates of more gun control tugged at emotions with anecdotes of random gun violence, one witness, Gayle Trotter, a senior fellow at the conservative Independent Women's Forum, argued for female gun ownership, citing the case of women protecting their children against an intruder. "An assault weapon in the hands of a young woman defending her babies in her home becomes a defense weapon," she said.
DENVER — The same day that President Obama unveiled his plan to address gun violence, the sheriff of Larimer County, Justin Smith, took to his personal Facebook page.In an impassioned post, Sheriff Smith, whose jurisdiction includes a swath of suburbia and farmland north of Denver, railed against universal background checks and wrote of the need to defend the Second Amendment."As Sheriff, I will not enforce unconstitutional federal laws," he wrote.Over the past several weeks, dozens of other sheriffs from across the country have reacted with similar public opposition to Mr. Obama's call for stiffer gun laws, releasing a deluge of letters, position papers and statements laying out their arguments in stark terms. Their jurisdictions largely include rural areas, and stand in sharp contrast to those of urban police chiefs, who have historically supported tougher gun regulations."I don't plan on helping or assisting with any of the federal gun laws because I have the U.S. Supreme Court and the U.S. Constitution on my side," said Sheriff John Cooke of Weld County, Colo. Sheriff Cooke said that he believed a ban on assault weapons would do little and that universal background checks would unfairly halt private gun sales."Let the federal government do their own dirty work," he added.Last week the County Sheriffs of Colorado, which represents the state's 64 sheriffs, released a position paper expressing the group's opposition to gun regulation — including bans on assault weapons and high-capacity magazines, and the mandate of a statewide database for concealed carry permit holders. The group said it was more important to focus on improving mental health care to prevent mass shootings.The Utah Sheriffs' Association outlined an even stronger sentiment in a recent letter to Mr. Obama stating that no federal official would be permitted to take away its constituents' Second Amendment rights.The sheriffs said they were "prepared to trade our lives" to preserve a traditional interpretation of the Constitution.Sheriffs across a range of counties in Arizona, Kentucky, Oregon and other states have also weighed in publicly, suggesting they, too, would refuse to enforce gun laws they felt violated the Second Amendment.Last week in Wisconsin, Sheriff David A. Clarke Jr. of Milwaukee County released a public service announcement urging citizens to arm themselves, saying that waiting for the police was no longer the best option."You can beg for mercy from a violent criminal, hide under the bed or you can fight back," Sheriff Clarke said in the recording.The fervent opposition to gun control has caught the National Sheriffs' Association, the primary industry group for more than 3,000 sheriffs, off guard.This week, the group met to clarify its own stance on new gun proposals, which a spokesman said it would release Friday."What you really have is a lot of citizens with a lot of mistrust of the government's efforts regarding firearms," said its president, Sheriff Larry Amerson of Calhoun County, Ala. "They don't feel safe, and the sheriffs are reacting to that."He added: "But I will tell you that there is a mix. I have talked to sheriffs who say they don't have a problem with passing a gun ban of any particular type."Sheriff Amerson noted that unlike police chiefs, sheriffs were almost all elected officials and had to answer to their constituents. They were also more likely to work in rural areas, he said, where opposition to new gun regulations was stronger.Chuck Wexler, executive director of the Police Executive Research Forum, which generally supports changes in gun laws, said that because sheriffs are often in charge of local jails and deal with mentally ill inmates, they were also more likely to view mental health as the most pressing concern.Mr. Wexler, whose group researches law enforcement issues in major cities, said urban police chiefs had long been more receptive to gun control measures because they handled gun crime on an everyday basis."What sheriffs see, in terms of gun violence, is not necessarily what police chiefs in Philadelphia or Chicago or a more suburban place like Aurora see," he said. "Their constituents tend to see gun crime differently as well."
In their fervor to take action against gun violence after the shooting in Newtown , Conn., a growing number of state and national politicians are promoting a focus on mental illness as a way to help prevent further killings.Legislation to revise existing mental health laws is under consideration in at least a half-dozen states, including Colorado, Oregon and Ohio. A New York bill requiring mental health practitioners to warn the authorities about potentially dangerous patients was signed into law on Jan. 15. In Washington, President Obama has ordered "a national dialogue" on mental health, and a variety of bills addressing mental health issues are percolating on Capitol Hill.But critics say that this focus unfairly singles out people with serious mental illness, who studies indicate are involved in only about 4 percent of violent crimes and are 11 or more times as likely than the general population to be the victims of violent crime.And many proposals — they include strengthening mental health services, lowering the threshold for involuntary commitment and increasing requirements for reporting worrisome patients to the authorities — are rushed in execution and unlikely to repair a broken mental health system, some experts say."Good intentions without thought make for bad laws, and I think we have a risk of that," said J. Reid Meloy, a forensic psychologist and clinical professor at the University of California, San Diego, who has studied rampage killers.Moreover, the push for additional mental health laws is often driven by political expediency, some critics say. Mental health proposals draw support from both Democrats and Republicans, in part because, unlike bans on semiautomatic weapons or high-capacity magazines — like the one proposed in the Senate last week — they do not involve confrontation with gun rights groups like the National Rifle Association."The N.R.A. is far more formidable as a political foe than the advocacy groups for the mentally ill," said Dr. Jeffrey A. Lieberman, chairman of psychiatry at Columbia University and president-elect of the American Psychiatric Association.Indeed, the N.R.A. itself, in response to the massacre in Newtown, argued that mental illness, and not the guns themselves, was at the root of recent shooting sprees. The group called for a national registry of people with mental illness — an alternative that legal experts agree would raise at least as many constitutional alarms as the banning of gun ownership.For mental health groups, the proposals under consideration are tantalizing: By increasing services for those with mental illness, they raise the possibility of restoring some of the billions of dollars cut from mental health programs in recent years as budgets tightened in the financial downturn. The measures also hold out hope for improvement of a mental health system that many experts say is fragmented and drastically inadequate. And some proposals — those to revise commitment laws, for example — have the support of some mental health organizations.But some mental health and legal experts say that politicians' efforts might be better spent making the process of involuntary psychiatric commitment — and the criteria for restricting firearms access once someone has been forcibly committed — consistent from state to state. And some proposals have caused concern, raising questions about doctor-patient confidentiality, the rights of people with psychiatric disabilities and the integrity of clinical judgment.Especially troublesome to some mental health advocates are provisions like New York's, which expand the duty of practitioners to report worrisome patients — a model likely to be emulated by other states. New York's law, part of a comprehensive package to address gun violence, requires reporting to the local authorities any patient "likely to engage in conduct that would result in serious harm to self or others." Law enforcement officials would then be authorized to confiscate any firearm owned by such a patient.John Monahan, a psychologist and professor of law at the University of Virginia, said that such laws are often superfluous.
WASHINGTON — When President Obama mentioned last week that he had picked up a new hobby — skeet shooting at Camp David — it was a surprising disclosure by a president whose main identification with guns these days is his effort to ban assault rifles and high-capacity magazines.To some, Mr. Obama's newfound enthusiasm for shooting clay pigeons — he said in an interview that he did it "all the time" at the presidential retreat — also seemed a bit suspicious.So on Saturday, the White House tried to silence the skeptics by releasing a photograph of Mr. Obama shooting on the range at Camp David in August. The president, wearing protective glasses and ear-muffs, is squinting down the barrel of a shotgun moments after pulling the trigger. Smoke is shooting from the front of the gun.The White House said the photo was taken on Aug. 4, Mr. Obama's 51st birthday. But it offered no further details on whether his target practice was a regular hobby or a one-time event.The notion of the president taking aim at targets flung into the air captivated some in the political and social media worlds at a time when he is pushing Congress to enact sweeping restrictions on high-capacity rifles and magazines.Conservatives scoffed, comics mocked, a congresswoman challenged him to a skeet-shooting contest, a fake picture of an armed Mr. Obama circulated on the Internet, and the White House tried to make the whole matter go away."It was a surprise to a lot of people in the industry when we saw that and heard that," said Michael Hampton Jr., the executive director of the National Skeet Shooting Association, whose 35,000 members do not include the president.Mr. Obama is hardly the first politician to draw scorn for boasting of experience with guns. In 2007, during his first presidential campaign, former Gov. Mitt Romney of Massachusetts was ridiculed when he said, "I've always been a rodent and rabbit hunter — small varmints, if you will." In 2004, John Kerry, then a presidential candidate and now secretary of state, was lampooned for showing up in camouflage to go hunting less than two weeks before the election.The latest commotion has its origins in the interview Mr. Obama gave to The New Republic, now owned by Chris Hughes, a Facebook co-founder and former Obama campaign aide. In the interview, Franklin Foer, the magazine's editor, referred to the fight over gun control and asked if the president had ever fired a gun."Yes, in fact, up at Camp David, we do skeet shooting all the time," Mr. Obama said."Not the girls," he said, "but oftentimes guests of mine go up there. And I have a profound respect for the traditions of hunting that trace back in this country for generations. And I think those who dismiss that out of hand make a big mistake."Mr. Obama went on to say that the reality of guns in urban areas differs from that in rural areas. "So it's trying to bridge those gaps that I think is going to be part of the biggest task over the next several months," he said. "And that means that advocates of gun control have to do a little more listening than they do sometimes."The skeet-shooting comment caught many off guard because it is not something the president has talked about. While other presidents have used the skeet-shooting range at Camp David, database searches of Mr. Obama's speeches and interviews turned up no mention of participating."I would refer you simply to his comments," Jay Carney, the White House press secretary, told reporters who asked after the interview was published how often the president shoots. "I don't know how often. He does go to Camp David with some regularity, but I'm not sure how often he's done that."Asked why no one had seen a picture or heard about it before, Mr. Carney said, "Because when he goes to Camp David, he goes to spend time with his family and friends and relax, not to produce photographs."
Although the debate over curbing gun violence after the massacre in Newtown , Conn., is breaking down mostly along partisan lines in the nation's statehouses — with several Democratic governors calling for stricter gun laws and most Republicans urging tighter security or revamped mental health policies — the handful of exceptions show the political and geographical complexities of the issue.More than a dozen governors invoked the Newtown school shooting in their State of the State addresses in recent weeks, and most have weighed in on the shooting in other forums.Several Democratic governors, mainly along the East Coast, are calling for banning some semiautomatic weapons or large-capacity magazines, while several Republican governors have pressed for other measures, noting their opposition to more restrictive gun laws.But the state-level debate has not always followed party lines.Gov. Chris Christie of New Jersey, a Republican who is mentioned as a possible presidential candidate, recently noted that he had long supported his state's laws, which he described as "some of the toughest gun-control measures in place in the country."Gov. Mark Dayton of Minnesota, a Democrat, was quoted after the shooting as saying that his "reading of the Constitution is that it provides a complete permission for any law-abiding citizen to possess firearms, whichever ones he or she chooses, and the ammunition to go with that."Another Democrat, Gov. Mike Beebe of Arkansas, is likely to sign a bill working its way through the Republican-controlled legislature that would allow people to take concealed handguns into churches that choose to allow them.But a more traditional party-line approach is being taken elsewhere. Democratic governors in Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Maryland and Massachusetts are among those calling for stricter gun laws, and Gov. Andrew M. Cuomo of New York has already won the passage of sweeping gun measures since the Newtown shooting."Who can watch the sad images of the last several weeks, who can see the pictures of those young faces, and honestly say that we are doing enough?" Gov. Martin O'Malley of Maryland, a Democrat, asked in his State of the State address last week. Mr. O'Malley urged state lawmakers to ban the sale of "military-style assault weapons," require licenses for buying handguns, bolster mental health treatment and information sharing, and spend more on school security.Gov. Mike Pence of Indiana, a Republican who took office this year, said in his speech that he would seek additional money in the state budget for "a comprehensive school safety review," but he made it clear that he would oppose limiting access to guns."All of us were heartbroken after every parent's worst nightmare unfolded in Newtown, Conn.," said Mr. Pence, a former congressman. "While others have rushed to the well-worn arguments over gun control, Hoosiers know this is not about access to firearms. It is about access to schools. Hoosiers have responsibilities to protect our kids, and Hoosiers have rights. We will protect our kids, and we will protect our rights."On the federal level, the Obama administration's push for stronger gun laws faces tough opposition in the Republican-controlled House and garnered a muted reaction even from the Senate's top Democrat.Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, in an appearance Sunday on ABC's "This Week," said, "I want to get something done on guns." But on specific measures, his language was guarded.He noted that he had opposed the 1994 ban on assault weapons but would consider one now. On restricting high-capacity magazines, he said, "I think that's something we definitely have to take a look at." Regarding universal background checks, he said, "Yeah, we need to increase that."But as a gun owner himself, Mr. Reid said he would not allow the influence of the National Rifle Association to prevent the Senate from acting.As a polarized Washington debates President Obama's proposals, the state-level debate is also unfolding at an unusually partisan moment, with more states controlled by just one party than at any time in the past six decades. Republicans have the upper hand, holding the governor's office and legislative majorities in 24 states, while the Democrats control both the executive and legislative branches in just 13 states. The stark divide can be seen in many of the bills being weighed in states this year.In Tennessee, which is controlled by Republicans, lawmakers have introduced bills that would allow school employees to carry guns, let people keep guns and ammunition locked in their cars in public and private parking lots, and bar state money from being used to enforce any new federal law or executive order that "imposes restrictions on citizens who lawfully possess or carry firearms in this state."In heavily Democratic Massachusetts, Gov. Deval Patrick is calling for legislation to ban magazines containing more than seven rounds, require background checks for private gun sales and limit people to buying one gun a month. In his address to lawmakers, he said the proposals would "help stop tragedies like Newtown or the recent shooting of a 13-year-old boy in Roxbury on his way to choir practice."Most Republicans said they had drawn other lessons from the Newtown shooting. Gov. Jan Brewer of Arizona, a Republican, said in her speech that "the massacre at Sandy Hook Elementary was unimaginable" but rejected calls for stricter gun laws."Arizonans have reduced crime by punishing criminals, and not by infringing on the rights of law-abiding gun owners," she said.Ms. Brewer focused instead on school safety, saying her budget would call for more money for school resource officers to provide security. "Our job now is to take common-sense steps that lessen the likelihood of a similar tragedy striking Arizona — while resisting the urge to turn a school into a fortress," she said.Gov. C. L. Otter of Idaho alluded to the Newtown shooting in his address as he called for building a 579-bed mental health facility at a prison complex south of Boise."We all saw just a few weeks ago the terrible impact on a community and a nation when mental illness leads to tragedy," Mr. Otter said, echoing a commonly held belief, although the authorities have not described the mental state of Adam Lanza, the Newtown gunman, or said if he suffered from mental illness. Mr. Otter also ordered a review of school safety.Some Democratic governors have said they are holding out hope for a federal law. Gov. Peter Shumlin of Vermont, the chairman of the Democratic Governors Association who was endorsed last year by the National Rifle Association Political Victory Fund, has opposed taking action on gun laws at the state level but has said he supports Mr. Obama's recommendations.And Gov. Dannel P. Malloy of Connecticut, a Democrat who has said he would pursue measures on gun control, school safety and mental health in response to the shooting that killed 20 first graders and six educators in his state, said those issues must be addressed at the national level. "As long as weapons continue to travel up and down I-95," he told lawmakers, "what is available for sale in Florida or Virginia can have devastating consequences here in Connecticut."
BOISE, Idaho — Somewhere in America, supposedly, there is a debate about regulating guns. But it is hard to find here.In Idaho's graceful, striated-marble Capitol, home to one of the more ardent and adamant state legislatures in the nation in standing up for the Second Amendment, lawmakers from both parties say that a torrent of public passion, even panic, about new proposed federal gun rules is pushing in only one direction: toward more guns, not fewer.If Idahoans, like Americans in many states, have rushed to buy guns out of fear for personal safety in the aftermath of recent mass shootings, or out of fear of tighter legal controls, then democracy has already spoken, many lawmakers said. People have voted with their pocketbooks."Enable them to do what they believe is right," said State Senator Marv Hagedorn, a Republican who was designated to be his chamber's point man on proposed gun legislation in the session that began in January, describing what he sees as his mandate. "There's a huge call to all of us to protect the Second Amendment rights."Every level of government in every state is, without question, looking more closely at issues of public safety since the slaughter in Newtown, Conn., of 20 children and 6 adults in an elementary school in December. But in deeply conservative states like Idaho, where President Obama got less than 33 percent of the vote in November — one of his worst showings in the nation — the discussion of school safety is occurring behind a kind of Chinese wall, separate from the question of whether certain types of guns or high-capacity magazines are to blame.Some Democrats in the Republican-controlled Legislature are pushing for an expansion of mental health care spending this session — Idaho has one of the highest suicide rates in the nation, mostly by gun — but they are confronting, they said, the same torrent of fear and fury from constituents about a perceived threat from Washington to gun-owners' rights as their Republican colleagues.The Idaho Department of Education has also been meeting to talk through the new terrain of school safety, even as some districts have said that they may move ahead on their own in allowing teachers and administrators to be openly armed, as Idaho law already permits."We've heard all sorts of things," said Matt McCarter, who, as the department's director of student engagement and postsecondary readiness, is leading the safety evaluation. Beyond talk of more guns, for example, he said he had heard from districts that were talking about attack dogs, and one that was pondering a kind of box mounted to the ceiling that could be dropped to trap an intruder."I said, 'Does it come with a moat?'" Mr. McCarter said.Gov. C. L. Otter, who has asked for a report on school safety from the recently retired state police chief, said in an interview that allowing people the latitude to keep themselves and their local institutions safe — a sentiment as old as the American frontier, now revived with new political impetus — was the best way forward."For a long time, you couldn't carry a gun on an airplane — now the pilots do," Mr. Otter said. "The captain is in charge here. We've got to give him all the tools to make sure that he maintains control as he sees fit."Other authorities in other spheres of life, he added, have the same responsibilities as pilots. "The captains of the home are the parents. The captains of the schools are the people that run the schools. So, you know, I see a lot of similarities there."Consider another measure of the moment: the 7 a.m. information session on gun laws for lawmakers held by the Idaho Sheriff's Association recently in a Capitol basement meeting room. The House majority leader, Mike Moyle, sitting near the back, made the point, for example, that federal authorities were establishing a pattern of enforcing some laws and not others. In Washington and Colorado, where voters have approved legalizing the possession of small amounts of marijuana, he said, federal authorities are indicating a willingness to look the other way, even though marijuana possession remains a federal crime.Was it possible, Mr. Moyle asked, to keep new federal gun regulations from being enforced in Idaho? "If they're picking and choosing what they're going to enforce, does the state have any control on the other side, picking and choosing on what we're going to let them enforce?"Probably not, said the group's moderator, Mike Kane, a former prosecutor and now a lobbyist for the Sheriff's Association. "As much as I do understand the sentiment, there is no way that I know legally that would hold up," Mr. Kane said.The State House has also named Representative Judy Boyle, a Republican, to act as its leader on the gun issue this year. She and Mr. Hagedorn — the gun issue's point man in the Senate — have known each other for years, she said, through hunting clubs or their membership in the National Rifle Association. Before running for office, she volunteered for the N.R.A. to help pass the state's concealed weapons law in 1990. Republicans now have a 28-to-7 majority over Democrats in the Idaho Senate, and hold a 57-to-13 majority in the House.Ms. Boyle said one idea that intrigued her was encouraging more advanced weapons training for teachers or other school workers. Mr. Otter also mentioned a gun club in Utah that recently began offering weapons training to teachers. "Two hundred showed up," he said.Under current Idaho law, no concealed weapons are allowed in schools, but local school boards, at their discretion, can allow people to carry them openly. Being elected to any office in Idaho, from the county highway district commissioner up to the governor, automatically comes with a right to carry a concealed weapon. Mr. Otter said in an interview that he has chosen not to.The speaker of the House, Scott Bedke, a Republican, said that he would not guess what might come from the session, but that the will of the people was clear."Idaho will push back," he said, referring to federal gun control proposals. "A question that is rolling around in most Idahoan's heads right now is, What part of 'shall not be infringed' don't they get?"
MINNEAPOLIS — President Obama traveled to the nation's heartland on Monday to press his case for tougher national gun laws, even as he appeared to acknowledge that expanded background checks on gun sales were far more likely to pass Congress than a ban on military-style assault weapons.In a city once called "Murderapolis" for its homicide rate in the 1990s, the president cited successful gun-violence prevention efforts here as evidence that new national laws are needed to reduce the number of shootings across the country."The only way we can reduce gun violence in this country is if the American people decide it's important," Mr. Obama said, standing in front of a sea of police officers and sheriff's deputies at the Minneapolis Police Department Special Operations Center.Mr. Obama renewed his call for Congress to pass a series of measures, including a ban on the manufacture and sale of new assault weapons, limits on high-capacity magazines and an expansion of the criminal background check system that currently covers only about 60 percent of gun sales.But he openly demonstrated different expectations for the measures as Washington wages a bitterly divisive debate over the role of guns in society.The president declared "universal background checks" to be supported by a "vast majority of Americans" and called for their quick passage in Congress. "There's no reason why we can't get that done," he told the gathering of law enforcement officials.But of the potential for a new assault weapons ban, the president said only that it "deserves a vote in Congress because weapons of war have no place on our streets."On Monday, White House aides again said the president was still pushing for the three measures, along with changes to the nation's mental health system. But the president, top lawmakers in Congress and gun-control advocacy organizations appear nervous about the political chances of the assault weapons ban and eager to push for a better background check system."There definitely seems to be a significant convergence around the idea of universal background checks," said Dan Gross, the president of the Brady Campaign to Prevent Gun Violence, though he added, "I think there is still a significant outcry on the part of the American public to talk about assault weapons."On Sunday, Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the Democratic leader, said he might not even personally support an assault weapons ban, though he promised that senators would get a chance to vote on it. During the Super Bowl on Sunday, an important gun-control group broadcast a television advertisement in Washington focused exclusively on pushing for better background checks.The ad, from Mayors Against Illegal Guns, notes that the National Rifle Association once supported such checks. The ad concludes with a child saying: "America can do this. For us. Please."The focus on background checks reflects a broad political calculation in Washington that there is more public support for requiring the checks than for limits on guns and ammunition. A recent New York Times/CBS News survey found that 92 percent of those polled backed broader background checks.The same survey found that 53 percent supported a ban on some semiautomatic weapons and that 63 percent would support limits on magazines.John Feinblatt, a top adviser to Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York, said it was "widely acknowledged" that an effective assault weapons ban would be a tougher fight. He compared the background check system to an airport that has two lines — one with security and one without."That's pretty much the system that we have," Mr. Feinblatt said.But some advocates of tougher gun laws say that Mr. Obama and his allies in Congress should not give up pushing for the three measures, regardless of the opposition that the measures are likely to face from the N.R.A. and other gun rights groups.R. T. Rybak Jr., the mayor of Minneapolis, mocked politicians in Washington who are unwilling to support an assault weapons ban."Oh, it's not going to pass," Mr. Rybak said. "Well, guess what? People are dying out here, and I'm not satisfied with the lame kind of response that we've gotten from some of the people in Washington who look at this like some kind of game."Mr. Rybak, a Democrat, said he would not be satisfied by a compromise on gun control measures that did not address assault weapons and focused only on background checks.
DENVER — Democratic lawmakers in Colorado, a state haunted by two of the worst mass shootings in American history, unveiled a broad package of gun-control measures on Tuesday, but they stopped short of proposing a ban on assault rifles or any other types of firearms.Standing with a tearful tableau of family members whose relatives were killed at Columbine High School and an Aurora movie theater, both in Colorado, and Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, Conn., the lawmakers offered a preview of legislation that is likely to face fierce opposition from Republicans and skepticism from some rural Democrats in a state where hunting and sport shooting are pursuits that cross generations and partisan lines.Colorado has emerged as a crucial stage for the battle over gun-control legislation. A national gun-control group has hired a lobbying firm here, and the president of the National Rifle Association is due to meet with Colorado's governor this week to make his case.Under the Democrats' proposals, all private gun sales would be subject to background checks. Colorado now requires background checks at gun shows and retail stores, but not for private sales between individuals. The lawmakers also would limit ammunition clips to 10 rounds, banning the 30-round and 100-round magazines that a gunman used last summer in the shooting inside the Century 16 movie theater in Aurora.And Democrats would make dealers and manufacturers of assault rifles liable for deaths or injuries caused by those guns, potentially stripping away some legal protections that have made gun makers immune from civil lawsuits brought by cities and family members of victims. That proposal could be trumped by a 2005 federal law that protects gun dealers and makers from civil actions.Even with Democrats now in control of the governorship and both houses of the Legislature, supporters of the gun measures said a bruising political battle lay ahead. "It will be a fight," said State Representative Rhonda Fields, a Democrat from Aurora whose son Javad was shot to death in 2005.Rumblings of that fight showed themselves quickly at the news conference where the measures were announced. As lawmakers answered questions about whether farmers and ranchers who want to sell one another guns across a fence would have to submit to a background check (they would), Dudley Brown, a staunch gun-rights advocate, muttered, "It'll make them felons."State Senator Greg Brophy, a Republican, listened from the back of the ornate Capitol chamber with quiet incredulity. He said universal background checks would be nearly impossible to enforce without requiring every gun in the state to be registered. And he said holding Glock or Bushmaster responsible for the actions of killers was akin to blaming Coors for drunken-driving accidents."They offer up a series of extreme measures that don't make people safer," he said, before acknowledging that Republicans probably did not have the votes to stop them. "They're going to railroad the bills through. The question is, where's Governor Hickenlooper?"Gov. John W. Hickenlooper, a first-term Democrat, has advocated background checks on all gun sales. But he has not endorsed more contentious measures like limiting ammunition magazines or imposing strict liability standards on gun makers.
WASHINGTON — Members of both parties in the House outlined a plan on Tuesday to stiffen penalties on the illegal purchase and transportation of guns, a rare show of agreement on an issue where bipartisanship has been scarce.Two Democrats and two Republicans in the House of Representatives have introduced legislation that would create a dedicated federal anti-gun-trafficking law while further cracking down on people who buy firearms for someone else and lie about it on federal background check forms.As the law is written now, "the penalties are so weak it's like a slap on the hand," said one of the bill's sponsors, Representative Carolyn B. Maloney, Democrat of New York.Their proposal closely mirrors one already introduced in the Senate. That bill has bipartisan support as well, a fact that has heartened gun-control supporters on Capitol Hill.But even with new signs of greater bipartisan open-mindedness on gun control — the House majority leader, Representative Eric Cantor, Republican of Virginia, signaled support on Tuesday for a stronger background check system — lawmakers acknowledged the hurdles they face in getting any bill through both houses of Congress."For those who have deep concerns about the overreach of the federal government, I'm in that group," Representative Scott Rigell of Virginia, a Republican sponsor of the measure, said as he tried to assuage concerns of those in Congress and across the country who are worried about a federal push to limit the right to bear arms."To the extent that people slow down and take a look at it, read it — unless you're a gun trafficker, unless you're a person who's a straw purchaser, there's really no problem with this," Mr. Rigell said.The debate over gun-control legislation has never broken down cleanly along partisan lines. And this pattern is especially evident now as a number of Senate Democrats from states like Alaska, Colorado, Montana and West Virginia face tough questions from constituents back home.But the unveiling of the House legislation on Tuesday showed the flip side of that dynamic. There are many House Republicans who represent affluent suburban areas where voters view gun control in less absolute terms and are generally more open to stricter laws. This includes Mr. Rigell, who represents an area around Virginia Beach, and Representative Patrick Meehan of Pennsylvania, another sponsor of the bill, whose district includes the north and west suburbs of Philadelphia.Mr. Meehan, who was on hand for the announcement on Tuesday, said he planned to begin reaching out to other Republicans soon. "We will begin the process of lining up the support of our colleagues on both sides of the aisle," he said.Representative Elijah E. Cummings, Democrat of Maryland, lost his 20-year-old nephew to gun violence in 2011 and is another sponsor of the anti-trafficking bill. When he spoke on Tuesday in support of it, he said Americans grieving everywhere were calling on Congress to act. "They are begging us to address this problem," he said.The companion bill in the Senate is being sponsored by Senators Kirsten Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, and Mark Steven Kirk, Republican of Illinois. Though it differs in some central ways from the House bill, it also would create a federal gun trafficking statute and strengthen penalties for lying on federal background check forms.That bill is competing with a number of other gun control measures in the Senate, including another one focused on curbing trafficking. Senator Patrick J. Leahy, a Vermont Democrat and the chairman of the Senate Judiciary Committee, has a bill that would create a federal gun trafficking statute. But unlike the others, Mr. Leahy's focuses more on the buyer of the guns rather than the seller. He does not yet have a Republican co-sponsor.Then there is the effort by Senator Dianne Feinstein, Democrat of California, to ban the sale and manufacture of 157 types of semiautomatic weapons, as well as magazines holding more than 10 rounds of ammunition. And a group including Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, is preparing legislation that would allow for a more stringent system of background checks for firearms buyers.Much of the agreement between Democrats and Republicans on gun control has been around strengthening background checks, and that has appeared to be the most likely prospect for approval early this year.But anti-trafficking laws enjoy broad support from law enforcement agencies because they would help tackle a huge problem for police forces in major cities. Because of the country's patchwork gun laws, trafficking has enabled the spread of guns from places where firearm restrictions are relatively few, like in the South, to places where they are stricter, like New York City and California.President Obama, speaking before an array of law enforcement officials in Minneapolis on Monday, stressed the importance of such laws.
PHILADELPHIA — In a darkened classroom, 15 eighth graders gasped as a photograph appeared on the screen in front of them. It showed a dead man whose jaw had been destroyed by a shotgun blast, leaving the lower half of his face a shapeless, bloody mess.Next came a picture of the bullet-perforated legs of someone who had been shot with an AK-47 assault rifle, and then one of the bloated abdomen of a gunshot victim with internal injuries so grievous that the patient had to be fitted with a colostomy bag to replace intestines that can no longer function normally.These are among about 500 gunshot victims who are treated each year at Temple University Hospital, an institution in the heart of impoverished, crime-ridden North Philadelphia. While President Obama and Congressional leaders debate legislation intended to prevent mass killings like the elementary school shooting in Newtown, Conn., the hospital is trying to slow the rate of street killings by helping teenagers understand the realities of gun violence.The unusual program, called Cradle to Grave, brings in youths from across Philadelphia in the hope that an unflinching look at the effects that guns have in their community will deter young people from reaching for a gun to settle personal scores, and will help them recognize that gun violence is not the glamorous business sometimes depicted in television shows and rap music.The program is open to all schools in the city, but about two-thirds of the participants were referred by officials from the juvenile justice system. Children younger than 13 are not normally admitted. So far, about 7,000 teenagers have participated since it began in 2006, and despite the graphic content, no parent has ever complained, said Scott P. Charles, the hospital's trauma outreach coordinator."In seven and a half years, I have never had a parent say, 'I can't believe what you just showed my child,' " Mr. Charles said.On a recent day the eighth graders, students from nearby Kenderton School, gathered around Mr. Charles at the start of a two-hour visit. Most said they knew someone who had been shot."Our goal here isn't to scare you straight," Mr. Charles told them. "We're just trying to give you an education."According to police statistics, 331 people were killed in the city in 2012, equaling the highest total since 2008, and the fourth consecutive year of increase. Eighty-six percent of them were killed by firearms, the police say.Still, the number of killings in the city of about 1.5 million residents has dropped from a high of 406 in 2006, when national news media started calling the city Killadelphia.In a 2010 paper published in the medical journal Injury, Dr. Amy J. Goldberg, the hospital's chief of trauma and surgical critical care, and others cited data showing that students' inclination toward violence decreased after participating in the Cradle to Grave program, especially among those classified as having an "aggressive response to shame.""These results suggest that hospitals offer a unique opportunity to address the public health crisis posed by inner-city firearm violence," the study said.The program starts with a visit to the hospital's trauma bay, the first stop for gunshot victims — half of them under 25 — who are brought to the hospital from North Philadelphia's streets at an average rate of more than one a day.As the 13- and 14-year-olds gathered around a gurney on a recent visit, Mr. Charles told the story of Lamont Adams, 16, who died at the hospital after being shot 14 times by another boy who believed Lamont had snitched about a street dice game that was broken up by police officers.Lamont arrived in the trauma bay with 24 gunshot wounds, 10 more than the 14 rounds that had been emptied into him, because some of the shots had also exited his body, in some cases leaving indentations in the sidewalk, Mr. Charles told the students.In case his verbal description was not sufficiently vivid, Mr. Charles asked Justin Robinson, 13, to play the part of Lamont. The boy lay down on an empty body bag. Mr. Charles attached 24 circular red stickers to Justin's clothing to represent the wounds in Lamont's body.Mr. Charles told the students that the wounds he finds most moving were those in the boy's hands. "He holds up his hands and begs the boy to stop shooting," Mr. Charles said. "He had not prepared himself for how terrible this would be."The narrative was then taken up by Dr. Goldberg, who told the children that by the time Lamont arrived in the trauma bay, he was not breathing, so surgeons — without the use of anesthetics — quickly inserted a breathing tube into his windpipe.Neither did he have a pulse but that did not stop the doctors from inserting a tube into his groin to replace the blood he was losing, and then to open his chest in the hope of restarting his heart — which turned out to have three or four holes in it, Dr. Goldberg said. She held up a stainless steel rib-spreader.As the details of Lamont's story unfolded, one girl struggled to keep her composure. Another hid her face in her friend's shoulder. Lamont died about 15 minutes after arriving at the hospital, underscoring that prevention of gun violence is a lot better than trying to cure its effects, Dr. Goldberg concluded."Who do you think has the best chance of saving your life?" she asked the students. "You do."Despite the grisly images, most of the students said afterward that people should still be allowed to own guns for self-defense, although not assault weapons. Mahogany Johnson, 14, said she is in favor of a street ban on semiautomatic weapons like AK-47 assault rifles, which she said should be used "only in the woods." Jabriel Steward, 14, said, "Everybody should be allowed to have one gun for protection, for self-defense."But Feliciana Asada, 14, said more students should be given the opportunity to participate in Cradle to Grave. "Programs like this need to be installed in schools," she said.
DENVER — A tide of anger at Washington's gun-control efforts is sweeping through statehouses from South Carolina to North Dakota, taking the form of laws that would let states ignore — or at least resist — any new national gun restrictions.Lawmakers in at least 15 states have introduced bills that would nullify any new efforts to further restrict access to guns or high-capacity magazines within their borders. Some have provocative language calling for states to arrest and prosecute federal agents who dare to enforce new firearms regulations.Some of the measures have died quietly or been voted down amid concerns they are unconstitutional. Others are moving along with support from rural pro-gun Republicans, who say their constituents are threatened by Washington's push — however halting and uncertain — for stricter gun laws.Quixotic as they may be, the nullification moves reach back to John C. Calhoun and the antebellum South, and tap a deep frustration with what conservative lawmakers call Washington's intrusion on the rights of states and gun owners. The spirit, while more muted, echoes the state-level backlash to President Obama's health care law in 2010."It's about citizens having the ability to be armed to protect themselves in their homes," said Casey Guernsey, a Missouri state representative and hunter who holds an annual coyote shoot in his district as a charity fund-raiser. His bill to block any new gun laws has 60 co-sponsors in the state's Republican-controlled House and is likely to come up for a hearing next week, he said."We aren't here to do the bidding of the federal government," he said. "Whenever they go out of bounds, it's our responsibility to step up."They are supported by states' rights groups like the Tenth Amendment Center (named for the Constitutional provision that grants power to the states and people), and have allies among the scores of rural sheriffs who are objecting to new gun laws.In Wyoming, home to some of the country's least restrictive gun regulations, a bill to exempt the state from any new gun-control laws sailed through the Republican-controlled House by a vote of 46 to 13 and is now headed to the State Senate.The measure, called the Firearm Protection Act, declares that any new gun-control laws or executive orders that ban semiautomatic weapons or limit ammunition clip sizes are "unenforceable" in Wyoming. Any federal agent who tries to enforce gun-control measures would be guilty of a felony punishable by five years in prison and a $5,000 fine. It also allows the state's attorney general to defend Wyoming residents prosecuted for violating federal gun laws."I don't want to see federal agents arrested. That's not the goal," said Representative Mark Baker, a Republican from southwest Wyoming. "It gives us a way to challenge them."Republicans sponsoring the legislation say they have been flooded with e-mails from their constituents praising the effort. The clamor for new gun laws after the massacre at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Connecticut has gratified many Democrats and politicians in heavily Democratic cities, but it is a creeping shadow in rural areas, where hunting and shooting are badges of identity as much as weekend diversions."Our citizens are very nervous," said Andrew G. Maragos, a North Dakota representative supporting a measure that would prevent any state employees — like police officers — from enforcing new national gun laws. "Our culture is tied to guns. We're hunters. We have the best hunting in the world. The mere idea of any kind of restriction just makes them nervous."Even in Wyoming, the nullification law faces a hazy future. Gov. Matt Mead, a Republican, has raised concerns about putting the state's police officers and sheriffs at loggerheads with federal agents charged with enforcing federal gun laws. Legal experts and even lawyers for solidly Republican legislatures have warned that the Constitution's supremacy clause would allow federal gun laws to override any state measures.Montana is an instructive example of the challenges these states face.Three years ago, the state passed the Firearms Freedom Act, declaring that any guns manufactured and owned entirely inside the state were off-limits to the reach of federal laws. Gary S. Marbut, president of the Montana Shooting Sports Association, spent years pushing for the law. Once it passed, he asked the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives whether, without a federal license, he could now go into business making a bolt-action rifle for young shooters — the Montana Buckaroo.No way, the agency told him.Mr. Marbut sued, saying their denials flew in the face of Montana's law. His case is to be heard in March before the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit.In Wyoming, Representative Kendell Kroeker, a Republican from Casper who introduced the state's nullification bill, said he welcomed a court fight."I would much rather have that challenge now, rather than when they show up to take citizens' guns away," Mr. Kroeker said. "Let it be decided in the courts before it comes to bloodshed."
He arrived at the police station here early, as usual. Two officers were standing in the locker room admiring a new .45-caliber semiautomatic pistol. Thinking the chamber was empty, one of them pulled the trigger. A bullet ricocheted off a locker and went right through the boy's neck, severing his spinal cord.At 16, he would never walk again and never fulfill his dream of becoming a police officer.Now, three decades later and seven terms into his career as one of Rhode Island's two members of the House of Representatives, Mr. Langevin, 48, is the only quadriplegic ever to serve in Congress. And his story, unknown to many of those who work with him every day in the Capitol, has thrust him into the raging national debate over gun control.For the past month, he has been on a quiet campaign to persuade his colleagues to give up their guest passes to next Tuesday's State of the Union address by President Obama so that victims of gun violence can attend.That way, he said, when the nation's highest officeholders look up from the floor of the House to those watching from the gallery, they will not be able to avoid seeing the human toll that guns can exact."It's a powerful reminder to every member of Congress how pervasive this issue is," he said the other day as he pulled his electric wheelchair up to a coffee table in his district office. So far he has nearly 20 takers, and many more who are considering the idea.Mr. Langevin (pronounced LAN-jih-vin), who has boyish looks, a soft voice and an imperturbable demeanor, may not be the highest-profile Democrat pushing for more gun control. And he is not the only House member with a tragic personal history involving a gun.Those stories abound. Carolyn McCarthy, Democrat of New York, lost her husband in the 1993 Long Island Rail Road rampage that also critically wounded her son. The 20-year-old nephew of Elijah E. Cummings, Democrat of Maryland, was shot to death in his apartment in 2011. Bobby L. Rush, Democrat of Illinois, lost his 29-year-old son to a shooting in 1999.But like no one else in Congress, Mr. Langevin serves as what he calls "a visible symbol" of the danger of weapons."I think when I speak about it," he said, "at least it gets them to pause and think. It makes it real, the damage that guns can do."Supporters of stricter gun laws say they see a small window of time in which to act. Mindful of how quickly Washington's attention can shift, they say they hope Mr. Langevin serves as a conscience check to politicians who are on the fence."Jim's wheelchair is a startling reminder of the danger of a bullet," said Representative Keith Ellison, a Minnesota Democrat who is helping to recruit other members to join the State of the Union effort. Mr. Ellison has given his ticket to Sami Rahamim, the son of a man who was among seven people killed in a workplace shooting in Minneapolis in September."This effort is a way to resensitize," Mr. Ellison added. "Some of this conversation has been so callous. 'Our rights, our rights, our rights.' Well, what about the suffering of our colleagues?"Ms. McCarthy has invited the chief of police from Malverne, N.Y., whose uncle James Gorycki was killed in the same shooting that claimed her husband.Representative David N. Cicilline, Rhode Island's other House member and a Democrat, liked the idea so much that he had to tell his original State of the Union guest, the mayor of Central Falls, R.I., that he was sorry but that the invitation was going to someone else. Cleora Francis-O'Connor, whose son was 17 when he was shot and killed in South Providence, will attend instead.Representative Elizabeth Esty, a Democrat whose district includes Newtown, Conn., has invited someone closely linked to the tragedy at Sandy Hook Elementary School, where a gunman took the lives of 26 children and school employees in December.Mr. Langevin's guest will be Jim Tyrell, whose sister was fatally shot in a robbery at a market in Providence.The special wheelchair Mr. Langevin pilots, which was designed by the same inventor who created the Segway, allows him to raise himself up to about 5 feet tall so he can meet people at closer to eye level, a useful position when your business is politics.When he makes his case to colleagues on gun issues, his appeal is simple and unemotional. "My accident happened in what should have been one of the safest places to be: in a police station, at the hands of trained police officers," he often says. "So more guns are not the answer."
CHARLESTON, S.C. — The gentle pace of life on the campus of Ashley Hall , South Carolina's only all-girls preparatory school, appeared to be back on Friday. Parents lined up in the shade of the live oaks to pick up their children. A luncheon for alumnae of the school, which was founded in 1909, went on as planned.Still, police officers patrolled the iron fence that surrounds the school and teachers remained on edge, trying to grasp how a woman with a public history of mental illness had managed to buy a gun a week earlier and amazed that the gun, when pointed at administrators who confronted her in front of the school on Monday, did not fire.Alice Boland, 28, who was charged in 2005 with threatening to assassinate President George W. Bush and members of Congress as she waited in line at U.S. Customs, is again charged with plotting a violent attack. On Monday, after pacing in front of the school gates during car pool and visibly swinging a gun, she tried to shoot two faculty members: the director of the high school, Mary Schweers, and an English teacher, Chris Hughes.The police charged Ms. Boland with attempted murder and unlawful carrying of a firearm. The only thing that stopped her, they said, was that she did not realize the gun was locked."We were very fortunate she did not know how to take the lock off, or this could have been a tragedy," said Earl Woodham, a spokesman in Charlotte for the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives.The authorities are investigating whether Ms. Boland was required to disclose her history of mental illness when she bought the gun. A small firearms store in Walterboro, 50 miles from Charleston, sold her the Taurus PT-22 pistol on Feb. 1. She filled out a federal background check form and was approved.She appeared to have bought the gun legally, Mr. Woodham said. Gun buyers nationwide are required to disclose mental illnesses only if they have been committed to an institution or found "mentally defective" by a judge, he said."Unfortunately, there are a lot of people who are mentally unstable but who would not technically be declared mentally defective," he said.Ms. Boland's 2005 brush with law enforcement came when she became upset with the slow process of getting through Customs in Montreal."I am going to kill President Bush with a gun," she said, according to federal court papers. "Just give me a gun. I am going to come back and shoot you all."The federal charges were dropped after she pleaded not guilty by reason of mental incompetence.In an interview on Friday, her parents, who live in nearby Beaufort, said she continued to struggle with mental illness. Ms. Boland is being held on $900,000 bond at a detention center in North Charleston.Just before noon Friday, as parents waited to pick up their children at the school, the tragedy averted remained the topic of the day. Here in the heart of historic Charleston, at a school that graduated Barbara Bush, the former first lady, and the feminist author Nancy Friday, the threat of gun violence had seemed like a concern for some other city.Parents were grateful for the quick action by administrators, who used a well-rehearsed emergency plan to secure the campus and stalled Ms. Boland at the gate. Two weeks ago, in response to the Newtown, Conn., massacre, the police met with school officials to rehearse the protocol for a school shooting.The mayor of Charleston, Joseph P. Riley Jr., said that the incident was a "wake-up call" and that he would encourage South Carolina legislators to tighten restrictions on background checks for mental illness."If you threaten to kill a president of the United States, so many alarm bells should sound when you go to buy a gun," he said. "We could easily be talking about a homicide or multiple homicide. It's a miracle we're not."
TUCSON — Gabrielle Giffords looked slightly stricken as she considered the question: Would she feel bad about starring in a political advertisement against her former House colleagues who declined to stand with her on guns? "Yes," she said, it would be painful."Sometimes you have to do things that are hard," said Mark E. Kelly, Ms. Giffords's husband, as she tucked herself close to him on their couch. Ms. Giffords nodded, as she often does when Mr. Kelly — as he often does — intuits the many thoughts she is still unable to express fully. "Really hard," she added.Ms. Giffords, a former Democratic congresswoman from Arizona, a gun owner, an astronaut's wife, a shooting survivor and an incipient gun-control advocate, is settling into the third act of her public life.Her career as a lawmaker is behind her, but so is her role as the fragile, slightly mysterious victim in the months after she was shot point-blank in a parking lot here just over two years ago. Now, she is the face and emotional dynamism behind a new advocacy group and a separate political action committee, Americans for Responsible Solutions, dedicated to reducing gun violence. It is an effort, she said, that gives her "purpose."Ms. Giffords's hair, short and wispy for some time after her brain surgery, has returned to its natural bounce. Once heavily guarded by Capitol Police officers and a stream of medical professionals, Ms. Giffords now lives with Mr. Kelly and his 15-year-old daughter, Claire, and Nelson, her service dog, in a modern adobe-style house they bought in August, decorated with bright, large-scale paintings and sculptures.Ms. Giffords's ability to understand others is unscathed. During a two-hour interview here, she talked about whether she missed Washington ("a little"); explained, in short phrases, her positions on firearms; and made a sly one-word joke ("wasteland") about one of her least favorite places. She revealed the provenance of some of her paintings (her old Congressional office), pointed out one that was PG-13 (a semiabstract nude), and lamented what a recent frost had taken from her garden. Once limited to two words — "what" and "chicken" — each month she gains more.Speaking in full sentences is still a struggle, and she has regular therapy sessions to help recover her speech and to manage her other impairments. Her vision is impaired, and her right leg and arm are largely paralyzed. She can move her shoulder, her hip and slightly her foot.The rest of her time is largely spent preparing for the legislative battles, political campaigns and potential face-offs with friends and former colleagues that will be waged through her month-old organizations. She and Mr. Kelly are already looking at governor contests, Congressional special elections and 2014 races. They hope to influence the outcome by leveraging the power of their names and their story, an effort presaged last month when Ms. Giffords lit up a Senate Judiciary Committee hearing with her brief and powerful plea: "We must do something.""Sometimes there will be some difficult conversations," Mr. Kelly said. "There already have been."For nearly two decades, the National Rifle Association has succeeded in rewarding lawmakers who backed legislation supporting gun rights and firearm manufacturers and punishing those who did not. Those efforts largely overwhelmed the voices on the opposing side.But after the mass shooting in Newtown, Conn., in December that left 20 elementary school pupils dead, Ms. Giffords and Mr. Kelly — with several others like Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York — are trying to sway races from the other side.Mr. Bloomberg's political action committee, Independence USA, was widely credited with bringing an end to the career of Representative Joe Baca, Democrat of California, last year after it spent $3.3 million on television ads and mailers attacking him. That political action committee is now focusing on Debbie Halvorson, a Democratic former congresswoman who is running in a special election to succeed former Representative Jesse L. Jackson Jr. in the Chicago area.The Coalition to Stop Gun Violence recently ran newspaper advertisements against Senator Heidi Heitkamp, a freshman Democrat from North Dakota who has been critical of President Obama's legislative proposals to curtail some guns, and made a video criticizing Representative John Barrow, Democrat of Georgia, a strong advocate of gun rights.The Progressive Change Campaign Committee, a liberal group, has run an ad attacking Senator Mitch McConnell of Kentucky, the Republican leader, for his positions on guns.These efforts are "one of the most important things that has happened," said Dr. Garen J. Wintemute, the director of the violence prevention research program at the University of California, Davis. "What has been completely missing is the financial counterweight to the N.R.A."Ms. Giffords and Mr. Kelly are particularly focused on two areas that Mr. Obama is pushing: an enhanced system of background checks that would prevent more criminals and the mentally ill from buying guns, and a limit on the capacity of magazines.
CHICAGO — By the hundreds, mourners filed into the pews of a packed church on this city's South Side on Saturday, clutching one another, weeping and wearing buttons adorned with the smiling face of Hadiya Pendleton, a 15-year-old girl whose death has come to represent the miserable cost of gun and gang violence."She is a representative not just of the people in Chicago, she is a representative of people across this nation who have lost their lives," said Damon Stewart, Ms. Pendleton's godfather, as he urged people not to politicize her death.An array of Washington officials — the first lady, Michelle Obama; Arne Duncan, the education secretary; and Valerie Jarrett, a senior White House adviser — were among dignitaries seated in the front row. Ms. Pendleton, a member of her high school's majorette team, traveled to Washington to perform during President Obama's inauguration festivities only a week before she was fatally shot here.Mayor Rahm Emanuel, who has met with the girl's family and spoken emotionally of her dreams for her future, attended, too, as did Gov. Patrick J. Quinn, who had alluded to Ms. Pendleton in his State of the State address.As an emerging national debate about firearms has focused largely on mass shootings in places like Newtown, Conn., Ms. Pendleton's death last month became a symbol for a different element of gun violence — urban and often overlooked or quickly forgotten. Ms. Pendleton, a student at King College Prep High School, was shot Jan. 29 as she sat after school in a park, about a mile from Mr. Obama's Chicago home, with friends — a group that the police say was probably mistakenly swept up in the cross-fire of a gang fight.In Chicago, people said they viewed the sudden flood of attention on Ms. Pendleton as a needed shift in the consciousness of the nation's third-largest city, which experienced more than 500 homicides in 2012, many of them from gun violence, and 46 more deaths since the start of 2013. If the city had grown inured at times to the stories of gang-related shootings, largely on the South and West Sides, Ms. Pendleton's death appeared — at least for now — to have reawakened many people, even those in more upscale neighborhoods away from the worst of the violence and far beyond Chicago.So many people, including some who said they had never met Ms. Pendleton personally, had felt drawn to her funeral that space in the sanctuary and in an overflow room ran out and scores had to be turned away."It should be a tipping point," Andre Smith, head of Chicago Against Violence, a local group aimed at preventing neighborhood violence, said Friday, as he and scores of others attended a visitation for Ms. Pendleton, whom he had not known. "I just hope that it's not here today and gone tomorrow."In the days since Ms. Pendleton's killing, a debate had ensued here over what the White House response should be. Some, including the Rev. Jesse L. Jackson and local newspaper editorial boards, had urged Mr. Obama to appear at the girl's funeral.Some said he needed to draw the same attention to violence in his hometown and to the complicated urban questions of poverty, joblessness and gangs that he had given earlier to the mass shootings in Connecticut and elsewhere. Others, though, said that a White House presence would only politicize the funeral of a young girl and create a needless media spectacle, even as scores of other Chicagoans had died in violence here with little notice at all.Asked why Mr. Obama, who is expected to address gun restrictions in his State of the Union address on Tuesday, had chosen not to attend Ms. Pendleton's funeral, his spokesman pointed out late last week that Mrs. Obama and others from the administration would attend."I think that represents the feeling that the president and the first lady both have about what happened to her and the tragedy that it represents both in real concrete terms to her family but also symbolically because of the tragedy of gun violence that our country has to deal with all too often," the spokesman, Jay Carney, said. Displayed on the back of a glossy funeral program for Ms. Pendleton was a copy of a handwritten note from the president to Ms. Pendleton's parents, which read, in part: "We know that no words from us can soothe the pain, but rest assured that we are praying for you, and that we will continue to work as hard as we can to end this senseless violence. God Bless, Barack Obama."
"You've got some adrenaline running through you right now," said Esther Beris, the coordinator of the northeastern Ohio chapter of A Girl and a Gun Women's Shooting League. "It's O.K., just relax."Ms. Froebe, 42, a small-business owner who described herself as a "virgin gun shooter," concentrated and pulled the trigger. "It was awesome," she said, her face flushed, after emptying the 10-round magazine. "The sense of control, of being in charge of me."In the debate over firearms regulations, the voices of gun owners have largely been those of men. But at firing ranges across the country, a growing number of women are learning to use firearms and honing their skills.Women's participation in shooting sports has surged over the last decade, increasing by 51.5 percent for target shooting from 2001 to 2011, to just over 5 million women, and by 41.8 percent for hunting, according to the National Sporting Goods Association.Gun sales to women have risen in concert. In a survey last year by the National Shooting Sports Foundation, 73 percent of gun dealers said the number of female customers had gone up in 2011, as had a majority of retailers surveyed in the two previous years.Manufacturers have increasingly geared advertising toward women, marketing special firearms models with smaller frames, custom colors (pink is a favorite), and accessories like the "concealed carry" "salmon kiss" leather handbag offered by Cobra Firearms or the leopard shooting gloves and Bullet Rosette jewelry sold by Sweet Shot ("Look cute while you shoot!" is the company's motto).Women's shooting clubs have also proliferated — not just in small towns like Painesville, but also in Atlanta, Houston, even Manhattan, where a women's gun club meets regularly at a firing range in Chelsea, a neighborhood better known for art galleries.On a recent Friday, Ms. Froebe and eight other women attended the Painesville shooting league's inaugural Breakfast and Bullets gathering at Perkins Family Restaurant for brunch and then moved on to Atwell's Shooting Range. There, Ms. Beris taught them how to hold and load a handgun safely and then coached them on the range.Though they may share a fierce belief in the Second Amendment with their male counterparts, female gun owners often learn to shoot for different reasons, their interest in and proficiency with firearms not just a hobby or a means for self-defense, but a statement of independence and personal power.Tina Wilson-Cohen, a former Secret Service agent who founded She Can Shoot, a women's league with 10 chapters and 3,000 members across the country, said 90 percent of women who joined did so because "they've been a victim at one point of their life, of stalking or date rape or domestic violence, or they have just felt so vulnerable, and they want to feel competent and like they can protect themselves."Firearms also often carry a different meaning for women than for men, who grow up with Hollywood images of guns that tell them "this is what a real man looks like and that's how a real man acts, and it's kind of delusional, really," Ms. Wilson-Cohen said."We don't see women acting like this," she said. "It doesn't have that bad-ass mentality attached to it."Yet women who shoot recreationally often find themselves confronting the misconceptions of the non-gun-owning public, said Mary Stange, a professor of women's studies and religion at Skidmore College and a co-author of "Gun Women: Firearms and Feminism in Contemporary America."She said that when Nancy Lanza was identified as the owner of the guns her son Adam used to kill 20 children and 6 adults at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, Conn., in December, some seemed to blame her. Ms. Lanza, who owned at least five firearms, including a Bushmaster AR-15-style rifle used in the shooting, was labeled in a headline as a "gun-crazed mother" and was described in some accounts as "stockpiling an arsenal.""What strikes me is the way that, rather than really trying to understand what may have been going on, there is this tendency to want to latch on to conventional arguments and stereotypical images," Professor Stange said. "There's this idea that women are more affiliative, more peace loving, more pacifistic, which should then make women as a group gun averse."It is difficult to pinpoint how many gun owners in the United States are women — the federal government does not break down background checks by demographic, and most manufacturers do not release information on sales. But Peggy Tartaro, the editor of Women and Guns magazine, a nonprofit publication of the Second Amendment Foundation, said she had found estimates varying from 12 million to 17 million.They cross the political spectrum. Professor Stange, who hunts regularly and owns several rifles and shotguns, describes herself as a liberal Democrat.
SANTA FE, N.M. — As state lawmakers around the country wrestle with whether to tighten gun laws, the fierce debate has not always fallen neatly along party lines — especially in the West.Take New Mexico, where Democrats have dominated both chambers of the Legislature for decades, where Barack Obama twice won handily and where lawmakers have shown a willingness to back progressive causes like medical marijuana and driver's licenses for illegal immigrants.But in this largely rural state, where old Hispanic families have hunted, ranched and farmed the mountain valleys and mesas since Spanish settlers first arrived in the 1500s, efforts to restrict firearms have been viewed warily.This is a place where you can bring your gun almost anywhere. You can even carry your weapon openly in the Capitol, if you wish — one of only a few states that allow open or concealed carry in their statehouses, according to the National Conference of State Legislatures."There have never been any advocates or lobbyists working on gun laws here. The N.R.A. has always been the only game in town," said Pat Davis, executive director of ProgressNow New Mexico, a liberal political group that supports stricter gun laws. "We have not seen the Auroras or the Virginia Techs here."This year, though, is one of the first times in recent history that any significant effort has been made to regulate guns in New Mexico.In January, State Representative Miguel P. Garcia, a Democrat from Albuquerque, proposed legislation requiring background checks for purchases of firearms made at gun shows and through private sales — both currently unregulated under New Mexico law.The proposal comes just weeks after the brother of a former state senator was shot to death, along with his wife and three of their children. Their 15-year-old son was arrested and charged in the case, which has shocked New Mexico.Mr. Garcia's initial bill stalled in a committee hearing after a Democratic lawmaker sided with Republicans against it. But in a compromise, Mr. Garcia introduced a less restrictive version, eliminating background checks on private sales but increasing cooperation between state and federal authorities to keep track of people with mental illness."That was a hard pill to swallow," Mr. Garcia said in an interview. "But if we put together a nonpartisan initiative, we can win over more members of the Legislature and more Democrats will vote for this."The reality of the state of New Mexico is that we've got a lot of Democrats that represent moderate and conservative leaning districts with a high number of gun owners."Late Friday, Mr. Garcia's bill passed easily in the committee with bipartisan support, a few hours after dozens of gun proponents rallied at the Capitol, carrying pistols and semiautomatic rifles."Don't tell us we can't be here, because it's not true," said a protester with a pistol strapped to his thigh. That New Mexico is only now inching toward more gun regulation belies the social and geographic intricacies that can make the gun debate so complex.By comparison, neighboring Colorado, which historically leans more conservative, has weighed gun control legislation for years — spurred by the shooting at Columbine High School, and more recently the mass shooting at a movie theater in Aurora.After the attack at Columbine, voters in Colorado overwhelmingly approved a measure in 2000 that closed the so-called gun-show loophole. And last week, Colorado Democrats unveiled a package of bills that includes universal background checks and a ban on high-capacity magazines.In New Mexico, State Senator George K. Muñoz, a Democrat from Gallup, said that guns had long been woven into the lives of the state's rural Hispanic and Native American population, many of whom vote Democratic.Mr. Muñoz, who said he was open to supporting Mr. Garcia's legislation, sponsored a bill several years ago allowing individuals with concealed carry permits to bring their guns into restaurants that serve beer or wine, unless explicitly prohibited.The measure passed and was signed by Gov. Bill Richardson, the state's most powerful Democrat at the time."I live in rural New Mexico. If the coyotes come to eat my cats, I'm going to have to shoot the coyotes," Mr. Muñoz said. "When you say, 'You can't do this' or 'You can't do that,' then everything goes underground."He added: "So how do you regulate guns? I don't know."
WASHINGTON — In the wake of their electoral drubbing in November, Republicans sought an image reboot at President Obama's State of the Union address , a new face that would be both more positive and less strident, youthful and multicultural but also quietly constructive and respectful.Then there was Ted Nugent, the 64-year-old rocker who once told the president to "suck on my machine gun."Mr. Nugent, the gun-rights brawler, sat stone-faced high up in the House spectators' gallery as the president pressed an agenda that went far beyond gun control. Invited to watch as the guest of another firebrand, Steve Stockman, a Republican representative from Texas, his crossed arms and stern visage seemed to capture the conflict still lurking within the Republican Party as its leaders look to expand their appeal.There were no shouts of "you lie!" Tuesday night, no overt moments of disrespect beyond the usual partisan responses to policy. But in a House chamber filled conspicuously with the victims of gun violence and family members still grieving for lost loved ones, Mr. Nugent seemed like a provocation, a saber-toothed tiger invited to a garden party."I tend not to engage in inflammatory displays like that," said Representative Charlie Dent of Pennsylvania, a Republican moderate who invited a young constituent he had nominated for the United States Naval Academy.Such dissonant notes reverberated throughout the marble halls of the Capitol all day Tuesday, from the office suite of the House speaker to the floor of the Senate to a rancorous roll call for Chuck Hagel at the usually decorous Senate Armed Services Committee. It reflected the very real struggle within the party between Republicans who believe tangible adjustments are needed, in policy and tone, and an equally confident core that maintains the party's problem is that it has not been conservative enough."He'll continue this demagoguery," Senator Ron Johnson, Republican of Wisconsin, said of the president after the speech. "He'll still waste everybody's time on gun control — it's not going to pass — and distract Americans from what we really need to do."Senator Marco Rubio of Florida gave the official Republican response, taking the unprecedented step for the party of speaking in English and in Spanish to reach out to Latino voters who forsook the party in November."Despite our differences, I know that both Republicans and Democrats love America," he said, in an address that spoke passionately of his own immigrant background and economic rise. "I pray we can come together to solve our problems, because the choices before us could not be more important."The lasting image of Mr. Rubio's address may not have been his youthful face and stately backdrop but an odd lurch off camera mid-speech for a quick drink of water. He recovered from the glitch, but it marred an otherwise smooth performance.But before Mr. Rubio spoke from the well-appointed Capitol cloisters of House Speaker John A. Boehner, the speaker grabbed attention when he told reporters that he would like "a little foreplay first" from the president before embracing a path to citizenship for undocumented workers in an immigration bill.Fellow Republican senators hailed Mr. Rubio, their new spokesman and a 2016 presidential hopeful, in terms that spoke to broader hopes for the party: youth, vitality, thoughtfulness and an affirmative agenda that was not just oppositional."Obviously, we know we've got to be for things," said Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona. Still, Mr. Rubio voted Tuesday against reauthorizing a more muscular Violence Against Women Act, an echo of his own roots on the right flank of his party. He was one of only 22 senators to oppose the bill, which 23 Republicans and 55 Democrats endorsed.The Republicans sent out another mixed message earlier in the day when Representative Cathy McMorris Rodgers of Washington, the House Republican Conference chairwoman, launched the party's first official Spanish-language Twitter account, @GOPespanol. But last week, when House Republicans tried to begin a broader "G.O.P. en Español" program, which was to distribute Republican reactions to the State of the Union in Spanish, the most vociferous anti-illegal immigration voices in the House objected."There's a conflicting message that comes out from the Republicans if we want to recognize the unifying power of English, and meanwhile, we send out communications in multiple languages," Representative Steve King, Republican of Iowa, told National Journal. Official business and documents, he said, need to be in English.The Tea Party's response to the State of the Union address fell to Senator Rand Paul, Republican of Kentucky, no shrinking violet but a softer voice than last year's respondent, Herman Cain, or the inaugural choice in 2011, Representative Michele Bachmann, who looked away from the camera as she denounced the "16,500 I.R.S. agents in charge of policing President Obama's health care bill" and hailed "the early days of a history-making turn" in American governance.Meanwhile, in the Senate Armed Services Committee — a panel that for decades has been run with bipartisan decorum — Senator Ted Cruz, a freshman Republican from Texas, all but called President Obama's nominee for defense secretary, Mr. Hagel, an extremist with ties to shady organizations."I will point out that right now this committee knows absolutely nothing about the personal compensation Chuck Hagel received in 2008 and 2009 or 2010," Mr. Cruz said. "We do not know, for example, if he received compensation for giving paid speeches at extreme or radical groups."That yielded a stinging rebuke from the usually soft-spoken Senator Bill Nelson, Democrat of Florida, who said Mr. Cruz, a Tea Party favorite, had gone "over the line" and "impugned the patriotism of the nominee."Republicans still held out hope that the lasting image of the night would not be such backbiting but a new tone of cooperation. "Good people will show that we're a governing party," said Senator Mike Johanns, a Nebraska Republican. "You win elections because people believe you can make a difference."
DAYTON, Wyo. — Craig Reichert found his son's body on a winter morning, lying on the floor as if he were napping with his great-uncle's pistol under his knee. The 911 dispatcher told him to administer CPR, but Mr. Reichert, who has had emergency training, told her it was too late. His son, Kameron, 17, was already cold to the touch.Guns are like a grandmother's diamonds in the Reichert family, heirlooms that carry memory and tradition. They are used on the occasional hunting trip, but most days they are stored, forgotten, under a bed. So when Kameron used one on himself, his parents were as shocked as they were heartbroken."I beat myself up quite a bit over not having a gun safe or something to put them in," Mr. Reichert said. But he said even if he had had one, "There would have been two people in the house with the combination, him and me."The gun debate has focused on mass shootings and assault weapons since the schoolhouse massacre in Newtown, Conn., but far more Americans die by turning guns on themselves. Nearly 20,000 of the 30,000 deaths from guns in the United States in 2010 were suicides, according to the most recent figures from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. The national suicide rate has climbed by 12 percent since 2003, and suicide is the third-leading cause of death for teenagers.Guns are particularly lethal. Suicidal acts with guns are fatal in 85 percent of cases, while those with pills are fatal in just 2 percent of cases, according to the Harvard Injury Control Research Center.The national map of suicide lights up in states with the highest gun ownership rates. Wyoming, Montana and Alaska, the states with the three highest suicide rates, are also the top gun-owning states, according to the Harvard center. The state-level data are too broad to tell whether the deaths were in homes with guns, but a series of individual-level studies since the early 1990s found a direct link. Most researchers say the weight of evidence from multiple studies is that guns in the home increase the risk of suicide."The literature suggests that having a gun in your home to protect your family is like bringing a time bomb into your house," said Dr. Mark Rosenberg, an epidemiologist who helped establish the C.D.C.'s National Center for Injury Prevention and Control. "Instead of protecting you, it's more likely to blow up."Still, some dispute the link, saying that it does not prove cause and effect, and that other factors, like alcoholism and drug abuse, may be driving the association. Gary Kleck, a professor of criminology at Florida State University in Tallahassee, contends that gun owners may have qualities that make them more susceptible to suicide. They may be more likely to see the world as a hostile place, or to blame themselves when things go wrong, a dark side of self-reliance.Health officials in a number of states are trying to persuade families to keep guns away from troubled relatives or to lock the weapons up so teenagers cannot get them. Some of those same officials say the inflamed national gun control debate is actually making progress harder because the politics put gun owners on the defensive."You just bump up against that glass wall, and barriers go up and the conversations break down," said B. J. Ayers, a suicide prevention specialist in southeast Wyoming.Seeking to lower death rates, health departments in Missouri, Wyoming and North Carolina are giving out gunlocks. In New Hampshire, about half the gun shops put up posters and give out fliers alerting gun owners to the warning signs for suicide and suggesting ways to keep guns from loved ones at risk of harming themselves. A coalition of firearm dealers in Maryland is now planning a similar program."This is an issue whose time has come," said Keith Hotle, state suicide prevention team leader for Wyoming, the state with the highest suicide rate. A state advisory council recently bumped firearms safety to the top priority in a new report to the governor on suicide prevention. But Mr. Hotle cautioned that in Wyoming, where guns are like cars — just about everybody has one — direct arguments against them simply will not work."The framing is important," he said. "It's not about taking away people's guns. It's about how to deal with folks in a temporary crisis."Kameron's crisis was, by all accounts, temporary. He was a popular football player with adoring parents and no history of depression. He worked after school at the only corner grocery store in Dayton, a tiny town in northeastern Wyoming with tidy, tree-lined streets and a park at the base of Bighorn National Forest. He liked to drive students around in his Pontiac Grand Prix, and he always bought multipacks of gum at Costco so he could give out sticks in pretty blue wrappers to girls at school."If someone had a hankering for a hamburger, he'd be off," said his mother, Cara Reichert, an administrator in the local school system.The event that preceded his death in 2008 seems like the mischievous scrape of a teenage boy. Out one night in the town park, he was caught with a package of cigars by local police officers.
CHICAGO — President Obama came home on Friday for a policy speech that inevitably turned personal: He spoke of teaching law nearby, meeting his wife, Michelle, raising their daughters less than a mile away and then, most recently, watching the first lady return for the funeral of a vivacious teenager gunned down in a park.Less than two minutes into his remarks at the mostly African-American Hyde Park Academy high school, Mr. Obama paid tribute to 15-year-old Hadiya Pendleton, a girl who had been just a bit older than his daughter Malia, but who now represents Mr. Obama's private connection to the gun violence that he has only begun to address in his second term.Ms. Pendleton had attended a nearby high school until she was caught in what the police say was gang gunfire just days after she had marched in the president's second inaugural parade. In the audience here were her parents, Cleopatra Cowley-Pendleton and Nathaniel Pendleton Sr., the latest involuntary activists for gun safety. On Tuesday, they sat with Mrs. Obama in the House gallery for Mr. Obama's State of the Union address. When the president recognized them here on Friday, there was awkward applause, as if people were unsure whether losing a child was reason to clap."Unfortunately, what happened to Hadiya is not unique," Mr. Obama said. "It's not unique to Chicago. It's not unique to this country. Too many of our children are being taken away from us."He spoke of Newtown, Conn., where 20 first graders and 6 of their guardians were massacred two months ago. But as profoundly tragic as their murders were, he said, "last year there were 443 murders with a firearm on the streets of this city, and 65 of those victims were 18 and under. So that's the equivalent of a Newtown every four months. And that's precisely why the overwhelming majority of Americans are asking for some common-sense proposals to make it harder for criminals to get their hands on a gun."Mr. Obama was met at the airport by Rahm Emanuel, Chicago's mayor and the president's first White House chief of staff. At the school, Mr. Obama's speech was delayed while they privately talked with 16 students enrolled in a youth antiviolence program — some of them voluntarily and others not, according to officials.The hometown visit was a risky political balancing act for Mr. Obama. He is under pressure to speak to the rise in gun homicides in Chicago, the nation's third-largest city, just as he has comforted towns like Newtown and Aurora, Colo., which have seen mass shootings. "We need him to come here and address this gun violence. It's terrible. I've got kids," said a cabdriver, Serge Diop, when he learned that a passenger's destination was the site for the president's remarks.Yet for Mr. Obama's former aide and friend Mr. Emanuel, the murder rate has become a crisis despite a generally positive mayoral record. The president's stop, with the national news media following him, inevitably stoked attention across the country.Mr. Obama had come for the third of a three-city swing to promote new antipoverty policy initiatives he announced on Tuesday in his State of the Union address — his "ladders of opportunity" for helping more Americans into the middle class. But the gun issue was inescapable.Hyde Park Academy is roughly a mile from both Mr. Obama's house and, in another direction, from the park where Ms. Pendleton was shot in the back. Immediately she became a tragic symbol not only for the city but the nation.While the impetus for Mr. Obama's postelection call for legislative action against gun violence was a string of mass murders like Newtown, her death came to represent the urban, often gang-related killings that are more typical of the nation's homicide statistics. But they mount perhaps one or two at a time, drawing little notice in more affluent communities. At Ms. Pendleton's funeral, her godfather urged that her death not be politicized, but even he said that she stood for victims of random gun violence nationwide.Mr. Obama's visit followed trips to North Carolina and Georgia to promote the antipoverty proposals — among them initiatives to spur manufacturing innovation centers, provide incentives to cities and states to make preschool available to all 4-year-olds and raise the federal minimum wage.Here he offered new details about an initiative to select 20 communities nationwide as laboratories for better coordinated federal, local, nonprofit and private-sector investments to revitalize long-distressed areas. The communities would be selected over the next several years, administration officials said, from urban and rural applicants that show persistent woes like high joblessness and crime rates, low rates of high school graduation and college attendance and health concerns among residents.For these so-called Promise Zones, Mr. Obama is seeking tax breaks for those who make capital investments in the zones and for employers who hire unemployed residents. But Congress has not passed similar tax incentives that Mr. Obama proposed in the past two years, testifying to the legislative hurdles for the president's second-term agenda.In describing his initiative, Mr. Obama spoke in unusually personal terms, acknowledging that laws alone cannot prevent crime or strengthen families. He said marriage should be encouraged and child support laws changed to get more men working and engaged with their children."As the son of a single mom who gave everything she had to raise me, with the help of my grandparents, you know, I turned out O.K.," he said. Nonetheless, he said, "I wish I had had a father who was around and involved."
DENVER — Lawmakers moved closer on Friday to passing a package of new gun restrictions in Colorado, a state that has lived under the shadow of two of the worst mass shootings in United States history.After hours of debate that lasted well into the evening, Colorado's House of Representatives gave initial approval to legislation requiring background checks on private gun sales and placing limits on ammunition magazines — measures that were being watched nationally by advocates on both sides of the issue.The bills were part of an array of gun proposals being pushed hard by state Democrats this year after the shooting at an Aurora movie theater last summer and the killings at an elementary school in Connecticut in December."There is a common thread that we see in these massacres," said State Representative Rhonda Fields, a Democrat from Aurora who sponsored both pieces of legislation and whose son was shot to death in 2005. "They're using high-capacity magazines so they can unleash as many bullets as they can, to kill as many people as they can, in our schools, our theaters and our churches."The debate over whether to enhance restrictions on firearms has become a contentious focal point of state legislative sessions around the country this year.Perhaps nowhere has this been the case more than in Colorado, a state with deep conservative and independent streaks. But it is also a place that has been pondering tougher guns laws since the Columbine school shooting in 1999, and the increasing influence of Democratic lawmakers in recent years has made gun-control legislation a political possibility.Friday's debate on the House floor capped a week in which gun bills proposed by Democrats cleared several legislative committees, often after lengthy and emotional comments, mostly from proponents of gun rights. Republican legislators argued for hours against the measures, saying the proposed magazine limits — 15 rounds for guns and 8 for shotguns — were merely arbitrary and would have little effect on gun violence."It makes no difference to public safety if there are 10 rounds in a magazine, whether there are 15 rounds in a magazine or whether there are 30 rounds," said State Representative Jared Wright, a Republican from Fruita.Republicans also sharply criticized the background check proposal. Sales of antique guns and gifts of guns between immediate family members would be exempt under the measure.Those buying guns from federally licensed gun dealers must already undergo a background check in Colorado, as they do in every other state under federal law."All this bill does is make us law-abiding citizens go through another hoop," said State Representative Jerry Sonnenberg, a Republican from Sterling. "It doesn't stop criminals, those that can't get background checks, those that are felons, from breaking into my house and stealing my guns. Doesn't stop them from meeting a guy down the street and buying a gun there."But with Democrats holding a majority in the House, both bills received preliminary approval. The bills must receive a final House vote, which could come as early as Monday, before heading to the State Senate, where Democrats also outnumber Republicans."We continue to hear that responsible gun owners do not commit crimes," said State Representative Beth McCann, a Democrat from Denver who sponsored the background check legislation with Ms. Fields. "So it's hard for me to understand how responsible gun owners would have any objections to this bill. All this is doing is requiring everyone to go through the same background check."According to the Brady Campaign to Prevent Gun Violence, Colorado would join California, New York and Rhode Island as states that require sweeping background checks on virtually all gun purchases.Currently, only four states prohibit magazines that hold over 10 rounds, while New Jersey bans magazines with more than 15 rounds and Maryland those with more than 20, the group said.Two other gun measures put forth by Colorado Democrats also received preliminary approval on Friday by House lawmakers. One bill would ban concealed weapons on college campuses. The other would charge gun buyers for background checks.
WASHINGTON — Senator Christopher S. Murphy, Democrat of Connecticut, is haunted by many things that emerged from the investigation of the December mass shooting at a Newtown elementary school. Among them is the nagging question of what prompted the gunman, Adam Lanza, to put down his rifle after killing 20 children and pick up the pistol he used to end his own life."We do know that historically in these instances, amateurs have trouble switching magazines," Mr. Murphy said, referring to the high-capacity ammunition feeding device used by Mr. Lanza to shoot scores of bullets in seconds. "I believe, and many of the parents there believe, that if Lanza had to switch cartridges nine times versus two times there would likely still be little boys and girls alive in Newtown today."It is that conviction that has helped put fresh scrutiny on the size of magazines as Congress debates new gun laws.While influential lawmakers in both parties view a proposed ban on assault weapons as politically toxic, lawmakers seem increasingly open to a ban on high-capacity magazines, like the 15- and 30-round devices that have been used in shooting rampages from Aurora, Colo., to Tucson, where Congresswoman Gabrielle Giffords was shot in the head, to Newtown.Constitutional lawyers, including many conservatives, generally believe that limiting magazine size falls well within the boundaries of recent Supreme Court decisions on gun rights, and evidence suggests that a ban on large magazines would have reduced the number of those killed in mass shootings.A growing number of lawmakers say they see a distinct difference between limits on magazine sizes, which they would support, and an assault weapons ban, which they would not. "I see them as separate," said Senator Angus King Jr., independent of Maine. "It's the difference between appearance and functionality. High-capacity magazines have contributed to a lot of these tragedies."Even Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader who has long stood with the National Rifle Association and remains firmly against an assault weapons ban, has shown receptiveness to a magazine size limit for civilian gun owners. "I think it is something we ought to discuss," he said.But the issue also gives pause to many lawmakers, particularly Senate Democrats up for re-election in states that generally support gun rights. They seem torn over whether a restriction on ammunition erodes the rights of law-abiding gun owners, as its opponents insist, or is merely a mild annoyance for those owners in the name of public safety."I'm ready to step off the status quo on guns," said Senator Mark R. Warner, Democrat of Virginia. "But I've got to work this one through in my mind."In a New York Times/CBS News poll last month of 1,110 adults nationwide, 63 percent of respondents said they would favor a ban on high-capacity magazines, while 34 percent opposed the idea. The N.R.A. has repeatedly and staunchly opposed a ban, arguing that it would have no effect on gun violence and that it would leave such equipment in the hands of criminals alone.In a 2004 report for the National Institute of Justice that studied the impact of the 1994 assault weapons ban (which expired in 2004), the authors found that high-capacity magazines were used in crimes much more often than assault weapons were. They said that guns equipped with those magazines tended to account for a higher share of guns used in the killing of police officers and in mass public shootings, though those are a small percentage of overall gun deaths.Many gun experts and lawmakers believe the two areas ripe for legislative consensus are a bill that would make background checks for gun buyers nearly universal, and a measure that would create a federal statute against straw purchasing, which would give prosecutors better tools to go after people who buy guns that they sell or give to others to commit crimes."If you prioritize things in terms of their value and likelihood of them getting passed," said James Pasco, the executive director of the Fraternal Order of Police, "I don't think there is anyone who will tell you that background checks aren't the most important thing to get done." Law enforcement officials say that combining background checks and straw purchasing penalties would do much to reduce the criminal use of guns.But many lawmakers, gun violence experts and victims argue that large-capacity magazines, which gun rights advocates say are convenient for target shooting, increase carnage in shootings. President Obama has called for a maximum magazine capacity of 10 rounds. The police have said that Adam Lanza had a 30-round magazine on his semiautomatic rifle in Newtown.Mark E. Kelly, Ms. Giffords's husband, testified before the Senate Judiciary Committee in January that Christina Taylor Green, a 9-year-old girl killed in the Tucson shooting, was shot with the 13th bullet in the assailant's gun. "I am 100 percent sure these magazines have an effect on the number of people killed," Mr. Kelly said in a later interview.Such magazines "are so easy to see as a menace to our society," said Senator Frank R. Lautenberg, Democrat of New Jersey, who is sponsoring legislation that seeks to ban the sale of magazines of more than 10 rounds.But gun experts say that standard may be unrealistic, because many handguns are designed to carry more than 10 rounds."We have to consider the millions of weapons out there that will be rendered useless," said Robert A. Levy, a lawyer who was a principal architect of the victorious strategy in the 2008 Supreme Court decision that upheld the rights of residents in the District of Columbia to bear arms, a landmark case for gun rights. Mr. Levy supports a ban on magazines with over 20 rounds, which he said "would rule out very few weapons."As interviews with several lawmakers seemed to underscore, a vote to regulate high-capacity magazines would have to be separate from a bill to renew the assault weapons ban to stand a chance of passage. (Senator Dianne Feinstein, Democrat of California, has offered a bill that does both.)"There is general agreement that when we went after the cosmetic features of the guns, we didn't pay sufficient attention to magazine capacity," said Garen J. Wintemute, the director of the violence prevention research program at the University of California, Davis, referring to the 1994 ban. "Conceptually it has the advantage that you wouldn't be taking anyone's guns away. This is a reasonable price to pay for the benefit to public safety."Senator Mark Pryor, Democrat of Arkansas, shared the view of many conservative Democrats that each piece of gun legislation must be considered separately. "I'm not going to vote for Feinstein's bill," he said. "Beyond that I just want to wait and see what we have."In another sign of the growing focus on gun magazines, Colorado's House of Representatives on Monday narrowly passed a measure that would limit magazines to 15 rounds. Its backers in the Democrat-controlled chamber cited the shootings in Newtown and at an Aurora movie theater in July.
WASHINGTON — Senator Christopher S. Murphy, Democrat of Connecticut, is haunted by many things that emerged from the investigation of the December mass shooting at a Newtown elementary school. Among them is the nagging question of what prompted the gunman, Adam Lanza, to put down his rifle after killing 20 children and pick up the pistol he used to end his own life."We do know that historically in these instances, amateurs have trouble switching magazines," Mr. Murphy said, referring to the high-capacity ammunition feeding device used by Mr. Lanza to shoot scores of bullets in seconds. "I believe, and many of the parents there believe, that if Lanza had to switch cartridges nine times versus two times there would likely still be little boys and girls alive in Newtown today."It is that conviction that has helped put fresh scrutiny on the size of magazines as Congress debates new gun laws.While influential lawmakers in both parties view a proposed ban on assault weapons as politically toxic, lawmakers seem increasingly open to a ban on high-capacity magazines, like the 15- and 30-round devices that have been used in shooting rampages from Aurora, Colo., to Tucson, where Congresswoman Gabrielle Giffords was shot in the head, to Newtown.Constitutional lawyers, including many conservatives, generally believe that limiting magazine size falls well within the boundaries of recent Supreme Court decisions on gun rights, and evidence suggests that a ban on large magazines would have reduced the number of those killed in mass shootings.A growing number of lawmakers say they see a distinct difference between limits on magazine sizes, which they would support, and an assault weapons ban, which they would not. "I see them as separate," said Senator Angus King Jr., independent of Maine. "It's the difference between appearance and functionality. High-capacity magazines have contributed to a lot of these tragedies."Even Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader who has long stood with the National Rifle Association and remains firmly against an assault weapons ban, has shown receptiveness to a magazine size limit for civilian gun owners. "I think it is something we ought to discuss," he said.But the issue also gives pause to many lawmakers, particularly Senate Democrats up for re-election in states that generally support gun rights. They seem torn over whether a restriction on ammunition erodes the rights of law-abiding gun owners, as its opponents insist, or is merely a mild annoyance for those owners in the name of public safety."I'm ready to step off the status quo on guns," said Senator Mark R. Warner, Democrat of Virginia. "But I've got to work this one through in my mind."In a New York Times/CBS News poll last month of 1,110 adults nationwide, 63 percent of respondents said they would favor a ban on high-capacity magazines, while 34 percent opposed the idea. The N.R.A. has repeatedly and staunchly opposed a ban, arguing that it would have no effect on gun violence and that it would leave such equipment in the hands of criminals alone.In a 2004 report for the National Institute of Justice that studied the impact of the 1994 assault weapons ban (which expired in 2004), the authors found that high-capacity magazines were used in crimes much more often than assault weapons were. They said that guns equipped with those magazines tended to account for a higher share of guns used in the killing of police officers and in mass public shootings, though those are a small percentage of overall gun deaths.Many gun experts and lawmakers believe the two areas ripe for legislative consensus are a bill that would make background checks for gun buyers nearly universal, and a measure that would create a federal statute against straw purchasing, which would give prosecutors better tools to go after people who buy guns that they sell or give to others to commit crimes."If you prioritize things in terms of their value and likelihood of them getting passed," said James Pasco, the executive director of the Fraternal Order of Police, "I don't think there is anyone who will tell you that background checks aren't the most important thing to get done." Law enforcement officials say that combining background checks and straw purchasing penalties would do much to reduce the criminal use of guns.But many lawmakers, gun violence experts and victims argue that large-capacity magazines, which gun rights advocates say are convenient for target shooting, increase carnage in shootings. President Obama has called for a maximum magazine capacity of 10 rounds. The police have said that Adam Lanza had a 30-round magazine on his semiautomatic rifle in Newtown.Mark E. Kelly, Ms. Giffords's husband, testified before the Senate Judiciary Committee in January that Christina Taylor Green, a 9-year-old girl killed in the Tucson shooting, was shot with the 13th bullet in the assailant's gun. "I am 100 percent sure these magazines have an effect on the number of people killed," Mr. Kelly said in a later interview.Such magazines "are so easy to see as a menace to our society," said Senator Frank R. Lautenberg, Democrat of New Jersey, who is sponsoring legislation that seeks to ban the sale of magazines of more than 10 rounds.But gun experts say that standard may be unrealistic, because many handguns are designed to carry more than 10 rounds."We have to consider the millions of weapons out there that will be rendered useless," said Robert A. Levy, a lawyer who was a principal architect of the victorious strategy in the 2008 Supreme Court decision that upheld the rights of residents in the District of Columbia to bear arms, a landmark case for gun rights. Mr. Levy supports a ban on magazines with over 20 rounds, which he said "would rule out very few weapons."As interviews with several lawmakers seemed to underscore, a vote to regulate high-capacity magazines would have to be separate from a bill to renew the assault weapons ban to stand a chance of passage. (Senator Dianne Feinstein, Democrat of California, has offered a bill that does both.)"There is general agreement that when we went after the cosmetic features of the guns, we didn't pay sufficient attention to magazine capacity," said Garen J. Wintemute, the director of the violence prevention research program at the University of California, Davis, referring to the 1994 ban. "Conceptually it has the advantage that you wouldn't be taking anyone's guns away. This is a reasonable price to pay for the benefit to public safety."Senator Mark Pryor, Democrat of Arkansas, shared the view of many conservative Democrats that each piece of gun legislation must be considered separately. "I'm not going to vote for Feinstein's bill," he said. "Beyond that I just want to wait and see what we have."In another sign of the growing focus on gun magazines, Colorado's House of Representatives on Monday narrowly passed a measure that would limit magazines to 15 rounds. Its backers in the Democrat-controlled chamber cited the shootings in Newtown and at an Aurora movie theater in July.
STEGER, Ill. — On the second floor of a firehouse in this Chicago suburb, Debbie Halvorson, a candidate for Congress, let the news cameras zoom in as her fingerprints were taken — the final step in her application for a license to carry a concealed firearm in 31 states.Ms. Halvorson does not own a gun. But she is among a crowded field of Democrats vying to fill the House seat vacated by the resignation of Jesse Jackson Jr., and she has been pointedly defending her opposition to some gun-control measures in the final days before the primary on Tuesday.The race has centered on little else since Ms. Halvorson became the chief target of a "super PAC" financed by Michael R. Bloomberg, the billionaire mayor of New York, who has vowed to spend millions to help further his goal of toughening the nation's gun laws.Propelled by a wave of homicides in Chicago and Mr. Bloomberg's plans to spend more than $2 million on the special election here, the campaign has been suddenly thrust, however briefly, into the middle of the national debate over gun control. How the candidates fare in Tuesday's primary could be a bellwether for gun-rights-supporting Democrats who seek office in the political climate after the school shooting in Newtown, Conn."It doesn't matter where the races are; it matters what the issues are within those races," said Stefan Friedman, a spokesman for Mr. Bloomberg's political action committee, Independence USA, which has been criticized by some here for trying to "buy" the election from 800 miles away.Illinois's Second Congressional District, which includes parts of Chicago's South Side and southern suburbs, is the most recent focus of an effort by Mr. Bloomberg to invest some of his personal fortune into influencing the national political debate on issues like gun control, education and same-sex marriage. After forming the super PAC in October, Mr. Bloomberg used the group to spend around $10 million on candidates in the November elections, which he considered a "toe in the water," according to Howard Wolfson, a deputy mayor in the Bloomberg administration.The mayor's message is that "there is a price to be paid for candidates that run with the support of the N.R.A. or run supporting their positions," Mr. Wolfson said.Now, in the early months of a nonelection year, that strategy has homed in on the special election here, where the spending by super PACs, a surprising sum for a single House race, has already shown signs of shifting the balance in a district Ms. Halvorson was once strongly favored to win.In a series of mailers and three television advertisements that have filled the airwaves for the past month, Independence USA has barraged Ms. Halvorson for getting an "A" rating from the National Rifle Association in previous elections and for opposing certain gun control measures, including a ban on assault weapons and high-capacity magazine clips. The group's latest spot also endorsed Robin Kelly, a former state representative, calling her a candidate who would "take on the N.R.A."Just days after the Bloomberg PAC's endorsement, another candidate, Toi Hutchinson, dropped out of the race last weekend and threw her support behind Ms. Kelly.Ms. Hutchinson, an Illinois state senator who was also criticized for getting a favorable rating from the N.R.A., was seen as competing with Ms. Kelly and Anthony Beale, a Chicago city councilman and another gun control advocate, for African-American voters in the black majority district.Splitting the black vote, some leaders in the district believe, could allow Ms. Halvorson, the only white candidate out of 17 Democrats seeking the coveted Congressional seat, to win the nomination with less than 30 percent of the vote — primarily from suburbs.It is in those areas that Ms. Halvorson is hoping the attention being paid to her stance on guns may help widen her base and attract more gun-rights supporters to the polls on Tuesday."I've said this is what's important to me and this is what's important to the district," she said. "If it's not, there are other candidates to vote for, but this is who I am.""Just because I want to have an honest discussion of how we deal with the entire culture of violence, I'm being attacked," added Ms. Halvorson, who does support universal background checks for gun buyers. "To ban one more firearm, all that's going to do is harm the law-abiding citizen."Forced into an awkward spot between not feeding the fire against her and keeping Second Amendment-supporting voters engaged, Ms. Halvorson has said that she has not sought support from any gun groups in this election, despite holding steadfast on her positions.Still, the Illinois State Rifle Association started fighting back on her behalf on Wednesday, sending out a direct mailer to thousands of its members living in the district asking them to vote for Ms. Halvorson, according to Richard A. Pearson, the association's executive director."We can't let that go unanswered," he said of the advertising campaign against her. His group had planned to endorse Ms. Halvorson in a news release on Thursday, but decided not to at the last minute, Mr. Pearson said, though he would not explain why.Five Republican candidates also face one another in Tuesday's primary, but whoever gets the Democratic nomination is almost sure to win the April 9 general election, given the district's overwhelmingly Democratic makeup.Ms. Halvorson, a former state legislator and one-term congresswoman who lost her seat in 2010, got some comparatively modest help from a Houston-based anti-incumbent super PAC when she challenged Mr. Jackson in the Democratic primary last year. Guns were not a major platform for either candidate in that race.Mr. Jackson won re-election in November, then resigned his seat. He pleaded guilty on Wednesday to fraud for spending campaign funds on personal items.Political analysts had expected that the three-month campaign before the special election would center on bringing more economic development to the district. But that issue has been largely overshadowed by the gun violence in Chicago that led to more than 500 homicides last year and at least 52 since the beginning of January.Then came the deluge of advertisements against Ms. Halvorson."I think they've been very effective, simply because they can't be matched," said Dick Simpson, a political scientist at the University of Illinois at Chicago. "Time is running out, and it's not clear she has enough money to change the topic."
Making Guns in Montana: Kalispell, Mont., has become the center of a growing firearms industry, particularly for high-end rifles and industrial rifle parts.BIGFORK, Mont. — Jerry Fisher's big and careful arms cradled a polished cutout of English walnut, which was aging in his workroom like a fine wine. The slight tapering along one edge gave a ghostly hint of its future as the stock of a handmade hunting rifle.His eyebrows lifted as he explained the properties of this piece of walnut. "This wood will assume the moisture content of the atmosphere you store it in," he said. "It takes five or six years to dry it."Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. may feel, as he said Tuesday, that people who want to protect their homes would do best with a simple shotgun. But Mr. Fisher, 82, is aiming at a higher target.A gunsmith whose exquisite firearms, some decorated with designs by fine artists, have attracted customers from around the world, Mr. Fisher built on the work of older gunsmiths in the region, just as younger ones hope to learn from him. He epitomizes the values of the Flathead Valley of northwestern Montana, where people grow up with, relax with and live around guns.Since the 19th century, hunting has been a pastime in the forests that climb up the tiara of rocky peaks around Flathead Lake. Members of the growing group of high-end gunsmiths say it is the mountains, the air and the game that draw them, not the presence of other artisans. But the area's reputation for this kind of gunsmithing has also made it a growing destination for more prosaic manufacturing of gun parts and guns — including high-end semiautomatic rifles and military weapons.In Kalispell, the seat of Flathead County, 250 people earn a living making guns or gun parts, a tenfold increase since 2005. That growth helped mitigate the effects of the recession, which was a body blow to construction, a major local employer. Another longtime industry, logging, has also withered.Clint Walker's company, New Evolution Military Ordnance, became one of the newest entrants in the business within the last couple of years, joining a roster of companies that included Montana Rifle, McGowen Precision Barrels and SI Defense.Mr. Walker, who had been an editor of trade magazines covering video equipment, said Montana Rifle was "doing literally tens of thousands of barrels" for large gunmaking companies back East. "They have to slow down and stop what they are doing to help us out," he said. "And they've done that. They said: 'You guys are local. You're family.' ""That is a large part of the success of this area," Mr. Walker added.To provide trained hands for companies like these, Flathead Valley Community College started a course in gunsmithing last summer. Students learn everything from hollowing out a barrel to checkering a stock — carving fine crosshatched indentations behind the trigger both for decoration and to create a solid grip.Jane A. Karas, a former New Yorker who is the college's president, said the program "focuses on craftsmanship that maintains the historic values" of the area. Her colleague Susan Burch, who worked with a transplanted Oklahoma gunsmith, Brandon Miller, to teach the course, added, "You're looking at the intersection of art and the outdoors."Homicides with guns are relatively rare in the area. There have been three in Kalispell, a city of 20,000 people, out of six murders total in the past 12 years, said Roger Nasset, the local police chief. His officers are never surprised to find a gun inside a car they stop for a traffic violation — and seldom bother to discuss it, much less confiscate it. Montana's laws on gun possession are among the least restrictive in the nation.Guns are not permitted in schoolrooms, but the weapons have been used to raise money for education. Last fall, Stillwater Christian School received more than $20,000 when its parent-teacher organization held a raffle for a locally made semiautomatic AR-15 rifle donated by Mr. Walker, a parent of two young students there."When we did the fund-raiser, it didn't cross my mind, 'Wow, we're donating an assault rifle to a school for a fund-raiser,' " he said. "It was just, 'This is one of the No. 1-selling rifles in America.' "Butch Hurlbert, whose daughter and teenage granddaughter were murdered with a gun near Kalispell on Dec. 25, 2010, blames the killer — his daughter's former boyfriend — and the police, not the gun. Having a gun, he said, "is pretty much just a normal thing."
Both sides in a nation sharply divided over guns seem to agree on at least one thing: a bigger role for the insurance industry in a heavily armed society. But just what that role should be, and whether insurers will choose to accept it, are much in dispute.Lawmakers in at least half a dozen states, including California, Connecticut, Maryland, Massachusetts, New York and Pennsylvania, have proposed legislation this year that would require gun owners to buy liability insurance — much as car owners are required to buy auto insurance. Doing so would give a financial incentive for safe behavior, they hope, as people with less dangerous weapons or safety locks could qualify for lower rates."I believe that if we get the private sector and insurance companies involved in gun safety, we can help prevent a number of gun tragedies every year," said David P. Linsky, a Democratic state representative in Massachusetts who wants to require gun owners to buy insurance. He believes it will encourage more responsible behavior and therefore reduce accidental shootings. "Insurance companies are very good at evaluating risk factors and setting their premiums appropriately," he added.Groups representing gun owners oppose efforts to make insurance mandatory, arguing that law-abiding people should not be forced to buy insurance to exercise their constitutional right to bear arms. But some groups, including the National Rifle Association, endorse voluntary liability policies for their members. And as several states pass laws making it easier for people to carry concealed weapons and use them for self-defense, some gun groups are now selling policies to cover some of the legal costs stemming from self-defense shootings.The United States Concealed Carry Association recently began selling what it calls Self-Defense Shield. "If you're forced to justifiably use your gun in self-defense," its Web site says, "Self-Defense Shield will help pay for your expert pro-2nd Amendment lawyer by reimbursing your legal-defense expenses following your acquittal — an ingenious system critical to the arsenal of any responsibly armed citizen."Premiums for such insurance range from around $200 to $300 per year; in general, the coverage is narrowly written and excludes cases where a gun is used to commit a crime.Some specialized underwriters are reviewing what their policies cover when it comes to shootings, and weighing whether they should offer new types of coverage for gun owners. And as more states pass laws allowing people to bring guns to public venues — including restaurants, bars, churches and the parking lots of their workplaces — some business groups have expressed concerns that they could be held liable for shootings on their properties, which could drive up their insurance costs.On Thursday, when Gov. Dannel P. Malloy of Connecticut outlined his proposals to reduce gun violence — which included universal background checks, a ban on large-capacity ammunition magazines and a stronger assault weapons ban — he called for officials to study "whether owners of firearms should be required to carry additional insurance."The insurance industry is wary of some of the proposals to require gun owners to buy liability coverage — and particularly of bills, like one that was filed in New York that would require coverage for damages resulting not only from negligence but also from "willful acts."Robert P. Hartwig, the president of the Insurance Information Institute, said that insurance generally covered accidents and unintentional acts — not intentional or illegal ones. "Insurance will cover you if your home burns down in an electrical fire, but it will not cover you if you burn down your own house, and you cannot insure yourself for arson," he said.Some claims stemming from shootings have been covered by homeowners' insurance — even by policies that said they did not cover illegal acts.The families of the two students responsible for the 1999 killings at Columbine High School in Colorado were able to use money from their homeowners' policies to settle a lawsuit brought by families of most of the victims. In 2001, a California court ordered an insurance company to defend a policyholder whose 16-year-old son shot and killed a friend with a Beretta handgun that he had found in his mother's coat. But the year before, a North Carolina court ruled that an insurance company did not have to cover the expenses of a policyholder who had shot and wounded a prowler on his property.Christopher J. Monge, an insurance agent and gun owner in Verona, Wis., recently wrote a book, "The Gun Owner's Guide to Insurance for Concealed Carry and Self-Defense," which he sells at gun shows. Mr. Monge said that the problem with most liability insurance is that it promises coverage only in cases of a gun owner's negligence, or an accidental shooting — and not if the gun owner shoots someone intentionally in self-defense. "A negligent act is covered by your liability policy, but if you intentionally shoot somebody, it could be excluded," he said.
WASHINGTON — After weeks of sometimes wrenching debate over gun safety, Congress will begin to consider legislation this week that is likely to include expanded background checks for gun buyers and increased penalties for those who purchase guns for criminals.The best chance at legislative consensus appeared to rest in negotiations between Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, and Senator Tom Coburn, Republican of Oklahoma, over a measure they have yet to introduce that would expand background checks to nearly all gun purchases. Currently about 40 percent of gun purchases do not require them.While Mr. Schumer and Mr. Coburn remain tantalizingly close, Senate aides say, their talks have stalled over a provision that would require records to be kept of private gun sales.Republicans and many Democrats in Congress have historically opposed curbs on gun ownership, but public pressure to enact legislation has increased substantially since the Connecticut school shooting in December that left 20 children dead. Members of the Senate Judiciary Committee are likely to signal their intentions at a hearing on proposed gun legislation on Thursday, offering a preview of how other lawmakers might vote. The bill-writing process will probably continue into next week.Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, has signaled that he would give ample floor time to a gun measure, despite his past opposition to bills he perceived as limiting gun rights.Senator Patrick J. Leahy, a Vermont Democrat who is the chairman of the Judiciary Committee, has said he wants to address gun violence while the memory of the elementary school massacre is still fresh. "I don't think it'll last long," Mr. Leahy said about the window of opportunity in a recent radio interview.President Obama has asked Congress to take up measures that would create a universal background check system for gun sales and enhanced tools to stem "straw purchases" of guns for criminals who cannot pass background checks. He also supports reinstating an assault weapons ban that expired in 2004 and tightening limits on the capacity of some ammunition magazines.Mr. Leahy emphasizes closing loopholes that allow criminals to avoid required background checks and has his own measure — as do Senators Kirsten Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, and Mark Steven Kirk, Republican of Illinois — to increase penalties for straw purchasing and gun trafficking. Law enforcement officials have said they support a crackdown on straw purchases. Senate aides say Mr. Coburn, a longtime gun rights advocate, and Mr. Schumer, who is seeking to protect Democrats up for re-election in 2014 in conservative states, have worked out over 90 percent of their differences on a measure to increase background checks.Under current law, people who buy firearms in a gun shop are subject to a background check using the National Instant Criminal Background Check System, which is intended to weed out people with a criminal history or with documented mental health problems. The system excludes private gun sales, and many states have done a poor job of keeping the system up to date.The Coburn-Schumer measure would strengthen penalties against states that fail to keep their systems current. It would also expand the background checks to many private sales between individuals. Sales between family members would be exempt, and the bill would also have provisions to require more redress for veterans with mental illnesses who are denied firearms, a notion that compelled Mr. Coburn to nearly hold up the completion of a recent bill to finance the Department of Defense in pursuit of such a measure.But the two senators are at odds over whether private sellers should have to keep records of gun transactions, as gun stores must. Mr. Coburn opposes the move because of a fear among some gun rights advocates that it would be a precursor to a national gun registry.Staff members have been working to resolve the issue, but if they do not, Mr. Leahy may proceed with an earlier version of a background check bill that could be amended in the committee or on the Senate floor. "These negotiations are challenging, as you'd expect on an issue as complicated as guns," Mr. Schumer said. "But all of the senators involved are approaching this in good faith."A renewed ban on assault weapons lacks widespread support among senators of both parties, in contrast to the measures intended to reduce gun ownership by criminals and people with mental illnesses. Support for ammunition limits is mixed.
A growing number of shooting enthusiasts are creating legal trusts to acquire machine guns, silencers or other items whose sale is restricted by federal law — a mechanism that bypasses the need to obtain law enforcement approval or even undergo criminal background checks.The trusts, called gun trusts, are intended to allow the owners of the firearms to share them legally with family members and to pass them down responsibly. They have gained in popularity, gun owners say, in part because they may offer protection from future legislation intended to prohibit the possession or sale of the firearms.But because of a loophole in federal regulations, buying restricted firearms through a trust also exempts the trust's members from requirements that apply to individual buyers, including being fingerprinted, obtaining the approval of a chief local law enforcement officer and undergoing a background check.Lawyers who handle the trusts and gun owners who have used them say that a majority of customers who buy restricted firearms through trusts do not do so to avoid such requirements. And most gun dealers continue to require background checks for the representative of the trust who picks up the firearm. But not all do.Christopher J. Dorner, the former Los Angeles police officer who embarked on a weeklong assault on law enforcement officers this month that ended with his death on Feb. 12, said in a rambling 11,000-word manifesto that he had used a gun trust to buy silencers and a short-barreled rifle from a gun store in Nevada without a background check.Referring to a computer program available from the personal finance software company Quicken, Mr. Dorner wrote, "I was able to use a trust account that I created on quicken will maker and a $10 notary charge at a mailbox etc. to obtain them legally." Mr. Dorner was not a felon and probably would have passed a background check had he received one.Mike Campbell, a spokesman for the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, which enforces firearms regulations, said that applications filed with the A.T.F. for transfers of restricted firearms to trusts or corporations have more than doubled in the last four years, to more than 39,000 in 2012 from about 15,000 in 2008. He said the increase was largely attributable to the growth in the number of trusts.Mr. Campbell confirmed that under current regulations, background checks were not required for the buying of restricted firearms through trusts. The agency, he added, was aware of the loophole and was reviewing changes to close it.Lawyers who prepare gun trusts said requests for the documents had been increasing in recent months as proposals for gun legislation proliferated in state legislatures and on Capitol Hill. They said some gun owners were even creating trusts for nonrestricted firearms like semiautomatic rifles and pistols, hoping to protect them against the specter of future legislation.The cost of setting up a trust can vary from a small amount for an online form to $100 to $2,500 in lawyers' fees, depending on location and the type of trust.The sale and possession of silencers, fully automatic guns manufactured before 1986 and other firearms and accessories that fall under the 1934 National Firearms Act are legal in many states. But the A.T.F. keeps a registry of the firearms and must approve their sale, a process that can take several months, and the buyer must pay a $200 tax.J. W. Hagan, a computer administrator in Jacksonville, Fla., said he created a trust to buy silencers, which have become popular for target shooting and hunting and can be owned legally in a growing number of states. He said the trust would ensure that if he died, his firearms would remain legal. The trust would also allow his fiancée to use the silencers once the couple married."If I didn't have a trust, she wouldn't even be able to have the password for my safe," he said.David Goldman, an estate lawyer in Jacksonville who, along with another lawyer in Florida, Bob J. Howell, has helped popularize the use of gun trusts six years ago, said most dealers carried out background checks for restricted firearms. He called the notion that criminals might use the trusts to buy the firearms through a dealer "ridiculous."
CHICAGO — Riding a wave of " super PAC " spending that helped catapult her to the front of a crowded Democratic field, Robin Kelly, whose campaign called for tougher national gun laws, clinched her party's nomination Tuesday in a special primary election for the House seat vacated by Representative Jesse L. Jackson Jr.The outcome of the contest, which had been unexpectedly cast into the center of the national gun debate, was welcome news for Michael R. Bloomberg, the mayor of New York and a staunch gun-control advocate. He poured more than $2.2 million into attacking Ms. Kelly's chief opponent, Debbie Halvorson, this month.Flooding Chicago airwaves, Mr. Bloomberg's super PAC, Independence USA, ran a series of advertisements criticizing Ms. Halvorson for opposing certain gun control measures and endorsing Ms. Kelly as the alternative candidate.The advertising campaign, a huge amount for a single House race, set up Ms. Halvorson's defeat on Tuesday as a shot across the bow to other Democrats supporting gun rights, a sign of what could await future candidates who do not align with Mr. Bloomberg's quest to change firearm laws across the country.Because of the political makeup of the district, Ms. Kelly is now all but certain to win the general election on April 9."We made a concerted effort to say from the very beginning that this was not going to be about money, it was going to be about people," Ms. Halvorson said. "Little did we know how much it wasn't going to be about the money on our part."Mr. Bloomberg has been vocal about his plan to spend some of his personal fortune on candidates who share his views on specific policy issues, including firearms. "As Congress considers the president's gun package," he said in a statement after the Chicago results came in, "voters in Illinois have sent a clear message: we need common-sense gun legislation now."In Illinois's Second Congressional District, which includes parts of the South Side of Chicago and southern suburban counties, Mr. Bloomberg's super PAC financed a wave of mailers and television advertisements that criticized Ms. Halvorson, a former House member, for having gotten an "A" rating from the National Rifle Association in earlier elections and for opposing bans on assault weapons and high-capacity magazine clips.Ms. Halvorson, who supports universal background checks for gun buyers, was forced to defend her positions at campaign stops throughout the district.Last week, the Illinois State Rifle Association responded to Mr. Bloomberg's effort by sending out mailers asking its members in the district to vote for Ms. Halvorson on Tuesday. Ms. Halvorson said she had not asked for the endorsement.She was considered a front-runner after Mr. Jackson resigned in November, just weeks after his re-election. He pleaded guilty last week to one count of fraud for spending campaign money on personal expenses and celebrity memorabilia.Ms. Halvorson, who is white, challenged Mr. Jackson and lost in a primary election last year. She mustered about 29 percent of the vote to Mr. Jackson's 71 percent in the district, which has an African-American majority.This time, a similar showing was thought to be enough to hand Ms. Halvorson a victory. With the chance that other candidates could divide the support of black voters, African-American community leaders raised concerns about the possibility of losing a seat that has been held by a black congressman for three decades.In her victory speech, Ms. Kelly, a former state representative who has worked as a chief of staff for the Illinois state treasurer, told supporters they had sent "a message that tells the N.R.A. that their days of holding our country hostage are coming to an end."Her calls for more gun control came as Chicago has been in the national spotlight for its level of gun violence."Guns were in the air," said Don Rose, a longtime political consultant in Chicago. "It would have gotten some attention anyway, but once Bloomberg put the money in there, he defined it."
WASHINGTON — Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York met separately on Wednesday with Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. and several senators, a day after his campaign for tougher gun laws was newly fortified by the victory of his preferred candidate in a special Congressional primary election in Chicago where he had spent more than $2 million.Meanwhile, a Senate hearing that included witnesses from the shooting in Newtown, Conn., aired exchanges both poignant and petulant. Questions by Republican senators underscored just how difficult a path such gun-control legislation faces despite the national horror over massacres like the one in December at Sandy Hook Elementary School.While much of Washington seemed preoccupied by the partisan budget impasse and countdown to the automatic spending cuts scheduled to begin Friday, the maneuvering over the issue of gun violence was indicative of proponents' efforts to keep it alive even as many fear that the sense of urgency after the Newtown shootings is waning. Speaking to reporters on leaving his White House meeting with Mr. Biden, Mr. Bloomberg took some credit for the victory by Robin Kelly, the Cook County chief administrative officer, in Tuesday's crowded Democratic primary race for the House seat vacated by Jesse L. Jackson Jr.The mayor's "super PAC" independently funneled $2.2 million into the campaign on advertisements that extolled Ms. Kelly and her support for national gun legislation and criticized a leading rival who opposed banning assault weapons and was endorsed by the National Rifle Association. Victory in the Democratic primary is considered tantamount to election in the heavily Democratic House district. The election is next month.Mr. Bloomberg told the reporters that the Kelly primary victory was a sign of what can happen when the public stands up to the gun lobby. Yet analysts in both parties and on both sides of the gun issue cautioned against reading too much into the outcome in a big-city, heavily black district where firearms restrictions generally are popular.Mr. Biden, who since the Newtown massacre has been leading the Obama administration's push for legislation, has met with Mr. Bloomberg several times to coordinate that effort. The mayor also met Wednesday with the Senate majority leader, Senator Harry Reid, Democrat of Nevada, who controls that body's schedule, and with three Republican senators whose willingness to compromise is crucial to any gun legislation's success: Susan Collins of Maine, Mark Steven Kirk of Illinois, both moderates, and John McCain of Arizona.John Feinblatt, the mayor's chief policy adviser, said Mr. Bloomberg "talked about his concern that the Senate listen to the American people, who clearly want something done about gun violence."The Senate Judiciary Committee's hearing was on a bill, sponsored by Senator Dianne Feinstein, Democrat of California, to ban certain semiautomatic weapons like the one used in Newtown.Neil Heslin, whose 6-year-old son, Jesse, was killed at Sandy Hook, wept as he recalled his last minutes with Jesse that morning and then how he waited that night in a nearby firehouse until 1 a.m. for confirmation that his son was among the dead.Holding a framed portrait of himself and his son, Mr. Heslin told how he and Jesse had stopped before school at a deli, where Jesse ordered his favorite breakfast: sausage, egg and cheese on a hard roll, and hot chocolate — his "coffee," like Dad drank. The clock at Sandy Hook Elementary read 9:04 a.m. when he dropped Jesse off, Mr. Heslin said, and his son "hugged me and held me, and I can still feel that hug and that pat on the back.""He said, 'Everything is going to be O.K., Dad. It's all going to be O.K.,' "Mr. Heslin continued. "And it wasn't O.K. I have to go home at night to an empty house without my son."Dr. William Begg, the physician on duty in the emergency room where the Newtown victims were brought, played a video of two bullets being fired into beige, gelatinous material resembling flesh. One was from a handgun, the other from an AR-15, a popular style of assault rifle. The footage revealed far more tearing and damage from the AR-15.Dr. Begg, a box of tissues at his side on the witness table, choked up as he read statistics about the frequency of mass shootings in the United States compared with the rest of the world. "This is a tipping point, and this is a public health issue," he told the senators. "Please make the right decision."But in a tense back-and-forth, Senator Lindsey Graham, Republican of South Carolina, told another witness, Edward A. Flynn, Milwaukee's chief of police, that the problem was not guns, but those who wielded them."I own an AR-15," Mr. Graham said. "And you may not understand why I want to own an AR-15, and I may not understand what movies you want to watch. But we're talking about trying to solve a problem that has, as its central core, that the people who are committing these crimes should never have any gun or one bullet."
On a Monday evening in early February, two months into a national debate over gun violence after the massacre at a Connecticut elementary school, representatives of the firearms industry were wining and dining lawmakers in Washington.The occasion was the "Changing of the Guard" reception and dinner for the incoming leadership of the Congressional Sportsmen's Caucus, which counts more than 250 members in the House and Senate. Hosting the gathering was a little-known but well-connected organization, the Congressional Sportsmen's Foundation.Despite its low profile, the foundation has close ties to members of Congress, allowing its donors, who give as much as $100,000 a year, to mix with lawmakers at shooting contests, banquets and wine tastings. The food and drink at last month's gathering were paid for in part by the National Rifle Association and the trade group for the gun industry.Over the past year, sportsmen's caucus members have clinked glasses and puffed cigars at a "Wine, Wheels and Wildlife" fund-raiser at a North Carolina vineyard, a "Whiskies of the World" and cigar reception on Capitol Hill, and a "Stars and Stripes Shootout" in Tampa, Fla., where the top shooting awards went to a Republican congressman and a lobbyist for the N.R.A. Such events provide the firearms industry and other foundation donors with a tax-deductible means of lobbying the elected officials who shape policies important to their businesses.A private charity not affiliated with the government, the foundation carries the cachet of its relationship with the sportsmen's caucus in Congress, which it provides with research on policies affecting hunting and fishing. But while ostensibly focused on those outdoor pursuits, it also presses issues important mainly to the gun industry, which is one of its largest contributors.The foundation opposes restrictions on high-capacity ammunition magazines, a ban on military-style AR-15 rifles and the imprinting of bullets with traceable serial numbers to help solve crimes. All of those proposals have surfaced in the current legislative debate, which is expected to continue Thursday when a Senate Judiciary Committee considers a bill to curb illegal gun trafficking.The foundation says its positions fit naturally with its mission "to work with Congress, governors and state legislatures to protect and advance hunting, recreational angling, and shooting and trapping.""There is significant overlap between access to firearms and the ability to participate in hunting and recreational shooting activities," it said in a statement.Others see the linkage to hunting as part of a calculated effort by the firearms industry to advance policies that have little to do with outdoor sports. Representative Bill Pascrell Jr., a New Jersey Democrat who as a co-chairman of the law enforcement caucus has butted heads with the sportsmen's caucus on gun issues, said pro-gun groups had stoked fear in Congress by portraying any limits on firearms as a threat to legitimate pastimes like hunting."They see this as if they give in on any one item, it will put them on a slippery slope to coming into your home and taking your guns away," Mr. Pascrell said. "They're creating hysteria."Lawmakers have long formed caucuses on specific subjects as varied as drug addiction and capital gains taxes. Special interests often press their cases with caucus members, sometimes through receptions, trips and fund-raisers. But most caucuses do not have foundations or institutes set up specifically for that purpose, and financed with private contributions.Established in 1989 as the Congressional Sportsmen's Caucus Foundation — the word "caucus" was dropped in 1994 — the foundation is a nonprofit charity under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, meaning it can accept unlimited, tax-deductible donations. Its charitable purpose, according to tax records, is to "provide scientific research, wildlife management, public education and conservation information." It says it does this by giving nonpartisan "advice, support and information" to the sportsmen's caucus and elected state officials.Many of its programs focus on wildlife conservation, on open space and on hunting, including an annual report on its economic benefits. It has held briefings or issued policy statements on opening public lands and waterways for hunting and fishing, easing limits on imports of skins and other trophies from polar bear hunting and opposing regulation of the lead content in fishing-line sinkers. But it also backs gun-industry positions whose relevance to its historical focus on hunting and fishing is indirect at best.
WASHINGTON — The Senate Judiciary Committee on Thursday approved a measure that would make the practice of illegally buying a gun for someone else a felony, and increase penalties for the crime.The measure, which addresses a practice known as straw purchasing, passed the committee by 11 to 7; the only Republican to vote in favor was Senator Charles E. Grassley of Iowa. Mr. Grassley's nod on the measure, which already had two Republican co-sponsors, was significant because he is the most senior member of the committee. The panel is made up of 10 Democrats and 8 Republicans.Some Republicans on the committee spoke out against the bill, including Senator John Cornyn of Texas, who said the legislation seemed intended "to show we are doing something," but in the end would not be effective in halting gun crimes.Preventing people from buying guns for people with criminal records and others who cannot pass a background check, which also leads to illegal gun traffic across state lines, is but one part of President Obama's regulatory agenda for guns.Mr. Obama has also called for the reinstatement of the assault weapons ban, a limit on the capacity of magazines and the expansion of background checks to private sales of guns.The assault weapons ban, which has been championed by Senator Dianne Feinstein, Democrat of California, was one of four measures the committee set out to consider Thursday. Citing support for a ban from law enforcement, medical, women's and other groups, Ms. Feinstein, sounding frustrated and depressed at the political momentum against her bill, said, "And yet it's as if we have a minority insubstantial piece of legislation."The committee is also considering reauthorization of a program that provides matching grants for school safety improvements, as well as a measure that would greatly expand background checks for gun buyers, with the goal of preventing sales to people with criminal records or a history of mental illness.The main sponsor of the bill dealing with background checks, Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, has had trouble finding a Republican strongly supportive of gun rights to join him because of disagreements over record keeping in private sales.The committee will probably vote to pass the measure without the support of any Republicans; the bill would then have to be amended on the Senate floor or replaced with a bipartisan consensus measure if Mr. Schumer can persuade a Republican to join forces with him.Most gun safety experts say they believe that straw-purchasing and background check measures work in tandem. A failure by Congress to pass more than a modified straw-purchasing bill would be a victory for the National Rifle Association, which opposes each measure.Shortly after their vote on the straw-purchasing bill on Thursday, the committee ended its work, apparently to accommodate a classified briefing for some of the members, and completion of its work was postponed until next Tuesday.Mr. Grassley's support for the straw purchase bill came in part for an agreement on his amendment requiring a high-level person at the Department of Justice to personally sign off on future "gun-walking" sting operations similar to the Fast and Furious investigation. A gun that was allowed to pass into Mexico during that investigation was later found at the scene of a shootout in which a Border Patrol agent was killed.
DENVER — After months of emotional debate, an effort to tighten gun laws in a state haunted by two mass shootings moved toward an uncertain climax on Friday as Colorado's State Senate began a marathon session on a range of new firearms restrictions.Democrats, who hold a narrow majority in the chamber, have expressed guarded hopes for the measures. On Friday, the full Senate gave preliminary approval to bills that would create universal background checks, require gun buyers to pay for background checks and keep guns away from domestic abusers. A debate over limiting the size of ammunition magazines loomed as one of the most divisive issues.The most significant bills up for debate have cleared the Democrat-controlled Colorado House and are supported by Gov. John W. Hickenlooper, a Democrat.But in the State Senate, the margins are thin. Two Democrats have already said they oppose a bill restricting magazine sizes to 15 rounds. And Republicans, united in opposition, have signaled that they will spend hours and hours arguing against the bills, setting the stage for a late-night session that could delay some votes until well into the weekend."They all go after the same thing: Let's somehow get the guns out of the hands of the citizens and somehow, it'll all be better," said Senator Kevin Lundberg, a Republican from northern Colorado. "It's the good guys who are going to give you the guns. It's the bad guys who are going to keep them."As the day wore on, the Republican senators talked.They read letters from their constituents. They warned that the gun legislation would drive away businesses like Magpul, a magazine manufacturer, and a producer filming shows for the Outdoor Channel.They referred to Paul Revere, the founders, the film "Minority Report." They blamed East Coast interest groups and Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York — a fierce advocate of gun control — for tainting the debate in Colorado.They talked about being hunters and sport-shooters and about the role of guns in their families' heritage and Colorado's history. They described their own wrenching experiences as witnesses of domestic violence — or collateral victims — while opposing a bill that would require perpetrators of domestic violence to give up their guns.The measure on gun possession and domestic violence won initial approval on Friday afternoon. Also approved was a bill that would require in-person training, rather than online-only classes, for Coloradans who want a concealed-weapons permit.Early in the day, cheers and whoops rang through the gold-domed Capitol as House lawmakers gave final approval to a bill that would allow illegal immigrants who graduate from Colorado high schools to pay in-state tuition at state colleges. Until now, such students have had to pay the higher out-of-state rates.Immigration advocates hailed the measure, and Governor Hickenlooper said he would sign it.
To enter the sand-colored building, most people — schoolchildren on field trips, out-of-state tourists — must wait in line to pass through a security area outfitted with metal detectors and scanners. But those with state licenses to carry concealed firearms can enter in a matter of seconds. They simply hand their permit to a state trooper, who verifies its authenticity. No metal detector needed.Just as Texas has long embraced its guns, so has the Capitol. Legislators have walked the terrazzo hallways, attended committee hearings, met with constituents in their offices and voted on the floors of their respective chambers while armed with licensed high-powered pistols tucked beneath their suits or slipped into their boots or purses.Despite the widespread acceptance of concealed weapons, many lawmakers do not speak so freely about their weaponry. Discretion is a key element of the Capitol's gun culture: One reason those with licenses were given a separate security lane was to avoid having them take out their guns before passing through the metal detectors.But of the 181 members of the State House and Senate, dozens have concealed-carry permits and routinely have their weapons with them in the building, current and former lawmakers said. Jerry Patterson, the state land commissioner and a former senator who wrote the concealed handgun law, put the number at around 35 legislators. Others said Mr. Patterson's estimate was too high, and others, including Alice Tripp, legislative director of the Texas State Rifle Association, the state affiliate of the National Rifle Association, said it was too low."I'd say half the House and half the Senate," she said. "There's a couple who, I used to say, their desks would qualify as a gun show."At recent hearings of the House Committee on County Affairs, Representative Jonathan Stickland sat listening to testimony while wearing a .40-caliber semiautomatic pistol."This is probably one of the most well-armed buildings in the state," said Mr. Stickland, a freshman Republican from Bedford, near Fort Worth. "When you grow up around guns and you feel comfortable with what they can do, and you know how to use them and you respect them, there's really nothing to fear."Anyone trying to understand why the gun debate has played out differently in Texas should visit the 124-year-old center of state government. The normalcy of firearms in the Capitol — the ease with which those with concealed handguns enter the building, and legislators' habit of wearing their weapons in their offices or on the House or Senate floor — reflects the normal nature of firearms throughout Texas.The recent rush of bills seeking to expand and promote gun rights in the state — allowing concealed firearms on college campuses, making Texas Independence Day on March 2 a tax-free holiday for gun purchases — were fine-tuned by armed staff members and filed by armed legislators as armed Texans strolled the halls.When metal detectors were temporarily installed outside the third-floor galleries of the House and Senate chambers a few years ago, one lobbyist recalled that some House members used their offices as "gun-checks" where constituents could store their weapons and pick them up later. When Gov. Rick Perry gave his State of the State speech in February 2011 in the House chamber, he stood a short distance from Representative Chuck Hopson, who paid close attention with a .22-caliber five-shot revolver in his right boot and a .357 Magnum within arm's reach in a drawer of his desk.Many Texas lawmakers were some of the first to undergo criminal background checks and complete hours of training to receive a concealed handgun permit after the state law passed in 1995.They described carrying weapons in the Capitol as a personal security habit, doing what they did elsewhere in the state, whether shopping, dining, praying or driving. They also wear their weapons, they said, for the same reason they keep jacks in their vehicles and fresh batteries in their smoke detectors at home. They said there was a difference between being paranoid and being prepared.
South Dakota became the first state in the nation to enact a law explicitly authorizing school employees to carry guns on the job, under a measure signed into law on Friday by Gov. Dennis Daugaard.Passage of the law comes amid a passionate nationwide debate over arming teachers, stoked after 20 first graders died in an elementary school shooting in Newtown, Conn., in December. Shortly afterward, the National Rifle Association proposed a plan for armed security officers in every school, and legislation to allow school personnel to carry guns was introduced in about two dozen states. All those measures had stalled until now.Several other states already have provisions in their laws — or no legal restrictions — that make it possible for teachers to possess guns in the classroom. In fact, a handful of school districts nationwide do have teachers who carry firearms. But South Dakota is the only known state with a statute that specifically authorizes teachers to possess a firearm in a K-12 school, according to Lauren Heintz, a research analyst at the National Conference of State Legislatures.Representative Scott Craig, a freshman Republican in the South Dakota House who sponsored the bill, said he hoped the measure would shift the country's discourse on school safety."Given the national attention to safety in schools, specifically in response to tragedies like in Connecticut, this is huge," he said. He added that, hopefully, "dominoes will start to fall, people will see it's reasonable, it's safer than they think, it's proactive and it's preventive."The law leaves it up to school districts to decide whether to allow armed teachers. It remains to be seen, however, if many schools will permit guns in classrooms and whether the measure will reverberate nationwide. Mr. Daugaard, a Republican, said he did not think that many schools would take advantage of the option, but that it was important for them to have the choice available.While many gun control advocates are horrified by the notion of guns in schools, Laura Cutilletta, a senior staff lawyer with the San Francisco-based Law Center to Prevent Gun Violence, said that what South Dakota did would not spark a national trend. "For South Dakota to do this is less of a concern than if we saw it in Colorado or somewhere else like that," she said, referring to states that have advocated for gun-control legislation.Andrew Arulanandam, a spokesman for the National Rifle Association, said the group supported the bill and lobbied for it in the South Dakota Legislature. "There's certainly not a one-size-fits-all approach to keeping our children safe in schools," he said. "It's incumbent upon state and local governments to formulate and implement a plan to keep students safe."The law says that school districts may choose to allow a school employee, a hired security officer or a volunteer to serve as a "sentinel" who can carry a firearm in the school. The school district must receive the permission of its local law enforcement agency before carrying out the program. The law requires the sentinels to undergo training similar to what law enforcement officers receive."I think it does provide the same safety precautions that a citizen expects when a law enforcement officer enters onto a premises," Mr. Daugaard said in an interview. He added that this law was more restrictive than those in other states that permit guns in schools.South Dakota is a state with deep roots in hunting, where children start learning how to shoot BB guns when they are 8, skeet shoot with shotguns by age 14 and enter target shooting contests with .22-caliber semiautomatic rifles."Our kids start hunting here when they're preteens," said Kevin Jensen, who supports the bill and is the vice president of the Canton School Board in South Dakota. "We know guns. We respect guns."Opponents, which included state associations representing school boards and teachers, said the bill was rushed, did not make schools safer and ignored other approaches to safety.
The share of American households with guns has declined over the past four decades, a national survey shows, with some of the most surprising drops in the South and the Western mountain states, where guns are deeply embedded in the culture.The gun ownership rate has fallen across a broad cross section of households since the early 1970s, according to data from the General Social Survey, a public opinion survey conducted every two years that asks a sample of American adults if they have guns at home, among other questions.The rate has dropped in cities large and small, in suburbs and rural areas and in all regions of the country. It has fallen among households with children, and among those without. It has declined for households that say they are very happy, and for those that say they are not. It is down among churchgoers and those who never sit in pews.The household gun ownership rate has fallen from an average of 50 percent in the 1970s to 49 percent in the 1980s, 43 percent in the 1990s and 35 percent in the 2000s, according to the survey data, analyzed by The New York Times.In 2012, the share of American households with guns was 34 percent, according to survey results released on Thursday. Researchers said the difference compared with 2010, when the rate was 32 percent, was not statistically significant.The findings contrast with the impression left by a flurry of news reports about people rushing to buy guns and clearing shop shelves of assault rifles after the massacre last year at an elementary school in Newtown, Conn."There are all these claims that gun ownership is going through the roof," said Daniel Webster, the director of the Johns Hopkins Center for Gun Policy and Research. "But I suspect the increase in gun sales has been limited mostly to current gun owners. The most reputable surveys show a decline over time in the share of households with guns."That decline, which has been studied by researchers for years but is relatively unknown among the general public, suggests that even as the conversation on guns remains contentious, a broad shift away from gun ownership is under way in a growing number of American homes. It also raises questions about the future politics of gun control. Will efforts to regulate guns eventually meet with less resistance if they are increasingly concentrated in fewer hands — or more resistance?Detailed data on gun ownership is scarce. Though some states reported household gun ownership rates in the 1990s, it was not until the early 2000s that questions on the presence of guns at home were asked on a broad federal public health survey of several hundred thousand people, making it possible to see the rates in all states.But by the mid-2000s, the federal government stopped asking the questions, leaving researchers to rely on much smaller surveys, like the General Social Survey, which is conducted by NORC, a research center at the University of Chicago.Measuring the level of gun ownership can be a vexing problem, with various recent national polls reporting rates between 35 percent and 52 percent. Responses can vary because the survey designs and the wording of questions differ.But researchers say the survey done by the center at the University of Chicago is crucial because it has consistently tracked gun ownership since 1973, asking if respondents "happen to have in your home (or garage) any guns or revolvers."The center's 2012 survey, conducted mostly in person but also by phone, involved interviews with about 2,000 people from March to September and had a margin of sampling error of plus or minus three percentage points.Gallup, which asks a similar question but has a different survey design, shows a higher ownership rate and a more moderate decrease. No national survey tracks the number of guns within households.Andrew Arulanandam, a spokesman for the National Rifle Association, said he was skeptical that there had been a decline in household ownership. He pointed to reports of increased gun sales, to long waits for gun safety training classes and to the growing number of background checks, which have surged since the late 1990s, as evidence that ownership is rising."I'm sure there are a lot of people who would love to make the case that there are fewer gun owners in this country, but the stories we've been hearing and the data we've been seeing simply don't support that," he said.
DENVER — Colorado took a major step late Friday toward enacting some of the toughest new gun measures that have been introduced since the mass shooting at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Connecticut touched off a national debate about gun control.After more than 12 hours of emotional and bitterly divided debate, the Democratic-controlled State Senate gave preliminary approval to a package of gun bills. At its heart are measures that would require universal background checks for private gun sales and limit ammunition magazines to 15 rounds.Other measures would create a fee for background checks; require those convicted of domestic abuse to surrender their firearms; and require residents applying for permits to carry concealed weapons to take in-person training classes, outlawing the handful of online-only courses now offered in the state.If the bills win final approval — they must now survive a recorded vote from lawmakers this week — they would be Colorado's first new firearms restrictions in more than a decade. Their passage in a state with a deep history and culture of hunting, sport shooting and gun ownership would also represent a significant victory for gun control advocates.To Democrats, who now control both chambers of the Statehouse as well as the governor's office, the measures are moderate solutions intended to stem a tide of gun violence and mass shootings, like the massacres at Columbine High School in 1999 and at an Aurora movie theater in July. Some Democrats spoke of being gun owners and hunters and said the new restrictions would not ban weapons or amount to the "gun grab" opponents warn of.Unlike lawmakers in New York, Democrats here did not pursue a ban on assault-style rifles. And on Friday, they withdrew two bills that faced wavering support from fellow Democrats and unified opposition from Republicans. Those would have banned concealed weapons from college campuses and would have made some gun makers and dealers liable for deaths and injuries involving their firearms.Republicans called the effort misguided and futile, saying the bills strip law-abiding gun owners of their Second Amendment rights while doing little to keep guns and bullets away from criminals. In speech after speech, hour after hour, they warned that the measures would drive businesses away, keep hunters at bay and ultimately be a political millstone for Democrats."I really believe this will represent an Alamo for freedom-loving Coloradans," said Senator Greg Brophy, a Republican. "This is an immediate threat to them, and the backlash will be severe."Gov. John W. Hickenlooper, a Democrat, has said he will support the package.Among those absent from the drama inside the State Capitol on Friday was Dave Hoover, a police sergeant whose nephew, A. J. Boik, was among the 12 people killed in Aurora. Since the shooting, Mr. Hoover has spoken out for new gun laws.On Saturday morning, his feelings were bittersweet."You have to realize that none of this will ever bring back our family," Mr. Hoover said. "We may have some responsible gun laws in our state now, but that doesn't change what our family goes through every day. It's good to see some change, and it's good to see some people paying attention. It's not going to do us any good. We've already gone through so much."
The national debate over firearms regulation is often presented as a battle of extremes: those who view any effort to tighten gun laws as an infringement of rights versus those who see guns as a menace to society.But gun owners like Michael Kundu come from a largely unexplored middle ground — a place of nuance and contradiction.Mr. Kundu is a master marksman from rural Washington who owns pistols and assault rifles for self-defense, all while claiming to detest the presence of guns in his life and in the broader American culture."I'd love to see all guns destroyed," he said. "But I'm not giving up mine first."Mr. Kundu, 48, who works for the federal government, is a conflicted gun owner, one of many such Americans whom researchers and social scientists are just beginning to study as a potentially moderating influence in the escalating gun debate.In Mr. Kundu's case, the conflict is that he enjoys competitive shooting even as he perceives danger in what he describes as a local arms race that he feels powerless to escape.Out of "common sense," he said, he needs to be as armed as his neighbors, some of whom he describes as troublemakers with assault rifles. "It is so discouraging, so paranoia-inducing," he said. "It makes one feel as though you've got to be continually vigilant and defensive instead of living your life free."Other gun owners interviewed for this article expressed similar reservations, citing their enjoyment of hunting or of introducing family members to the sport while expressing support for stricter gun control legislation. Mr. Kundu, for instance, supports a ban on the kind of assault weapon that he owns, a rifle manufactured by Panther Arms.It is these voices of ambivalence that policy makers say are likely to be drowned out by the passion at the extreme ends."Their views don't get represented in the debate, and it's one of the consequences of the polarized nature of our politics," said Patrick J. Egan, an assistant professor of politics and public policy at New York University. "If all sides had more of an incentive to moderate their arguments in a way that would be appealing to people like this, you could imagine it being a more constructive conversation than it currently is."Clearly, not all gun owners are Second Amendment absolutists. Many recent surveys show that majorities of gun owners do favor certain gun control proposals, like making private gun sales subject to background checks. But the extent to which gun owners feel of two minds about owning guns is something polls and surveys typically do not address."We've been struggling with this whole realm of issues — feelings about guns," said Michael Dimock, the director of the Pew Research Center for the People and the Press. "And that's because we've talked a lot about gun policy, but not about gun culture."In a survey it began conducting last month, Pew for the first time asked gun-owning respondents "whether they enjoy having guns, whether they feel uncomfortable about them, and whether they feel safer for having them," Mr. Dimock said. Those results are expected to be published in a coming report."I think it's easy for a lot of people to assume that all gun owners oppose gun control and all nonowners favor it," he said. "But our polling data suggests that the correlation is nothing like that. Rather, most Americans appear to have mixed feelings about gun laws."Kay H. Wilson, a blogger in Waco, Tex., who recently wrote a post about her "love-hate relationship with guns," said, "We need people to speak up." Ms. Wilson describes herself as "a pretty good dang shot" when she practices her aim at a family farm in West Texas, but also said, "I'm no lover of the personal handgun."While she and her husband, Richard, have a gun in their suburban home for personal protection, they store it and the bullets in separate rooms. And Ms. Wilson acknowledges that she would sooner throw her cat at an intruder than shoot someone. The gun does not make her feel safer.
WASHINGTON — The Senate Judiciary Committee on Tuesday passed two measures intended to curb gun violence, and the bills are now likely to go to the Senate floor for a full vote. But the committee postponed a vote on the most contentious measure — a proposal to reinstate an assault weapons ban — because its sponsor, Senator Dianne Feinstein of California, was not at the committee's meeting.The first measure, which would expand the use of background checks to private gun sales, passed 10 to 8, with no Republican voting yes. Another bill, offered by Senator Barbara Boxer of California, enjoyed bipartisan support.That measure would renew a grant program to help schools improve security over a 10-year period and increase financing for it to $40 million per year from $30 million. It would create a joint task force of the Justice and Education Departments to develop school safety guidelines. The bill passed in a 14-to-4 vote, with all the no votes cast by Republicans.The committee approved a measure last week that would make the already illegal practice of buying a gun for someone else — known as a straw purchase — a felony and to increase penalties for the crime. The vote was significant because it was supported by Senator Charles E. Grassley of Iowa, the committee's senior Republican, signaling that the measure may well pass the full Senate this spring.The bills, varied in their approach, represent part of President Obama's gun-safety agenda.Shortly after the mass shooting in Newtown, Conn., that killed 20 children in December, there seemed to be momentum in the Senate for a bill requiring a universal background check, which law enforcement officials say would go hand in hand with enhanced penalties for straw purchases because it would help identify more criminals and mentally ill people who seek to buy guns.But the bill's main sponsor, Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, has had trouble finding a Republican to join him and bring others along. He initially seemed to find support from Senator Tom Coburn of Oklahoma, who walked away over disagreements about record keeping in private sales; Mr. Schumer says such records, already kept in gun store transactions, are needed to make the checks meaningful, but Mr. Coburn fears they will lead to a gun registry.Mr. Grassley gave voice to those worries during the hearing on Tuesday, saying there was "no way to enforce a requirement without a registry." While noting that such a registry is prohibited under federal law, he added that the government could move to repeal that law and that the "next move will be gun confiscation." Mr. Grassley also repeated a concern of opponents of universal background checks that such a law would lead more criminals to make straw purchases or steal firearms.Mr. Schumer, though clearly open to watering down his bill, sounded frustrated as he tried to counter Mr. Grassley's arguments."This idea that this will lead to a national registry or confiscation — that to me demeans the argument," he said.Conceding that some criminals would still obtain guns under an enhanced background check, he said, "You don't use that on any other law," like those meant to check "terrorism or robbery or murder.""We never see the argument, 'We shouldn't have laws because the bad people will get around them anyway,' " he said.The committee will vote Thursday on the assault weapon ban, a measure that would also reduce the legal size of some ammunition magazines.Once the committee's work is done on Thursday, it will be up to Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, to decide which of the measures to bring to the Senate floor, setting up tough votes for many lawmakers who are torn between the wishes of constituents who view even modest gun-safety measures as an infringement on their Second Amendment rights and those who would like to see Congress take some action. Should a straw purchase bill be the only one to pass, it would be a significant defeat for the Obama administration and a renewed demonstration of the National Rifle Association's power.
WASHINGTON — With gun safety measures headed to the Senate floor, members of the House and Senate appropriations committees have quietly made permanent four formerly temporary gun-rights provisions largely favored by Republicans. Those provisions are part of a spending bill that would keep the government running through Sept. 30.The provisions, which have been renewed separately at various points, would prohibit the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives from requiring gun dealers to conduct annual inventories to ensure that they have not lost guns or had them stolen, and would retain a broad definition of "antique" guns that can be imported into the United States outside of normal regulations.Another amendment would prevent the A.T.F. from refusing to renew a dealer's license for lack of business; many licensed dealers who are not actively engaged in selling firearms can now obtain a license to sell guns and often fly under the radar of the agency and other law enforcement officials, which gun control advocates argue leads to a freer flow of illegal guns.A final measure would require the bureau to attach a disclaimer to data about guns to indicate that it "cannot be used to draw broad conclusions about firearms-related crimes."Officials from the A.T.F. have long complained that quirky laws passed by Congress hamstring their ability to curb gun crimes. For example, under federal laws the bureau is prohibited from creating a federal registry of gun transactions, making it hard to track illegal guns.Many of the provisions have been regularly added to appropriations bills since 2004. But Senate Democrats on the committee — pushed by Republicans and some Democrats who have made gun rights a signature issue — reluctantly agreed to make them permanent to stave off what they saw as an even more far-reaching House version of the bill.The House offering contained a new rider that would prevent the A.T.F. from requiring gun dealers on the Southwest border to notify the agency when selling two or more long guns — semiautomatic rifles, higher than .22 caliber with detachable magazines — to the same buyer within five days. These firearms are the preferred weapons of Mexican drug cartels, Senate aides said."The Second Amendment is a fundamental right guaranteed by our Constitution," said Senator Mitch McConnell of Kentucky, the Republican leader, in a statement about the provisions. "And we should protect it wherever we can."As part of his agenda to regulate some firearms, President Obama recently signed an executive order lifting the ban on gun research. Other restrictions sought by the White House after the Newtown, Conn., shooting in December must go through Congress.On Thursday, the Senate Judiciary Committee will consider the renewal of an assault weapons ban and restrictions on magazine sizes. This week, the panel passed a measure that would expand the use of background checks to private gun sales, and another to renew a grant program to help schools improve security. The committee also approved a measure last week that would make the already illegal practice of buying a gun for someone else who is legally barred from having one — known as a straw purchase — a felony and to increase penalties for the crime.The debate in the Judiciary Committee will end Thursday, moving consideration of gun legislation to the Senate floor and perhaps the House, where members have indicated they might consider any legislation that the Senate passes.But any legislation that comes to the Senate floor could be undermined by riders on appropriations bills like the one being debated on the floor now, which would keep the government running through the end of September. The Senate is trying to pass a short-term measure to prevent the government from shutting down, as members from both parties and chambers go about the business of creating actual budgets. For the last two years, Republicans and Democrats have fought over these short-term spending agreements, over the amount in them and the policy riders that Republicans often attach to them as part of the deal.These riders are a boon to Senate Republicans, particularly those who are strong advocates of Second Amendment rights, and a bit of an embarrassment to some Democrats on the Senate Appropriations Committee, who are trying to avoid policy riders and also not handcuff their colleagues who are active in creating new gun legislation.Even though the gun-rights provisions are long standing, making them permanent is "counterproductive," said Garen J. Wintemute, the director of the violence prevention research program at the University of California, Davis. "Regular inventories help identify retailers who are not adequately protecting their firearms from loss or theft and, more important, those who are letting firearms go out the back door and declaring them lost or stolen," he said.
WASHINGTON — The Senate Judiciary Committee on Thursday approved a measure to reinstate a ban on assault weapons in the first major Congressional test of the issue since the law expired in 2004. But the ban remains unlikely to clear the full Senate.Still, the committee's passage of the bill, along with three other measures that previously cleared the panel, demonstrated momentum by lawmakers who have sought new gun regulations after the school shooting in Newtown, Conn.Taken together, the votes show a willingness by lawmakers to confront the pro-gun lobby, which has stifled new gun limits for years. As recently as last year, it would have been unthinkable for these bills to have even been considered in a Senate committee.But those measures — which include a ban on high-capacity magazines and enhanced background checks for gun buyers — will now be considered by the full Senate, where gun rights sentiments run far deeper than in the committee, to say nothing of the House, where members are even less avid to take up new gun curbs.The renewal of the assault weapons ban, an earlier version of which was rejected by the full Congress in 2004, even with the tacit support of President George W. Bush, is almost certain to fail in the Senate, should Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, even allow it on the floor."The road is uphill. I fully understand that," Senator Dianne Feinstein, Democrat of California, the author of the bill, said after its passage by the committee. "My passion comes from what I've seen on the streets," she said, adding, "I cannot get out of my mind trying to find the pulse in someone and putting my fingers in a bullet hole."Mr. Reid said on Thursday that he had talked with Senator Patrick J. Leahy, the Vermont Democrat who leads the committee, and had promised a vote on some type of bill that considers the committee's actions, probably by mid-April.While the plan has not been formulated, it will probably include a limited gun safety bill focused on stemming gun trafficking and enhancing background checks to compel states to better comply with laws on reporting records regarding criminals and mentally ill people. But even those measures will not have broad support, and 60 votes will be needed to cut off debate and move to a vote. Lawmakers will probably work with a measure passed by the committee last week that would make the already illegal practice of buying a gun for someone who is legally barred from having one — known as a straw purchase — a felony and increase penalties for the crime.This week, the panel passed a measure that would expand the background checks to private gun sales, and another measure to renew a grant program to help schools improve security.The background check bill is expected to be substituted or amended by its sponsor, Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, to attract the support of more Republicans. In theory, it is a measure that both parties can support, but it is ensnared over a debate over record-keeping that may undermine it on the floor.The committee vote on Thursday to approve the assault weapons ban was 10 to 8, along party lines.Senator John Cornyn, Republican of Texas, offered amendments to the bill that would have created exemptions from the ban for female victims of violent crimes, those who had received a protection order, and residents near the Southwest border and in rural areas. Those amendments all failed.In debating the bills, the committee laid bare the essence and emotions of the debate over how to prevent gun violence and the meaning of the Second Amendment, a fight that is likely to continue on the Senate floor.The most testy exchange occurred between Ms. Feinstein and Senator Ted Cruz, Republican of Texas, who challenged Ms. Feinstein on her constitutional knowledge, asking her if she would apply regulations to the First and Fourth Amendments similar to those she was seeking on firearms ownership.Ms. Feinstein, whose career has been shaded with episodes of gun violence, would not brook it. "I'm not a sixth grader," she said. "I'm not a lawyer, but after 20 years I've been up close and personal with the Constitution. I have great respect for it."If the Senate passes even modest measures next month, they will face a steep climb in the House. "I've made it perfectly clear if the Senate passes a bill, we will be happy to review it," Speaker John A. Boehner, Republican of Ohio, said in an interview on Thursday. "In the meantime, our committees are continuing to have hearings on this issue, continuing to look at our violent society and the causes of it and what we can do to reduce the incidents of violence in our society."President Obama has made an emphatic call for new gun regulations, but he so far has not spent extensive political capital on the effort. In visits to Capitol Hill to meet with lawmakers this week, the issue barely came up. "The Senate has now advanced legislation addressing three of the most important elements of my proposal to help reduce the epidemic of gun violence in this country," he said in a statement.
WASHINGTON – For months, as gun control advocates and gun rights groups have held competing rallies, senators have debated and President Obama has implored Congress to act, one key player, Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, has remained largely on the sidelines of the national debate over guns.Now that the debate has moved to the Senate floor, the spotlight returns to Mr. Reid.Mr. Reid, the majority leader, who for years proudly curried favor with the National Rifle Association, will now be forced to weigh the relative merits and political implications of four new gun safety measures that have cleared the Senate Judiciary Committee.How the bills are presented to the full Senate — and which ones Mr. Reid chooses to promote personally — will probably reshape the debate over what, if anything, should be done legislatively to address gun violence, one that for a decade has largely been controlled by the N.R.A.On Thursday, the Senate Judiciary Committee approved a measure to reinstate a ban on assault weapons that expired in 2004. The vote followed the passage of three other measures: one that would expand the use of background checks to private gun sales, one that would make the already illegal practice of buying a gun for someone who is legally barred from having one — known as a straw purchase — a felony and increase penalties for the crime, and one that would renew and increase financing for school safety efforts.For years, Mr. Reid was counted among gun rights advocates in the Senate, voting against the renewal of the assault weapons ban in 2004, supporting measures that enhance gun rights, and keeping a discussion of new gun safety regulations out of sight and mind. Republicans and many Democrats in the Senate supported that strategy.But after the killing of 20 schoolchildren in Newtown, Conn., a shaken Mr. Reid has carefully stepped into the debate. "We need to accept the reality that we are not doing enough to protect our citizens," he said on the Senate floor shortly after the shooting in December.Since then, Mr. Reid has been largely silent about what types of measures he supports. "Every idea must be on the table," he has said. In addition, the N.R.A., despite Mr. Reid's support over the years, decided not to endorse his re-election bid in 2010, which reduces the political repercussions he could face if he pushes for more expansive legislation.Each of the measures he must now ponder carries risks for lawmakers.An assault weapons ban is almost certain to fail before the full Senate. But that is not its only problem. While voting against such a measure will be a boon for some legislators, many will still feel torn between constituents who do not want a reinstatement of the ban and emergent gun rights groups that have vowed to make that vote an issue in 2014, especially among suburban voters.Further, the assault weapons measure includes a restriction on the size of gun magazines, which, while vehemently opposed by the N.R.A. and other gun rights groups and some members of Congress, has broader public and lawmaker support than an all-out ban on the weapons.In theory, an enhanced background check bill is something both parties can agree on; even Republicans on the Judiciary Committee who voted against every measure before them over the last two weeks said they were interested in making it more difficult for criminals and mentally ill people to buy guns.But Democrats and Republicans so far cannot agree on record-keeping provisions.Mr. Reid and the committee members may have to decide whether to bring a bill to the floor that cannot pass and let Republicans shoulder the blame for rejecting an effort that most Americans support. Or he could offer a vote on a bill, stripped of its record-keeping provisions, that is far less stringent and perhaps less effective but can get through the Senate, and then see if the House will dare to ignore it.Republicans and pro-gun-rights Democrats could be hard-pressed to vote against a bill that would essentially enhance law enforcement tools to reduce the flow and use of illegal guns, a much tougher vote to take after the Newtown killings than one against a ban on firearms.The straw purchase measure, which was supported by Senator Charles E. Grassley of Iowa, the highest-ranking Republican on the committee, began as a sleeper bill but appears to have more momentum, politically and practically, than a background check bill. However, many law enforcement officials believe that the two approaches work in tandem.Some expect Mr. Reid to bring a bill to the floor that combines the straw purchasing measure with a background check component that either alienates many Republicans or is rendered far less potent.There is also discussion among many members about peeling the ban on magazines that carry more than 10 rounds off the assault weapons ban, to see if it attracts more support. This would also be a tough vote for many members. Even the school safety bill, in the era of spending limits, is no shoe-in. Many Republicans on the committee rejected it because of its cost.Mr. Reid may have to decide what is worse: making Democrats who support gun rights, especially those like Senators Mark Pryor of Arkansas and Mark Warner of Virginia, vote on things they would rather not and let the legislative chips fall, or failing to deliver on a significant piece of a gun safety agenda that the president has said is of central concern to him.
Early last year, after a series of frightening encounters with her former husband, Stephanie Holten went to court in Spokane, Wash., to obtain a temporary order for protection.Her former husband, Corey Holten, threatened to put a gun in her mouth and pull the trigger, she wrote in her petition. He also said he would "put a cap" in her if her new boyfriend "gets near my kids." In neat block letters she wrote, "He owns guns, I am scared."The judge's order prohibited Mr. Holten from going within two blocks of his former wife's home and imposed a number of other restrictions. What it did not require him to do was surrender his guns.About 12 hours after he was served with the order, Mr. Holten was lying in wait when his former wife returned home from a date with their two children in tow. Armed with a small semiautomatic rifle bought several months before, he stepped out of his car and thrust the muzzle into her chest. He directed her inside the house, yelling that he was going to kill her."I remember thinking, 'Cops, I need the cops,' " she later wrote in a statement to the police. "He's going to kill me in my own house. I'm going to die!"Ms. Holten, however, managed to dial 911 on her cellphone and slip it under a blanket on the couch. The dispatcher heard Ms. Holten begging for her life and quickly directed officers to the scene. As they mounted the stairs with their guns drawn, Mr. Holten surrendered. They found Ms. Holten cowering, hysterical, on the floor.For all its rage and terror, the episode might well have been prevented. Had Mr. Holten lived in one of a handful of states, the protection order would have forced him to relinquish his firearms. But that is not the case in Washington and most of the country, in large part because of the influence of the National Rifle Association and its allies.Advocates for domestic violence victims have long called for stricter laws governing firearms and protective orders. Their argument is rooted in a grim statistic: when women die at the hand of an intimate partner, that hand is more often than not holding a gun.In these most volatile of human dramas, they contend, the right to bear arms must give ground to the need to protect a woman's life.In statehouses across the country, though, the N.R.A. and other gun-rights groups have beaten back legislation mandating the surrender of firearms in domestic violence situations. They argue that gun ownership, as a fundamental constitutional right, should not be stripped away for anything less serious than a felony conviction — and certainly not, as an N.R.A. lobbyist in Washington State put it to legislators, for the "mere issuance of court orders."That resistance is being tested anew in the wake of the massacre in Newtown, Conn., as proposals on the mandatory surrender of firearms are included in gun control legislation being debated in several states.Among them is Washington, where current law gives judges issuing civil protection orders the discretion to require the surrender of firearms if, for example, they find a "serious and imminent threat" to public health. But records and interviews show that they rarely do so, making the state a useful laboratory for examining the consequences, as well as the politics, of this standoff over the limits of Second Amendment rights.By analyzing a number of Washington databases, The New York Times identified scores of gun-related crimes committed by people subject to recently issued civil protection orders, including murder, attempted murder and kidnapping. In at least five instances over the last decade, women were shot to death less than a month after obtaining protection orders. In at least a half-dozen other killings, the victim was not the person being protected but someone else. There were dozens of gun-related assaults like the one Ms. Holten endured.The analysis — which crosschecked protective orders against arrest and conviction data, along with fatality lists compiled by the Washington State Coalition Against Domestic Violence — represents at best a partial accounting of such situations because of limitations in the data. The databases were missing some orders that have expired or been terminated. They also did not flag the use of firearms in specific crimes, so identifying cases required combing through court records.Washington's criminal statutes, however, contain a number of gun-specific charges, like unlawful possession of a firearm and aiming or discharging one, offering another window into the problem. Last year, The Times found, more than 50 people facing protection orders issued since 2011 were arrested on one of these gun charges.In some instances, of course, laws mandating the surrender of firearms might have done nothing to prevent an attack. Sometimes the gun used was not the one cited in the petition. In other cases, no mention of guns was ever made. But in many cases, upon close scrutiny, stricter laws governing protective orders and firearms might very well have made a difference.
DENVER — The wounds and rage from a mass shooting in a Colorado movie theater were still raw one morning last July when Gov. John W. Hickenlooper went on national television to discuss grief and guns. Shaken and groping for answers, he nevertheless cast doubt on one idea: that tighter gun laws could have prevented the carnage."This person — if there were no assault weapons available, and no this or no that — this guy's going to find something, right?" he said on CNN, referring to the gunman whose rampage killed 12 and wounded dozens. "If it was not one weapon, it would have been another."Eight months later, Mr. Hickenlooper is poised to sign some of the toughest new gun control laws in the nation, capping a journey that has transformed a popular, data-driven Western Democrat who takes his son shooting into an unlikely frontman for bringing new gun laws into the center of the United States. The bill signing is expected on Wednesday."It absolutely lays a path for the rest of the country," said Jill Hanauer, a Democratic strategist in Denver. "If you can do it here, you can do it anyplace."Democrats hope the expanded background checks and new limits on ammunition clips are signs of a durable shift in a Western swing state where the biggest political affiliation is "unaffiliated."A decade ago, Colorado was loosening concealed-weapons laws and facing court challenges over a law that stripped legal protections for gay residents. It has now legalized marijuana, voted twice for Barack Obama, approved civil unions for same-sex couples and allowed illegal immigrants to pay cheaper in-state tuition rates at state colleges.Where Democrats see progress, Republicans see overreach. About one in three Colorado households own a gun, and Republicans are hoping the state's hunters and sport shooters, libertarians and social conservatives will punish Democrats in next year's state-level elections. Conservatives in southwestern Colorado have already submitted petitions to recall State Representative Mike McLachlan, a Democrat who supported the gun bills."We are not the East Coast or the West Coast," said State Senator Ellen Roberts, who joined fellow Republicans to attack the package in a 12-hour Senate debate. "There will be political blowback."When it came to guns, Mr. Hickenlooper, 61, a onetime oil geologist and brewpub owner, said he simply wanted solutions."We were just pulling our hair out, saying, What can you do?" the governor said. "Rather than feeling good, something that can make a difference. What are best practices? Where can we improve?"Aides said his strategy reflected a pragmatic approach, one that extended to his days as a business owner or as mayor of Denver. In 2010, a year of fervid partisanship, he cruised to the governor's seat by running as a pragmatist who rejected nasty campaigning. He even filmed a television ad in the shower (clothes on) and promised voters a muck-free campaign.But guns were risky territory. Colorado had not passed new gun laws since just after the 1999 massacre at Columbine High School. Any move by Democrats would instantly be characterized as a "gun grab."After attending funerals and memorial services for the victims of the Aurora movie theater shooting, Mr. Hickenlooper started asking questions about guns and death. Did ammunition limits make sense? Did background checks really keep guns away from potential killers?As Democrats started drafting bills, Mr. Hickenlooper sent his staff on a research expedition, seeking data on mass shootings, crime statistics and gaps in mental health laws."He put our people through their paces," said Mark Glaze, the director of Mayors Against Illegal Guns, which lobbied and advertised in support of the bills. The National Rifle Association bought radio and print ads condemning the measures.Throughout the autumn, as Mr. Hickenlooper and his staff drove around the state, the topic kept coming up in conversations with suburban parents and hunters, gun advocates and ranchers. He asked: What limits could you support? Which ones go too far? He met with the head of the N.R.A. On a three-day bicycle tour in Eastern Colorado's more conservative plains, he asked farmers and rural Coloradans their opinions.
WASHINGTON — Senator Dianne Feinstein , the California Democrat who 35 years ago discovered the bullet-riddled body of the gay activist Harvey Milk, reacted with anger on Tuesday that gun control legislation the Senate is to consider next month will not include the reinstatement of an assault weapons ban, a measure she had fought desperately to keep."How many assault weapons do you need circulating?" Ms. Feinstein said to reporters, noting that her bill, which had almost no chance of a hearing in the House, exempted many weapons. "To have these mass killings is such a blight on everything that America stands for."At a Senate hearing last week, Ms. Feinstein said that she still could not get out of her mind looking for the pulse of Mr. Milk, her colleague at the time on the San Francisco Board of Supervisors, and in the process "putting my fingers in a bullet hole."Senate Democrats plan to introduce after the Easter recess a bill widely supported by both parties that would increase the penalties for people who buy guns for those barred from having them, known as straw purchasing. But Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, told Ms. Feinstein on Monday that her assault weapons ban would not be included in the bill."I tried my best," Ms. Feinstein said with obvious disappointment. "My best, I guess, wasn't good enough."This month, the Senate Judiciary Committee passed four pieces of gun legislation: the straw purchasing measure; the assault weapons ban, which included limits on gun magazine sizes; a grant program for school security; and enhanced background checks for gun buyers.The Senate bill is likely to include the school safety measure, and it may be expanded to include the enhanced background checks. But Mr. Reid is weighing the relative merits of bringing that measure to the floor, which for now has limited support from Republicans.Mr. Reid said he would allow the assault weapons ban and the limits on magazine sizes to be offered as amendments, Ms. Feinstein said."I have said I want people to have the ability to vote on" various gun measures, Mr. Reid said on Tuesday. "My job is to find one of those that I can bring to the floor." Mr. Reid said that while he felt sympathy for Ms. Feinstein, her bill had far fewer than the 60 votes needed to avoid a filibuster.Mr. Reid will introduce the one measure that does have ample bipartisan support, the straw purchasing provision, which would make the already illegal practice a felony and increase penalties.But a bill that is limited to stemming straw purchases would be all but certain to enrage groups that have been seeking broader legislation. They want measures that would make it more difficult for criminals and mentally ill people to obtain firearms and would limit the size of magazines.If Mr. Reid considers only the straw purchasing measure, it is likely that senators who favor gun rights will offer a flood of pro-gun amendments, many of them likely to pass the full Senate, which could essentially turn a bill intended to strengthen gun regulations into one that enhances gun rights.It is almost certain that Mr. Reid will at least add the provision to renew a grant program for school security, but even that is not a sure thing because of the country's fiscal constraints.Mr. Reid must also weigh whether to add a provision that would extend background checks to private sales of guns, a measure that would exempt family members and some others from those checks. While that idea has broad support among Democrats and some Republicans, many oppose it because it would require the same record-keeping that is done by gun stores in sales made within their walls.As it stands, the assault weapons ban will probably still receive a vote as an amendment to the underlying package, as will a separate measure that would limit magazine sizes to 10 rounds."The enemies on this are very powerful," Ms. Feinstein said, referring to the National Rifle Association. "I've known that all my life."
WASHINGTON — As she stood surrounded by gunshot victims and displays of firearms in January to announce her intention to renew the push for an assault weapons ban after the massacre in Newtown, Conn., Senator Dianne Feinstein all but conceded defeat."This is really an uphill road," Ms. Feinstein, a California Democrat, acknowledged then.Her road terminated Monday in the private office of Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the Democratic majority leader, who bluntly told Ms. Feinstein that a renewal of the ban — the symbol of American gun control for two decades — would not be included in a gun-regulation measure that would hit the Senate floor in April.Ms. Feinstein, who had requested the meeting to press Mr. Reid, stormed from his office and spent the next 48 hours denouncing the decision, one that perplexed gun control advocates who believed the political moment had arrived to reinstate the ban that expired in 2004.Mr. Reid was shocked that Ms. Feinstein was shocked. Despite a high-profile push by President Obama and Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr., the assault weapons ban never had a chance of passage.In the nine years since the ban expired, the political momentum for renewed legislation has been almost nonexistent. Mass shootings on college campuses and in a packed movie theater, the killing of 20 schoolchildren in Newtown in December, the halting pleas of Gabrielle Giffords, the Arizona representative whose career was ended by a bullet to the head — none propelled it forward this year.Its political demise stems from a confluence of realities: the lobbying prowess of the National Rifle Association; stiff resistance from lawmakers in both parties; serious questions about the efficacy of the ban in stemming gun violence; and the lack of support from gun safety groups, including one led by Ms. Giffords, that are much more invested in a background check measure, which has become the central goal of many groups and lawmakers."The background check bill has been always been the center of our agenda," said Mark Glaze, the director of Mayors Against Illegal Guns. "The vast majority of fatalities are related to handguns, so the background check bill is the biggest policy fix and also happens to come with the best politics attached."The White House, like many senators in both parties, seemed more focused on incipient immigration legislation. Ms. Feinstein, whose entire career has been shaped through her personal experiences with gun deaths, was in effect very much alone.On balance, politicians showed again that they have little interest in legislation that can be viewed as eroding existing gun rights, although they are open to redefining who should have those rights to begin with."Arguing for an assault weapons ban," said Jon S. Vernick, the co-director of the Johns Hopkins Center for Gun Policy and Research, "made it harder to reassure some folks that advocates of gun-violence prevention measures were not trying to take away anyone's guns, but simply trying to make it harder for high-risk people to acquire guns."The ban is still expected to get a vote on the Senate floor, though Mr. Reid said he counted only about 40 votes for it. With that provision all but finished, Senate Democrats have been zipping through a flurry of meetings to game out not how many gun safety measures they can push to the floor, but rather which, if any, could survive.Mr. Reid plans to put forward a modest measure to increase the penalties for those who purchase guns illegally, known as straw purchasing, but without a strong background check bill, that bill could be rendered toothless. A measure to enhance school safety will also be included.For groups that are concerned with gun safety, a background check bill had long ago replaced an assault weapons ban as the legislation of choice.For many weeks, Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, and Senator Tom Coburn, Republican of Oklahoma, negotiated a measure that would expand background checks to nearly all gun purchases, roughly 40 percent of which are not subject to them, according to numerous studies. The measure would also strengthen penalties against states that fail to keep their background reporting systems current. (Sales between family members would be exempt.)But Mr. Coburn bailed on the measure because of disagreements with Democrats over whether private sellers should have to keep records of gun transactions, as gun stores must. Mr. Coburn feared the move would be a precursor to a national gun registry; most supporters of an enhanced system believe record keeping is essential to enforcement."The concern about a national gun registry is a complete canard," Mr. Glaze said, noting that enhanced straw purchasing measures would be difficult to enforce without expanded background checks with proper records.While Mr. Reid is inclined to bring the background check measure to the floor and challenge Republicans and Democrats who favor strong gun rights to vote against a measure that is widely popular with voters, Republicans have found a line of opposition from Mr. Coburn."I can't support a universal background check bill," said Senator Jeff Flake of Arizona this week, citing Mr. Coburn's opposition to record keeping.Unlike an assault weapons ban, the background check bill still attracts optimism among those who would like to see gun violence addressed on a federal level."You have one of those rare moments when the public is ready and doesn't have to be educated," Mr. Glaze said. "If Congress can't do this, you have to wonder what they can do."
DENVER — As Colorado's governor signed a hard-won package of gun control measures on Wednesday, officials across the state were reeling from the seemingly inexplicable shooting death of the state's prisons chief, who was gunned down at the front door of his home.The killing of Tom Clements, a man described by friends and colleagues as a dedicated and thoughtful public servant, left state officials shaken and grasping for answers on Wednesday. State troopers increased security around the State Capitol, and some state workers said Mr. Clements's death had put them on edge.The state police said they had known of no specific threats against Mr. Clements before 8:30 p.m. Tuesday, when someone approached his house in the pine-fringed hills of the town of Monument, near Colorado Springs, and shot him as he answered the door. Into Wednesday night, investigators were still searching for any trace of his killer, but said they had no suspects or motive.Officials with the El Paso County Sheriff's Office said they were looking for a "boxy" two-door car that had been spotted Tuesday night in the neighborhood, its engine running but with nobody inside.They said Mr. Clements's post, overseeing more than 20,000 inmates in Colorado's prisons and parole system, might have made him a target.Among his most prominent recent decisions, he denied a request this month from a prominent Saudi-born prisoner convicted of sexually abusing his housekeeper to serve the duration of his sentence in Saudi Arabia.Mr. Clements's death came just hours before Colorado's governor, John W. Hickenlooper, signed a bitterly divisive package of gun-control measures into law, capping weeks of tumultuous and emotional debate about gun ownership and violence in a state scarred by two mass shootings.The news about Mr. Clements rippled through the Capitol, where lawmakers and crime victims had gathered to watch Mr. Hickenlooper sign the gun bills. Staff members asked one another, "Are you O.K.?" Tearful elected officials hugged and shared memories of Mr. Clements, 58, recalling his dedication in serving Colorado after a career with Missouri's Department of Corrections.Mr. Hickenlooper's voice cracked as he spoke about Mr. Clements's death. He called the shooting "an act of intimidation" that had cut down a thoughtful and deliberative man who had tried to reform Colorado's prisons by reducing the number of inmates in solitary confinement."He did his job quietly and intently," Mr. Hickenlooper said, joined by his cabinet and elected officials. "We are all grieving." During his two years as head of Colorado's prison system, Mr. Clements won praise from nearly everyone he met, from the governor to corrections officers, defense lawyers to former gang members.The Rev. Leon Kelly, an antigang advocate who works to keep parolees from returning to prison, said Mr. Clements had embraced programs intended to prevent recidivism. Mr. Clements charmed Mr. Kelly's 84-year-old mother so much that she put a photograph of him and her son on her dresser."He knew the job that needed to be done," Mr. Kelly said. "He just jumped in with both feet hitting the ground."Mr. Clements held town-hall-style meetings with prison staffs. He tried to address the grievances of working long hours in a sometimes dangerous job. After he was seriously hurt in a bicycle accident, he climbed into a wheelchair last September to attend the funeral of a corrections officer who had been stabbed by an inmate.Appointed by Mr. Hickenlooper in January 2011, Mr. Clements walked into a department facing budget cuts and a dwindling number of prisoners. He oversaw the closing of two prisons, a difficult process that can reverberate across communities that depend on the associated jobs and state money.Mr. Hickenlooper said Mr. Clements had been supportive of the gun measures but was not "particularly active" during their emotional and contentious path toward passage.The new laws require background checks for private gun sales in addition to the checks already mandated for purchases at shops and gun shows. They also ban ammunition magazines with more than 15 rounds, a feature that the governor said could turn "killers into killing machines.""If they're slowed even for just a number of seconds, that allows someone to escape," Mr. Hickenlooper said.As he signed the bills, he was joined in his office by a handful of people who lost loved ones in shootings at Columbine High School in 1999, at an Aurora movie theater in July and at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, Conn., in December."I started crying," said Tom Mauser, who became a gun control advocate after his son Daniel was killed at Columbine.Mr. Mauser wore a suit to the Capitol on Wednesday in a nod to the formality of the occasion. But on his feet were Daniel's sneakers.
Gov. Rick Perry speaks wistfully — almost lovingly — about a rifle he recently fired while he was at a range in Leander owned by the manufacturer LaRue Tactical. "I'm incredibly passionate about a well-made piece of equipment," Mr. Perry said in a phone interview last week, "whether it's an automobile or a weapon."After the visit, LaRue posted Mr. Perry's results online. From 100 yards away, the governor took three shots and grouped them — two shots hit the same spot — mere millimeters from the center of the target."That was pretty good, wasn't it?" Mr. Perry said, though he gave most of the credit to the machinery. "If you don't have a very well-made weapon, then I don't care how steady your aim, how controlled your breathing or how smooth your trigger pull is."As debates over gun control intensify across the nation, Mr. Perry and some of his colleagues in the Texas Legislature are pushing to have more weapons of that sort made in the state. Mr. Perry said his office had sent letters to 34 different firearms and accessories manufacturers in other states, particularly where stricter gun and ammunition laws are being considered or passed, encouraging them to relocate to Texas.Lt. Gov. David Dewhurst and United States Senator Ted Cruz have made similar overtures to out-of-state companies, including Beretta U.S.A. in Maryland and Smith & Wesson in Massachusetts. The effort is not limited to a letter-writing campaign. State Senator Craig Estes, Republican of Wichita Falls, has filed a bill that would formally add incentive programs for gun manufacturers to the state's economic development statute."Gun manufacturers and people in that industry have been under attack by states who are threatening their Second Amendment rights," Mr. Estes said. "We want them to realize that Texas is open for business and Texas is a gun-friendly state."When the legislation was considered recently before the Senate Agriculture, Rural Affairs and Homeland Security Committee, no one testified against it. One committee member, Senator Carlos Uresti, Democrat of San Antonio, voted against the bill, but his opposition had less to do with guns and more to do with giving the governor what Mr. Uresti called "a blank check to offer a variety of tax exemptions and other incentives" to such manufacturers.Mr. Uresti, whose committee vote will mean the bill will probably be debated by the full Senate, rather than sliding through on the little-scrutinized local and uncontested calendar, argued that any businesses that wanted to move to Texas should share the full burden of financing state services."According to the comptroller's office, such tax breaks this year will cost the state $37.7 billion and school districts $6.2 billion in lost revenue," he said. "I'm not against attracting gun and ammunition manufacturers to Texas."Mr. Perry said he did not need legislation to use state resources to recruit businesses to Texas; his activities related to gun makers are just a part of his overall economic development strategy.But, he added, "often there are pieces of legislation that get filed that send a message."Even the state's gun-control advocates concede that Texas is gun-friendly.Marsha McCartney, president of the Texas Chapters of the Brady Campaign to Prevent Gun Violence, conceded that Texas was "a few election cycles away from passing laws like they did in Colorado."Lawmakers there recently passed bills limiting ammunition-magazine capacity and requiring background checks for all gun purchasers. The move prompted the gun-accessory manufacturer Magpul Industries to announce on Facebook that it would begin its "transition out of the state." Mr. Perry has been courting the company intensely.Ms. McCartney said she did not have particular concerns about more weapons-related businesses moving to the state. "I'm sure they will follow the laws in Texas," she said, "just like all Texans will have to follow the federal laws."The success of Texas' recruitment efforts may hinge on how the federal gun-control debate shakes out.
WASHINGTON — It was, Senator Harry Reid of Nevada ebulliently proclaimed, a "happy day for me" as he stood with Wayne LaPierre, the head of the National Rifle Association, in 2010 at a new shooting range in Las Vegas made possible by federal money secured by Mr. Reid. "People who criticize this probably would criticize baseball," Mr. Reid said before firing off a few rounds.These days, Mr. Reid, the Senate majority leader, is far more likely to meet with Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York, an outspoken advocate of stricter gun control, than with Mr. LaPierre as he prepares to bring the most expansive package of gun safety legislation in a decade to the Senate floor over the next few weeks.Mr. Reid's evolution from a proponent of gun rights to the shepherd of legislation that would expand background checks, among other gun control measures, emerges from a complex web of political calculations that have come to define his leadership style over the last decade.How tenacious Mr. Reid is willing to be — and whether he will extract votes one by one as he has for other big pieces of legislation — may well determine the fate of the measures.Mr. Reid declined to be interviewed but answered questions by e-mail. "The families of Newtown and Aurora and the victims of gun violence everywhere deserve a vote on these issues," Mr. Reid wrote. "We owe them a vote, and I will make sure they get a vote." He added, "Only those who are afraid of a free and open debate would try to block it or shut it down."With guns, as with gay rights and immigration, Washington has observed in Mr. Reid an evolution — less flip-flops than slow dances to the left — that reflects shifting attitudes not only in his Democratic conference but also in Nevada, where Democrats have gained an edge in the last decade. Voter registration in the state has become increasingly Democratic as its population has swelled, and Barack Obama won the state twice, the only Democrat besides Bill Clinton to win the state in the last 40 years."Harry Reid is the most calculating individual I have ever covered in politics," said Jon Ralston, editor of Ralston Reports, who has covered Nevada politics for three decades. "If he is making the right move for his members, he is making the right move for himself."Mr. Reid voted proudly against an assault weapons ban in both 1993 and 2004, even as most Senate Democrats voted for it, and voted for a successful 2005 measure that limited lawsuits against gun manufacturers and dealers for negligence. He has also long supported the N.R.A.But now, in a demonstration of his loyalty to President Obama, Mr. Reid is helping him pursue his agenda for stemming gun violence. Many of the more senior members of his caucus, notably Senator Dianne Feinstein of California, also want these votes."He is doing what a leader needs to do," said Senator Patty Murray of Washington, one of Mr. Reid's protégées in the Senate, "to move the caucus forward so it stays in tune with where the American people are."Mr. Reid, aides said, is also motivated by both the personal angst he felt over the killing of 20 schoolchildren in Newtown, Conn., last year, as well as the anger he feels toward the N.R.A., which was widely expected to endorse him in his 2010 re-election campaign but then declined to do so.After the Senate returns from its recess next week, it will consider a bill that would expand background checks and increase penalties for so-called straw purchases, in which someone buys a gun for another person who is unable to buy one. Mr. Reid opted not to include in the bill a ban on assault weapons and high-capacity ammunition magazines but plans to hold a separate vote on both measures. His hope was to not let the less popular measures jeopardize passage of the expanded background checks.Mr. Reid is almost certain to vote in favor of at least some of the new gun safety measures, if not all of them.It would not be the first time Mr. Reid had shifted his position on a significant public policy issue. For example, in 1993, Mr. Reid co-sponsored legislation that would have stripped the citizen rights from babies born to illegal immigrant mothers, and vigorously denounced immigrants from the floor. The bill did not make it out of the Judiciary Committee.
Many states with the weakest gun laws have the worst rates of gun violence, ranking high on numerous indicators, like gun homicides and suicides, firearm deaths of children, and killings of law enforcement officers, according to a report to be issued Wednesday by the liberal Center for American Progress.Alaska ranked first in overall gun deaths, the report found, with 20.28 deaths per 100,000 people in 2010 — more than twice the national average — followed by Louisiana and Montana, all states that prior analyses have judged to have weak gun laws. Eight of the states with the highest levels of gun violence were among the 25 with the weakest gun laws, the report found.The report is the second in recent weeks to link gun deaths and firearms laws. Last month, a group of Boston researchers reported online in JAMA Internal Medicine that more firearm laws in a state were associated with lower rates of firearm deaths. That study took into account factors like poverty, unemployment, sex and race, education, population density, violent deaths unrelated to firearms and household firearm ownership.Deborah Azrael, a research scientist at Harvard's School of Public Health who studies firearms and violence, called the latest state-by-state report "a useful collation of data," and said it "reinforces what we know from other studies, which is that the rate of exposure to firearms is associated with overall mortality."But the report was criticized by opponents of tighter gun laws, who faulted its methodology and said it ignored the beneficial effect of gun ownership in combating crime."The real world experience of guns obviously is that they are harmful in the wrong hands and protective in the right hands," said David B. Kopel, an assistant policy analyst at the Cato Institute. "So you want to look at both effects."He added that high rates of gun violence in states with less gun regulation did not necessarily indicate higher crime rates over all."Is Louisiana a low-control state with a lot of crime? Absolutely," he said. "On the other hand, New York and California are clearly dangerous states in comparison to the rest of the country, and they're also very high-control states."The new report was based on an analysis of data from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives. In addition to firearm deaths, the report looked at other indicators of gun violence, like aggravated assaults with firearms, the percentage of guns traced to crimes within two years of their purchase, and the rate at which guns bought in one state are recovered in another after a crime is committed, a measure of illegal gun trafficking.When all 10 indicators of gun violence were taken into consideration, Louisiana — the state with the highest rate of gun homicides, 9.5 per 100,000 people in 2010, and one of the states with the highest numbers of firearm deaths among children from 2001 to 2010 — ranked as the most violent state. Hawaii had the lowest overall rate of gun violence, followed by Massachusetts, Connecticut, New Jersey and New York, all among the 10 states that an analysis last year by the Law Center to Prevent Gun Violence found had the toughest laws."Obviously, we know that correlation is not causation necessarily," said Arkadi Gerney, a fellow at the Center for American Progress and the lead author of the report, "but it suggests that there could be a causal relationship, and there are a lot of reasons to think that there is."Some states did not follow the pattern. Vermont, which has relatively weak gun laws, had low rates of gun violence. Maryland, which has relatively strong firearm legislation, had a high level of gun homicides, ranking fifth, with 5.3 per 100,000 people.Dr. Azrael, of Harvard, noted that the factors that were driving gun violence differed from state to state — in states like Montana and Idaho, for example, the rate of gun suicides greatly outstrips the rate of homicides committed with firearms.Tightened laws like universal background checks could address the availability of guns to criminals and the spread of trafficked guns across state borders, she said. But understanding more about things like "household decision making about guns and how people weigh the costs and benefits of guns" should also be part of the conversation, she said.
WASHINGTON — With Senate Democrats still struggling to line up support, the success or failure of President Obama's four-month campaign to overhaul gun laws will most likely revolve around a single provision: a proposal to expand federal background checks for gun purchases.Background checks, both advocates and independent researchers say, would have a bigger potential effect on gun violence than any other measure under consideration — including the much-discussed assault-weapons ban, which has little chance of passing in Congress. Proposed federal gun-trafficking laws and changes to mental health databases would have a marginal impact on gun violence, experts say.But even though around 90 percent of those polled in public surveys support background checks, the fight for it and the rest of the first major piece of gun control legislation since 1993 faces a difficult test in the coming weeks. On Tuesday, Senate aides said that formal debate and substantive votes on the gun issues would probably slip to the week of April 15 — a setback considering that Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, had pledged that it would be the first issue to come up when Congress returns from spring recess next week.Background checks are central to the delay. Efforts to reach a compromise between Senators Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, and Tom Coburn, Republican of Oklahoma, have foundered. Separate talks between Senators Joe Manchin III, Democrat of West Virginia, and Mark Steven Kirk, Republican of Illinois, have also yet to yield a breakthrough.Among the most difficult questions are which gun-purchase records the government would track and which purchases would be subject to background checks."The background-check piece is the single most important thing we can do right now to make a difference," said Pia Carusone, the executive director of Americans for Responsible Solutions, the advocacy group formed by Gabrielle Giffords, the former Arizona congresswoman, and her husband, Mark Kelly, after Ms. Giffords was shot in the head in Tucson in 2011."If the background check bill doesn't pass Congress," Ms. Carusone said, "we are not going to be happy."Mr. Obama will push for the legislation on Wednesday not far from the site of a movie theater massacre in Colorado last year. Next week, he will travel to Connecticut, where a gunman killed 20 children and 6 adults at a school in December, as part of a stepped-up public campaign to pressure lawmakers.Lawmakers who support gun rights and officials with the National Rifle Association deride background checks as ineffective and a threat to gun ownership. Most Republicans in the Senate oppose the measure, and several have said they will filibuster to prevent its passage. A handful of Democratic senators also have expressed doubts.In the face of that opposition, approval of the legislation would represent a major victory for Mr. Obama and his allies, only months after gun-control legislation seemed a political impossibility. Advocates say that more stringent background checks would shut down large gaps in a system that allow felons, domestic abusers and the mentally ill to buy guns.Since the existing background-check system began, in 1994, officials have screened more than 108 million people before they could buy a gun, according to the Bureau of Justice Statistics; the federal government has blocked 1.9 million attempted purchases because of felony convictions or other problems with the would-be buyers' background.But no background check is required for about 40 percent of gun purchases, including those made online or at gun shows, federal officials estimate. Requiring checks for those purchases would be the single most effective way to keep guns out of the hands of dangerous people, advocates say."The research is so strong that it would actually make a difference," said Ellen Alberding, the president of the Joyce Foundation, which makes research grants to inform gun violence prevention efforts. "It has been our grantees' top priority from Day 1 on this."Should it eventually pass the Senate, the background check legislation would then head to a House chamber firmly controlled by Republicans and advocates of gun rights. If it fails, gun-control supporters may have missed their best chance in a generation at significant new federal laws. For the president, it would be a reminder of the limits of his powers to persuade."We have always said that this would be hard," said Jay Carney, the White House press secretary. "We remain engaged in conversations with the Senate and those senators who are interested in forging a bipartisan compromise on measures to reduce gun violence."A new assault weapons ban has always seemed the most visceral response to the massacre in Newtown, Conn. But with advocates of stricter gun laws turning their attention to background checks, opponents of new gun laws are doing so as well.
N.R.A. Unveils Plan to Arm School Guards: The Times's Sheryl Gay Stolberg discusses a new proposal commissioned by the National Rifle Association to place trained guards in American schools.WASHINGTON — With the Senate set to debate gun control this month, a National Rifle Association task force released a 225-page report on Tuesday that called for armed police officers, security guards or staff members in every American school, and urged states to loosen gun restrictions to allow trained teachers and administrators to carry weapons.Asa Hutchinson, a former Republican congressman from Arkansas who led the task force, unveiled the report at a packed news conference with unusually heavy security, including a bomb-sniffing yellow Labrador retriever. A dozen officers in plain clothes and uniforms stood watch as he spoke; one warned photographers to "remain stationary" during the event.Among the study's central conclusions is that "the presence of armed security personnel adds a layer of security and diminishes response time" in a shooting, Mr. Hutchinson said. He cited a 1997 Mississippi case in which an assistant principal ran to his truck to retrieve a .45-caliber semiautomatic pistol and subdued a gunman who had killed two students.The recommendations — which also included expanding the police presence in schools — drew immediate criticism from gun control advocates and many Democrats, who have been fighting to tighten gun restrictions after the massacre at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, Conn., in December."Arming the teacher is merely a response to the last tragedy," said Representative Mike Thompson, a California Democrat who is chairman of a House task force on gun violence. "The one before that was in a shopping mall in Oregon, and the one before that was in a movie theater in Colorado. I don't think the proper response is to arm all the projectionists in the movie theaters or all the vendors in the mall."After the Newtown shooting, Wayne LaPierre, the rifle association's executive director, announced that it would devise a plan to put armed guards in every school. Technically, Mr. Hutchison's task force is independent of the rifle association, even though it paid for the study, and Mr. LaPierre was not present on Tuesday. But critics see no distinction between the two.Marian Wright Edelman, president of the Children's Defense Fund, an advocacy group here, criticized the study as "nothing more than a continuation of the N.R.A.'s attempts to prey on America's fears, saturate our schools with more guns and turn them into armed fortresses."But the report did get support from at least one Newtown parent: Mark Mattioli, whose 6-year-old son, James, was killed."I think politics needs to be set aside here, and I hope this doesn't lead to name-calling," said Mr. Mattioli, who joined Mr. Hutchinson at the news conference. "This is a recommendation for solutions, real solutions that will make our kids safer. That's what we need."At least one state, Indiana, is considering the idea of armed officers at schools. On Tuesday, a proposal that would require public and charter schools to have an armed "protection officer" on school property during class hours passed a State House committee.The task force panel called on the Departments of Homeland Security, Education and Justice to coordinate school safety efforts and provide grant money for schools to assess their ability to prevent and respond to attacks. It recommended that officers or employees who are armed take a 40- to 60-hour training course to be developed by the rifle association based on a model the task force has designed.The group also called on states to require schools to develop security plans.But how and whether the task force recommendations will be put into effect — and the cost — was unclear.The timing of Tuesday's announcement was not a coincidence: Congress will wrap up its spring recess after this week and is expected to consider gun legislation after lawmakers return. President Obama has called for tough new controls on gun ownership, but the prospects for such legislation are murky — a testimony to the rifle association's prowess as a lobbying force.A plan to revive and revamp a ban on assault weapons, which expired in 2004, is almost certain to be defeated. Mr. Obama is pushing for a measure that would impose mandatory background checks for gun buyers, and the Senator Harry Reid, Democrat of Nevada, the majority leader, has promised to present a bill that would expand background checks to the floor for a vote.
SPRINGFIELD, Va. — When word surfaced in February that Senator Tom Coburn , Republican of Oklahoma, was plotting with Democrats on a bill to expand background checks for gun buyers, Larry Pratt got really mad. Then, Mr. Pratt, the executive director of Gun Owners of America , got busy, mounting a lobbying blitz that helps explain why a bipartisan Senate deal on background checks remains elusive.Within days, his staff, working from a nondescript space in a squat office building off the Beltway here — there isn't even a nameplate on the door — was on the phone with supporters of his organization in Oklahoma. The group's members were encouraged to inundate Mr. Coburn with e-mails and calls and to otherwise make it exceedingly clear to the senator that an enhanced background check law would not be tolerated.It wasn't long until Mr. Coburn, a gun rights advocate, had backed away from negotiations with Senator Charles E. Schumer of New York, the No. 3 Senate Democrat, securing at least a temporary victory for gun rights activists and frustrating advocates of new gun safety laws.Once largely unknown, Gun Owners of America, with its war chest, membership and lobbying strength dwarfed by the National Rifle Association, is emerging as an influential force as a series of gun control measures heads to the Senate floor.The group has already been successful in both freezing senators, particularly Republicans, who have appeared to be on the fence about supporting bills to expand background checks and increase penalties for illegal gun purchases, and empowering those who have a strong gun rights background."They are strong defenders of the Second Amendment," said Senator Ted Cruz, Republican of Texas, who received donations from the group during his primary campaign and is its key ally in the Senate.Mr. Coburn attributed his retreat, which deeply damaged the prospects of the bill, to a plan that would have required private gun sellers to keep records. But the gun group believes its campaign contributed to his decision."His staff admitted that it kind of irritated the senator," Mr. Pratt said. "We were told, 'He's getting tired of this.' But when we hear complaints like that, we know we are close to success. We are happy he changed his mind."While it might be increasingly potent, the group is not rich.Gun Owners of America's total revenue in 2011 was less than $2 million, compared with the N.R.A.'s nearly $220 million. The group spent $1.3 million last year to lobby Congress, while the N.R.A. spent nearly $3 million. Its campaign contributions last year were $119,850, placing it at 2,669 on a list of 20,968 lobbying groups ranked by the Center for Responsive Politics. The N.R.A. spent $1.5 million, putting it at 230th. Gun Owners of America has 300,000 dues-paying members; the N.R.A. has five million.But, like many grass-roots groups, it is loud. Its members pepper Republican lawmakers with calls. In Republican primaries, the group supports candidates that hew to its message, and it rates floor votes with criteria far tougher than the N.R.A.'s. Senator Max Baucus of Montana, one of the few Democrats to earn an A from the N.R.A., has a D-minus from the group. This is in part because it draws from a far broader range of past votes, like President Obama's health care legislation, to judge lawmakers.John Hart, a spokesman for Mr. Coburn, declined to respond to questions about the group's role in the senator's decision to pull away from negotiations over a background check bill. "No one in the Senate has a stronger record of not only defending but expanding Second Amendment rights," Mr. Hart said, adding that "Dr. Coburn is still hopeful he can reach an agreement with Senator Schumer."Mr. Schumer said he hoped for the same. "In the area of guns there's always political pressure," he said. "But I know Tom Coburn well. He's a very principled guy."Many lawmakers and gun safety advocates believe Gun Owners of America's rising profile and heavy membership drive has led the N.R.A. to take a more aggressive stance against measures it once supported, like an expansion of background checks to include private gun sales. (In 1999, Wayne LaPierre, the chief executive of the N.R.A., said there should be "no loopholes anywhere, for anyone" on gun sale background checks.)Part of the group's mission, Mr. Pratt said, is to stay on top of the N.R.A. "when we don't think they've gone far enough.""The N.R.A. is essentially a political party," said Mark Glaze, the director of Mayors Against Illegal Guns. "The big majority is centrist, and the base is ideological. And they're pulled to the right in a competition for the base with Larry Pratt, and that's marginalizing them."
DENVER — As his gun control legislation struggled back in Washington, President Obama pleaded on Wednesday for understanding from the opposing forces of a debate that has grown polarized since the December massacre of 20 young children in Connecticut.Speaking at a police academy here, Mr. Obama blamed absolutists on both sides of the gun issue for refusing to listen to each other. He urged rural gun owners and urban mothers to imagine having the opposite perspective on the need for weapons and the damage they can do."That's a start, right?" Mr. Obama said, flanked by police officers and some family members of victims of mass shootings. "If we start listening to each other, we should be able to get something done."Mr. Obama's trip here was an attempt to resuscitate support for his gun-control legislation and press Congress on the issue before it returns to the capital next week. The White House choice of Colorado for the event was meant to add urgency to the president's message: The state has experienced two of the worst mass shootings in American history, in 1999 at Columbine High School and last summer at a movie theater in Aurora. Mr. Obama spoke not far from the Aurora theater, where 12 people were gunned down.The president repeated his call for what he termed "common-sense" gun measures, especially an expanded background check system for gun purchases. He said opponents of such measures had "ginned-up fears" about the government in an attempt to spook lawmakers and their constituents."The government is us," Mr. Obama said. "These officials are elected by you."He waved toward the assembled officers and local politicians and added, "We've got to get past some of the rhetoric that gets perpetuated, that breaks down trust, that's so over the top that it just shuts down all discussion."In contrast to some of his earlier, more emotional remarks about the impact of gun violence, the president portrayed the debate as one of a principled difference that needs to be bridged. To emphasize that point, he related a conversation with his wife, Michelle, after a day of campaigning in rural Iowa. He said Mrs. Obama told him that if she lived on a remote farm in Iowa, she would probably want to own a gun."Sometimes, we are so divided between rural and urban, the two sides just talk past one another," Mr. Obama said. "There are good people on both sides of this thing, but we have to be able to put ourselves in the other person's shoes."In Washington, the Senate had been scheduled to begin debating gun control legislation next week, but voting there may be delayed as Democrats who control the chamber continue to seek Republican support. They are also still trying to convince some wavering Democrats from rural and Western states.Colorado, which has had a long history of support for gun rights even as it has become more supportive of Democratic candidates, is the kind of place where the president and gun control advocates are looking for converts. Mr. Obama acknowledged the state's support for the Second Amendment in his remarks, but argued that Colorado's experience with Columbine and Aurora made it possible to embrace both gun control and gun rights."There doesn't have to be a conflict between protecting our citizens and protecting our Second Amendment rights," the president said. "I've gotten stacks of letters from proud gun owners, whether they're for sport, or protection, or collection, who tell me how deeply they cherish their rights and don't want them infringed upon — but they still want us to do something to stop the epidemic of gun violence."The president's decision to appear with police officers at the academy here was intended to put on display the law enforcement community's support for tougher gun laws. It is police officers, Mr. Obama said, who are "often the first to see the terrible consequences of gun violence — lives lost, families broken, communities irrevocably changed."But not all police officers back the president's agenda. The Denver Post reported that one officer asked the city's ethics board to review Mr. Obama's appearance at the academy, saying that the training facility was not supposed to be used for political purposes. The paper reported that the ethics panel does not meet until later this month.
ANNAPOLIS, Md. — Sweeping restrictions on gun ownership passed the Maryland General Assembly on Thursday, including a ban on new purchases of assault weapons, a 10-bullet limit on magazines and requirements that handgun buyers undergo fingerprinting and target training.The bill now heads to the desk of Gov. Martin O'Malley, a Democrat who has made tough gun control one of his top priorities this year and will get a chance to sign a bill very much like what he proposed.With President Obama's gun legislation stalled in Congress, Maryland becomes the fourth Democratic-led state to enact restrictions. It follows New York, Colorado and Connecticut, which on Wednesday passed one of the nation's toughest laws, 3 ½ months after the massacre of 26 children and educators at Sandy Hook Elementary School there.Maryland joins seven other states and the District of Columbia in banning new sales of military-style assault weapons, a measure dropped by Congressional gun control advocates because of fierce opposition.The Maryland bill also includes restrictions on purchases by people with mental illness, barring anyone who has been involuntarily committed for mental health treatment from buying a gun.Under the bill, handgun buyers must pass a background check, submit fingerprints and undergo training in a classroom and on a target range. They would then be issued a license like a state driver's license.Opponents of the bill argued that its restrictions would make it all but impossible for law-abiding residents to buy guns and would not reduce crime or mass shootings. The state already has some of the nation's toughest gun laws."We've had thousands of murders over the years and very few are committed by an assault rifle," said Rep. Anthony J. O'Donnell, the House minority leader, who joined fellow Republicans and some conservative Democrats in opposing the bill. "This is a solution that will have very little effect and I believe it offers false hope in terms of stopping gun violence."The bill's progress has been marked since January by impassioned debate both inside and outside the State House. Thousands of gun-rights supporters attended protests, and long-serving lawmakers said they had never seen bigger public turnouts over an issue.The legislation was adopted much as Mr. O'Malley proposed it. The State Senate sent the bill to the governor on Thursday after accepting minor amendments added by the House on Wednesday.As debate wound down, Senate Republicans, outnumbered 33 to 14, rose to protest a bill they said would "be a nice little check mark" politically for its sponsors, chiefly Mr. O'Malley, who is thought to have presidential ambitions in 2016. But would not make people safer in homes or on the streets, they said.The governor said the bill struck a balance "between protecting the safety of law enforcement and our children, and respecting the traditions of hunters and law-abiding citizens to purchase handguns for self-protection."But Senator Nancy Jacobs, a Republican, said the bill had already prompted an exodus of state residents who believed their Second Amendment rights were being trampled. "I'm seeing it all over the place, people are moving to Virginia, Tennessee," she said. "They are leaving the state in droves."Most opponents were from rural counties. Supporters were from Baltimore and its densely populated suburbs. New strict licensing procedures were especially popular with lawmakers in high-crime districts.
ANNAPOLIS, Md. — As the Maryland Senate debated a crackdown on guns last week, one Republican after another objected that amendments were being smothered by the Democratic majority in its haste to send Gov. Martin O'Malley the bill he wanted.But the opponents had no chance, as allies of the governor passed sweeping gun restrictions, the final victory in a series of triumphs that capped one of the most successful 2013 legislative seasons of any governor in the country.Besides gun control legislation, Mr. O'Malley coaxed a liberal wish list from the General Assembly session that ended Monday: repeal of the death penalty, a $1.7 billion subsidy for offshore wind turbines and a bump in the gasoline tax to pay for mass transit and roads.Republicans fumed that Mr. O'Malley had steered well to the left of Maryland residents' concerns, and denounced his agenda as a punch list for a 2016 Democratic presidential primary campaign. Mr. O'Malley — largely unknown outside Maryland, though he is mentioned in presidential speculations alongside Govs. Andrew M. Cuomo of New York and John W. Hickenlooper of Colorado — said the bills were smart policy and in step with state residents."I don't think the relevant question for Maryland families is whether we're moving left or right; it's whether we're moving forward or back," he said in an interview. To voters under 35, who represent a generational shift in American politics, especially on social issues, "these are pretty mainstream things," he added.In a relaxed mood a few days before the adjournment of the General Assembly, Mr. O'Malley, 50, offered a tour of the fine art in his office. He pointed out a Rembrandt Peale portrait of George Washington, whose distant eyes are the most arresting feature."They have the look of a man who knows how the conversation is going to end before it begins," Mr. O'Malley said.It was a comment that could apply as well to Mr. O'Malley, who is in his next-to-last year as a governor facing term limits. That he is looking ahead to a presidential campaign "is the worst-kept secret in Annapolis," said Anthony J. O'Donnell, the Republican minority leader in the House of Delegates. Mr. O'Donnell added that the governor was "planting his flag as far to the left as possible" with left-leaning Democratic primary voters in mind.Mr. O'Malley would not confirm any such thing. He said he was flattered that people noticed "the tough things we've accomplished here.""I haven't put a whole lot of brain power or effort or time into 2016," he said.His successes come on top of others a year ago, when lawmakers in the Democratic-controlled legislature approved same-sex marriage and in-state college tuition for illegal immigrants. After opponents forced both measures onto the state ballot in November, Mr. O'Malley campaigned hard for them, and voters upheld the changes — victories that provided political capital that allowed the governor to pass his even more ambitious agenda this year.But with lawmakers in Annapolis increasingly on the ideological wings of each party, it is an open question whether Mr. O'Malley has left Maryland residents behind. Protests against his gun restrictions, including an assault weapons ban and fingerprinting for handgun buyers, were the largest and most inflamed in memory. In a Washington Post poll last month, a plurality of Maryland residents, 48 percent to 41 percent, said the state was on the wrong track.A former mayor of Baltimore, who despised the city's dark portrayal in the television show "The Wire," Mr. O'Malley is not a traditional liberal. His arguments to abolish the death penalty were practical, not moralizing, in keeping with his reputation for shaping policy by analyzing data. He argued that capital punishment failed as a deterrent and did not reduce violent crime.Similarly, his defense of same-sex marriage and tuition breaks for illegal immigrants is an economic argument, aimed at attracting the well-educated and socially tolerant "creative class" to Maryland. "We believe that openness and inclusiveness are good for creating jobs and expanding opportunities," he said.Mr. O'Malley has succeeded with a fiscal policy balanced between tax increases and spending cuts, of the sort President Obama has sought with less success in talks with Congressional Republicans. He has nearly wiped out a $1.7 billion structural deficit he inherited in the Maryland budget, partly by slowing the rise of spending. He won re-election in 2010 in part by pointing out that spending went up less in his administration than under the previous governor, a Republican.But Republicans denounce his tax increases, including on individual incomes above $100,000 — a definition of "high earner" that is lower than the $250,000 threshold Mr. Obama campaigned on during his re-election race. Critics say Maryland has chased entrepreneurs to lower-taxed Virginia."Since 2007, we've lost 40,000 jobs in this state; we've lost 6,500 small businesses who have closed their doors to move across the border," said Jeannie Haddaway-Riccio, the Republican minority whip in the legislature's lower house.Mr. O'Malley has been called a rising star in the Democratic Party since he rode on the back of garbage trucks as mayor. But he has picked his battles with care. He decided not to challenge Kathleen Kennedy Townsend in the Democratic primary for governor in 2002. When she lost the general election, Mr. O'Malley had a clean shot at Annapolis four years later.He went on to lead the Democratic Governors Association, raising his national profile as a happy partisan warrior who attacked "the dinosaur wing of the Republican Party."Strategists who have worked with him do not believe he will seek the presidency in 2016 if Hillary Rodham Clinton commits to the race. The governor is close to Mrs. Clinton, whom he supported in her unsuccessful 2008 primary campaign. A generation younger, he will presumably have many options when his term ends in 2014, including a run for the Senate or a cabinet position in a future Democratic administration.Mr. O'Malley pointed out that he had begun campaigning to overturn the state's death penalty in 2007, his first year in office, long before Republicans in the General Assembly accused him of checking boxes for a presidential race."These guys would be sorely pressed to say that that was some sort of appeal to the base in Keokuk, Iowa, or Manchester, N.H.," he said.He turned to an aide, Teddy Davis, his director of strategic communications. "They still have the death penalty in New Hampshire, don't they?"Mr. Davis said they did. "They had passed a repeal bill about 10 years ago. Governor Shaheen had vetoed it," he said, referring to Jeanne Shaheen, a Democrat who is now one of the state's senators.And how did an aide to Maryland's governor know policy details in New Hampshire, which holds the first presidential primary?"Just learned my New Hampshire stuff," said Mr. Davis, whom the governor recently hired to help with the next phase of his career.
WASHINGTON — Several Senate Republicans said Tuesday that they would not participate in a filibuster of the first major gun control bill since 1993, as Democrats appeared on the verge of overcoming a blockade threatened by a group of conservatives before a word of debate on the measure was uttered.Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, said he would schedule an initial showdown vote for Thursday. If backers of the measure can corral at least 60 votes, the Senate will begin consideration of a series of gun safety proposals — strongly supported by President Obama — that would still face a long and difficult journey across the Senate floor.The bill, which would increase penalties for illegal gun purchase and greatly expand background checks on gun buyers, would again need 60 votes to end the ensuing debate after consideration of contentious amendments, including a renewal of the assault weapons ban. Should it cross that very high hurdle, 51 votes would be needed to get to final passage. Even with Democrats controlling 55 seats, no majority was assured given the resistance of some Democrats from more conservative states who face re-election campaigns next year.Even as Mr. Reid scheduled a vote, Senators Joe Manchin III, Democrat of West Virginia, and Patrick J. Toomey, Republican of Pennsylvania were very near a deal that would most likely serve as an amendment replacing the background check piece of the measure that Mr. Reid is seeking a vote on. Their measure, which would almost certainly appeal to a broader base of members than the one now at the heart of the debate, would include fewer gun buyers in newly expanded checks, but allow for the record keeping that many Republicans have opposed. The two were expected to announce a deal Wednesday. Mr. Manchin briefed Mr. Reid late Tuesday.Still, eking out the first 60 votes would represent momentum for the bill's supporters in the Senate, and an egg-on-the-face moment for those Republican senators, led by some younger conservatives, who chose to highlight their efforts to kill the bill before debate, a procedural move usually done more stealthily."We're moving forward on this bill," said Mr. Reid, who earlier Tuesday invoked his own father's suicide by gunshot to implore consideration of the legislation. "The American people deserve a vote on this legislation."Senate Republicans began splintering Tuesday on whether the bill should be allowed full consideration on the floor, with nearly a dozen, including Kelly Ayotte of New Hampshire, Susan Collins of Maine, Johnny Isakson of Georgia and Tom Coburn of Oklahoma, saying they would support a procedural motion to take up the legislation formally for debate and amendments."There's not very much ambivalence on Capitol Hill about the gun issue," Mr. Isakson said. "You're on one side or the other, so there's no reason not to go ahead and vote."The dynamic potentially sets scores of Democrats who staunchly support new gun control measures against moderates from their own party. Many of those members are up for re-election next year and would rather not see the bill move forward.Mr. Reid's decision to forge ahead came as lobbying on gun control stepped up on Capitol Hill, with the families of those killed in Newtown, Conn., four months ago fanning out across the Senate to appeal to lawmakers to vote for legislation to expand background checks for gun buyers and limit the size of magazines."I think we bring a face to this tragedy," said Mark Barden, whose son Daniel was among the 20 children killed at Newtown. The parents were reluctant to discuss whom they had met with, though according to several Senate Democrats, it was largely members from their party."We're encouraged and arranged meetings, whenever possible, with Republicans and Democrats," said Senator Richard Blumenthal of Connecticut. "Some of my colleagues were more welcoming than others."The decision by some Senate Republicans to abandon the filibuster on what is formally known as a motion to proceed came less than 24 hours after Senator Mitch McConnell of Kentucky, the Republican leader, announced his support for the filibuster, resulting in a rare show of disunity among Senate Republicans.Thirteen senators, led by a core of younger conservatives, had vowed to try to block any legislation that they saw as infringing on the constitutional right to bear arms.
In Colorado, a state of hunters and sportsmen, the Democrats who control state government acted last month not only to expand background checks for gun sales, but also to ban the kind of high-capacity magazines that gunmen have used in recent mass shootings in Newtown, Conn., Aurora, Colo., and Tucson.But in Washington, a federal ban on high-capacity magazines faces long odds, as the Democratic White House has been struggling to get traction on its broad gun agenda even in the Democratic-led Senate.The reason for the disparity lies not just in the complicated, emotional politics of guns in America — there was fierce lobbying in opposition to Colorado's new gun laws, and threats were even reported against some lawmakers who supported it — but also in the way that the Senate's arcane rules make it so much harder to pass bills there than in the nation's statehouses.Even as gun control advocates grew optimistic Tuesday that they would be able to muster the 60 votes needed to overcome a threatened filibuster, it was evident that the Senate bill was unlikely to include many of the steps that President Obama initially called for after Adam Lanza killed 20 first graders and 6 educators in Newtown last December with a semiautomatic rifle and several 30-round magazines.A federal assault weapons ban — which the president called for again this week at an emotional rally in Connecticut — will not be included in the Senate's main gun bill. A ban on high-capacity magazines appeared in doubt as well. Most of the frenzied last-ditch negotiations in Washington were aimed at salvaging a measure that had seemed almost assured of passage in the Senate just months ago: universal background checks for gun sales, which have overwhelming public support and which a number of Republican senators had appeared open to earlier in the year.Why has it been so much harder for Senate Democrats to pass gun bills than it was for Colorado Democrats? The answer lies in the unforgiving math of Senate procedure. Colorado's most contentious new law, which banned magazines that hold more than 15 rounds of ammunition, passed its State Senate with 51 percent of the vote, and no Republican support. But because of the rules of the United States Senate, Democrats effectively need 60 percent of the vote to overcome the threat of filibusters and pass legislation there.That contrast helps explain why the nation's post-Newtown gun debate has not always followed the script that some predicted in the immediate aftermath of the shooting. New gun restrictions in Colorado, New York, Connecticut and Maryland went further than many advocates on both sides had initially expected. At the national level, though, the president has faced an even steeper climb than many expected as he has labored to persuade the Senate to act on expanded background checks.Not that passing new gun regulations in the states was easy.An increasingly urban Colorado relishes its frontier image, and its Democratic governor, John W. Hickenlooper, had seemed cool to gun control in the past. But a combination of timing and tragedy paved the way for the bills that passed there last month. Many Democrats were galvanized to act after a gunman strode into a movie theater in Aurora in July and opened fire on the full midnight house, killing 12, wounding dozens and evoking painful memories of an earlier shooting: the 1999 massacre at Columbine High School.Then Democrats won control of both houses of the state legislature in November, putting action within reach. In mid-December, Mr. Hickenlooper said the time had come to re-examine the state's gun laws. Then came the Newtown shooting. Lawmakers knew they did not have much time."We meet 120 days out of the year," said Representative Dominick Moreno, a Democrat from Commerce City, northeast of Denver. "You can't fiddle around like Congress does."The opposition was fierce. Gun owners thronged the Capitol, and opponents of gun restrictions circled the building in their cars one day, honking loudly enough to be heard inside. An airplane circled overhead another day towing a banner that read, "Why does Hick hate guns?"
CHICAGO — Robin Kelly, whose stance on stricter federal gun laws brought a cascade of "super PAC" support to her campaign earlier this year, easily won the Congressional seat resigned by Jesse L. Jackson Jr. in a special election here Tuesday.Facing a lesser-known Republican opponent, Paul McKinley, and a handful of third-party candidates, Ms. Kelly had been widely expected to win in the Democrat-leaning district, which includes the South Side of Chicago and its suburbs. She was expected to be sworn in by the end of the week to represent a community that has been without a voice in the House for nearly a year."We not only won an election," Ms. Kelly, 56, said in her victory speech. "We took on the N.R.A., we gave a voice to the voiceless, and we put our communities on a brand new path to a brighter day." She was joined on a stage by the parents of Hadiya Pendleton, a 15-year-old girl who was killed in Chicago gun violence in January, a week after performing during President Obama's inauguration festivities.Ms. Kelly prevailed in a more competitive primary battle in February — aided by Michael R. Bloomberg, the mayor of New York City and a staunch gun control supporter — that thrust her unexpectedly into the spotlight amid a national debate over firearms. She now carries with her to Washington sizable public expectations."I think she has no choice but to be one to stand up and be one of the more vocal members of Congress around the issue of guns," said Representative Bobby L. Rush of Illinois, one of Ms. Kelly's new Democratic colleagues. "I think for her to lowball that would be a mistake. It would be sending mixed signals to her constituents."Illinois's Second Congressional District seat was left vacant for the first time in almost two decades after Mr. Jackson, 48, took a medical leave last summer and later disclosed that he was being treated for bipolar disorder. Despite a long absence from public view, the congressman won re-election in November, only to resign two weeks later, citing his ill health and acknowledging a federal investigation into his use of campaign funds for personal use.In February, Mr. Jackson, son of the Rev. Jesse L. Jackson, the civil rights activist, pleaded guilty to one felony fraud count and admitted to using $750,000 in campaign cash to buy items like celebrity memorabilia and expensive furniture. His sentencing was scheduled for June 28.Framed by a rash of violence in Chicago, the primary race to replace Mr. Jackson gained widespread attention because of an unexpected surge of spending by Mr. Bloomberg. His political action committee, Independence USA, ran more than $2 million worth of advertisements in the special election attacking some Democratic candidates for being friendly with the National Rifle Association. He endorsed Ms. Kelly, who wore her "F" rating by the gun lobby proudly.Mr. Bloomberg's group said it had not spent in the general election.Representative Jan Schakowsky, another Illinois Congressional Democrat, said, "I think she understands that her victory had implications beyond the Second District and beyond Illinois when it comes to gun violence."Some former colleagues from Ms. Kelly's days in the state legislature said they were surprised to watch guns emerge as her chief campaign issue this year. While they acknowledged that she had backed gun restrictions, issues like education, economic development and domestic violence bills stood out in their minds as some of her more passionate pursuits at the time."It seemed that forces outside her control really created this issue to be the issue of the race," said Representative Aaron Schock, an Illinois Republican who served with Ms. Kelly in the legislature and will again be her colleague in Congress.Ms. Kelly had been part of a passionate gun debate before. She has had some victories, including a 2003 measure criminalizing the practice of buying a gun for someone else in some circumstances. The bill was co-sponsored by Barack Obama, then a state senator. President Obama endorsed Ms. Kelly last week.But she has also taken her share of legislative bruises. Almost a decade ago, as lawmakers in Illinois debated whether to ban assault weapons, Ms. Kelly, a sponsor of one such bill, would often retire to a nearby restaurant after a hard day on the House floor, spooning at an order of ice cream while nursing her wounds."We'd sit there and talk about how we got creamed for the day," said Alderman Deborah L. Graham, a former state representative who sponsored some gun-related bills with Ms. Kelly. "Sometimes we'd be there, and we'd almost be in tears because the debates had been so extreme."
When Zina Haughton, 42, got a restraining order against her husband, Radcliffe, last October — she told a court that his threats "terrorize my every waking moment" — he became ineligible to buy a gun under federal law. But he found a way around that: he bought a gun from a private seller he found on the Internet who, unlike federally licensed dealers, was not legally required to check his background.That is how Mr. Haughton was able to buy a handgun for $500 in the parking lot of a McDonalds that he took with him on Oct. 21 to the spa in a suburb of Milwaukee where his wife worked. There, Mr. Haughton opened fire at the spa's pedicure station, law enforcement officials said, and kept shooting until he had killed his wife and two women she worked with and injured four other women. He then killed himself.Cases like the Wisconsin spa shooting are at the heart of the debate raging in Washington over whether to expand background checks for all gun purchases — a proposal the Senate plans to take up on Thursday. Ms. Haughton's brother, Elvin Daniel, a hunter who belongs to the National Rifle Association, has traveled to Washington to call for expanded background checks. "I feel that had there been a background check, had that been in place, my sister would still be with us today," he said Wednesday.Opponents of expanded background checks, including the National Rifle Association, argue that they would not prevent criminals from acquiring guns, since many get them through back-market sales or theft, or by getting "straw purchasers" — people who can pass background checks — to buy guns on their behalf.But the checks have blocked purchases. Since 1998 the F.B.I. has rejected more than a million would-be sales, and when state-level rejections are factored in the number of denials is closer to two million — usually because the would-be buyers are convicted felons, or fugitives from justice, or mentally ill, among other reasons. How many of those rejected buyers were able buy guns without background checks, from private sellers or over the Internet, is difficult to say, in part because restrictions imposed by Congress make it difficult for law enforcement officials to track firearms sales.While private sales at gun shows account for a small proportion of private gun sales, researchers say, they have been found vulnerable to abuses. When New York City sent undercover private investigators to try to buy guns from private sellers at gun shows in 2009, it reported that 19 of the 30 sellers they approached agreed to sell them guns even after they were told that the buyers "probably couldn't pass" a background check.There are problems with the background check system. Gaps in the F.B.I.'s database of criminal and mental health records, which are consulted during background checks, have allowed thousands of people to buy firearms who should have been barred.Many states fail to send the federal government comprehensive data on people with mental illness. Before the mass shooting at Virginia Tech in 2007, for example, a Virginia state judge had declared the gunman mentally ill. But the record was not sent to the F.B.I., so the gunman was able to pass a background check and buy the weapons he used to kill 32 people. (Virginia now submits more data to the F.B.I.)Another loophole has allowed thousands of prohibited buyers to legally purchase firearms over the past decade — and some of those weapons were ultimately used in crimes, according to court records and government documents. The problem stems from the three-day period the government has to determine whether someone is eligible to buy a gun.More than 95 percent of the time the F.B.I., which oversees the background checks, can tell licensed gun dealers within seconds if a buyer can own a gun.But when the F.B.I. cannot immediately determine whether would-be buyers have criminal or psychological records that would bar them from owning guns, it is given 72 hours to clear it up. If it fails to complete the background check by then, the buyer is allowed to return and purchase the gun. According to data provided by the F.B.I., roughly 3,000 firearms were sold to prohibited buyers through this loophole last year.If the F.B.I. eventually determines that the buyer should be prohibited from owning a weapon, it refers the case to the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives. The A.T.F. has said that it does not know how many weapons it has retrieved from prohibited buyers, because it is legally prohibited from tracking such data. But some current and former A.T.F. officials have said that such firearms are rarely retrieved.Matt Lehrich, a White House spokesman, said: "Ninety-five percent of all background checks are completed within three days. We're focused on improving the system to get that number even closer to 100 percent, including by providing incentives to states to provide better data and by ensuring federal agencies are strengthening their efforts to include relevant information."Evaluating background checks is not easy, given that many gun purchases from private sellers are not subject to them.Dr. Garen J. Wintemute, the director of the Violence Prevention Research Program at the University of California, Davis, said his research indicated that denying firearms to prohibited people reduced their likelihood of being subsequently arrested for gun crimes between 25 and 30 percent. "I think we have good evidence that background checks work," he said.But he noted that another study had found that after the Brady Act passed, states that had background checks and waiting periods for the first time did not see their homicide rates drop faster than states that had previously required such measures — although the study raised the possibility that the federal law could have driven down homicide rates even in states that already had background checks, by reducing the flow of guns from states that previously did not.Private sellers continue to sell guns to people who cannot legally own them.On Dec. 30, some Oklahoma City police officers saw three men trying to buy a gun at a gun show. When they ran a distinctive tattoo of one of them through a database, they learned he had "several felony convictions," according to a crime report. They stopped the men, and recovered the gun, after the men made an illegal right turn while leaving the gun show, the report said.
WASHINGTON — Senator Joe Manchin III so craved a pro-gun-rights Republican as a partner for a bill to expand background checks on gun buyers that he took to buttonholing senators on the in-house subway that ferries them from their offices to the Capitol, making his pitch while his colleagues were trapped with him in the tiny car.Repeatedly rebuffed, Mr. Manchin, a conservative West Virginia Democrat, decided to call on his friend Senator Patrick J. Toomey, the Pennsylvania Republican known almost exclusively for his conservative fiscal positions. On a recent Amtrak trip from New York to Washington where they happened to intersect, Mr. Toomey agreed to listen.On Wednesday the two gun owners, long favorites of the National Rifle Association, came together in a last-ditch effort on a background check compromise that opened the door to a rare Congressional consideration of gun law changes, beginning Thursday. While their agreement ensures only that the measure will reach the Senate floor for debate, it rescued gun law changes sought by President Obama and gun control groups from an early defeat.Lawmakers who represent neighboring states, allies on energy issues and temperamentally aligned, Mr. Manchin and Mr. Toomey announced they had gingerly put together a bipartisan deal that would expand background checks to cover unlicensed dealers at gun shows as well as all online sales.It would also maintain record-keeping provisions that law enforcement officials find essential in tracking guns used in crimes, but that some Republicans had balked at. Unlike the initial Democratic plan, it does not cover sales between family members and neighbors.For Mr. Toomey, a Republican toiling in a swing state chock-full of suburban women who often favor gun safety legislation, a relatively modest measure to expand background checks seemed both politically viable and in need of a Republican imprimatur. Gun legislation was "not something I sought," he said."I've got to tell you, candidly, I don't consider criminal background checks gun control," said Mr. Toomey, who led the conservative advocacy group Club for Growth after a stint in the House.He acknowledged that it was hard to take heat from fellow conservatives over his reach across the aisle."There have been people who've called the office expressing disappointment," he said in an interview. But some have expressed support, too, he said.For Mr. Manchin, whose signature campaign ad in 2010 featured him shooting environmental legislation with a hunting rifle, Mr. Toomey represented his best hope of a credible Republican ally who may be able to bring along fellow conservatives to the bill."I wanted to make sure whoever I was with came from a gun culture such as mine," Mr. Manchin, who opposes most gun control legislation but wants to close background check loopholes, said in an interview. "I just appreciate Pat so much for being able to get there." Mr. Manchin, who wept during a meeting with family members of victims of the Newtown shooting, has been lauded by gun control advocates for his help.The politics of the deal are so fragile that Mr. Toomey asked that one of the Democratic co-sponsors of the amendment, SenatorCharles E. Schumerof New York, not appear at a news conference Wednesday morning, Senate aides said. Mr. Schumer agreed, and told Mr. Manchin at the 50th-birthday party of the television hostJoe Scarboroughthat he would not be attending.The details took so much fine tuning that on Tuesday, as the two senators negotiated, "around 4:00 I was concerned we couldn't do it," Mr. Manchin said."We took a half-hour break," he said, and managed to put it over the line late Tuesday night.The gun bill will receive its first procedural vote in the Senate on Thursday. The House leadership sounded cool on the measure but for now the fight is in the Senate.
WASHINGTON — The families of the Newtown, Conn., shooting victims who have converged on Capitol Hill this week made a point of visiting Senator Heidi Heitkamp , a freshman Democrat known for the "North Dakota nice" of her home state, but on the main issue that brought them here — limiting the capacity of gun magazines and universal background checks — she curtly rejected their pleas for support."In our part of the country, this isn't an issue," Ms. Heitkamp explained in an interview afterward. "This is a way of life. This is how people feel, and it is extraordinarily difficult to explain that, especially to grieving parents."Bottom line, she said, "I'm going to represent my state."For years, guns have been the issue that swing-state Democrats like Ms. Heitkamp have sought to bury. Leading Democratic strategists still believe the assault weapons ban and the creation of background checks were a driving force in the Republican landslide of 1994. Six years later — after the Democratic presidential nominee Al Gore lost his home state, Tennessee; once-reliably Democratic West Virginia; and Arkansas, home to Bill Clinton, amid an onslaught of advertising by the National Rifle Association — many of those strategists vowed to let the issue of gun control lie dormant indefinitely.But many Democrats insist the mass shootings in December at Newtown, after similar shootings in Aurora, Colo., Tucson and Virginia, have changed the politics of guns."We're letting our country be governed and dictated to by the extremes," lamented Senator Joe Manchin III, a Democrat from West Virginia who once fired a rifle at President Obama's energy bill in a campaign commercial, as he met with seven family members of children and educators slain at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown.To other Democrats from rural Republican states, however, the landscape does not look all that different, especially if they are standing for re-election next year. Only two Democrats, Mark Begich of Alaska and Mark Pryor of Arkansas, voted against Thursday's procedural vote to break a filibuster to take up the gun legislation. But others are in question for the final votes."We might feel good about passing something new, but what we need is already law," Mr. Begich said after the vote, echoing the traditional gun-rights argument that greater enforcement of existing laws — not additional legislation — would suffice.Besides Senators Begich and Pryor, there are other Democrats in question for the final gun votes. Max Baucus of Montana, Mary L. Landrieu of Louisiana and Kay Hagan of North Carolina all face tough races next year — and tough choices now."I don't support the bill, but I support open debate," Mr. Baucus, who won the endorsement of the N.R.A. in 2008, said after the vote. "Montanans are opposed to this bill — by a very large margin."The political perils for such Democrats are real, said Vic Fazio, a former California representative who headed the Democratic Congressional Campaign Committee in 1994 when a four-decade Democratic House majority was swept away. There were other issues — tax increases, a failed health care overhaul — but gun control loomed large, he said. The N.R.A.'s power may have diminished since then, he said, but it has also concentrated in rural, conservative states.President Obama, until Newtown, had been a dutiful subscriber to the theory of avoiding the gun issue at all cost since the early days of his first presidential run. As recently as the second presidential debate with Mitt Romney in October, the president greeted a voter's question on assault weapons with a meandering answer that started: "We're a nation that believes in the Second Amendment, and I believe in the Second Amendment. We've got a long tradition of hunting and sportsmen and people who want to make sure they can protect themselves."And supporters of the current push seem to accept that Democratic losses are inevitable."It's going to be a very tough vote for a small handful of Democrats," said Senator Chris Murphy, Democrat of Connecticut and one of the bill's shepherds. "Regardless of whether we get 52 or 55 Democrats, we've always known we need Republicans."Democrats like Ms. Heitkamp staked their conservative claims on guns. Her last campaign commercial of 2012 declared "schools and tractors and guns" to be "part of how we live." Six days after the slaughter at Sandy Hook Elementary, she called the Obama administration's gun proposals "way in extreme of what I think is necessary or even should be talked about."Senator Pryor, one of the most endangered incumbents next year, stood up for expanding background checks to sales at gun shows in 2011. Now he is not so sure. "As a general rule, people in Arkansas do not want any gun control," he said Wednesday. "It's just sort of a blanket statement."
WASHINGTON — Pressed by shooting victims and relatives of Americans slain in gun violence, the Senate on Thursday voted to begin an emotionally and politically charged debate on gun safety proposals as advocates of new laws overcame a Republican filibuster threat.The strong majority in favor of considering legislation that would expand background checks and increase the penalties for illegal gun sales reflected the power of a lobbying campaign by parents of students killed in Newtown, Conn., and by others who persuaded reluctant lawmakers to back them in an initial fight that looked lost just last week. The vote was 68 to 31."It's remarkable," said Senator Christopher S. Murphy, a Democrat from Connecticut whose nascent Senate career has been devoted to gun safety. "You can't turn a corner in the Capitol this week without meeting a family of a gun violence victim. It's hard to say no to these families."But the victory could be short-lived. The vote in no way guaranteed passage of the gun measure; some Republicans and Democrats who voted for this initial step made clear they are not committed to supporting any final measure, even if they agreed to allow the debate."I am not sure I could have the courage to do what they did," said Senator Richard M. Burr, Republican of North Carolina, who met with family members of the Newtown victims on Wednesday. "It really does have an impact." Mr. Burr voted to debate the bill, but said he was unlikely to go further. "Is there anything I've seen so far that would move me to vote for new gun laws?" he said. "No."The coming weeks and even months will test both the resolve and the stamina of the families, who are both the best advocates for their cause and, in many ways, least equipped for its struggle."Every day is hard for me," said Mark Barden, the father of Daniel, who was killed at Sandy Hook Elementary School. "Making lunch for my kids is hard for me. Sleeping is hard. Waking up is hard. That being said, I just feel I need to be doing this."The bill will again need 60 votes to end the debate after consideration of contentious amendments offered by both supporters and opponents of new laws. Opponents of the measure could also try to filibuster individual amendments.Should the bill reach the stage where it could pass with a simple majority, it would still face a challenge. Though Democrats control 55 seats, many from conservative states who face re-election campaigns next year have indicated that they do not intend to vote for the bill, meaning Republican votes could be required to put it over the top.Twenty-nine Republicans opposed bringing the measure to the floor, along with two Democrats. Sixteen Republicans joined 50 Democrats and two independents in voting to proceed to consideration of the legislation. The two Democrats who voted against measure are both up for re-election in tough states in 2014: Senators Mark Begich of Alaska and Mark Pryor of Arkansas.Next week, the Senate is expected to begin reviewing the bill in earnest by voting on an amendment offered by Senators Joe Manchin III, Democrat of West Virginia and Patrick J. Toomey, Republican of Pennsylvania, that would expand background checks to cover unlicensed dealers at gun shows as well as all online sales. It would also maintain record-keeping provisions that law enforcement officials find essential in tracking guns used in crimes.This amendment would replace the background check provision of the original legislation, which would also create harsher penalties for the so-called straw purchasing of guns, in which people buy guns for others who are not able to legally. Subsequent amendments, dealing with mental health, a ban on assault weapons and other issues, are expected in the days ahead before a vote on the overall measure.The omnipresence of the families this week, encouraged by President Obama, and former Representative Gabrielle Giffords, appeared to stretch even toward the House, where the journey will be even more difficult should the Senate pass legislation.Speaker John A. Boehner, for instance, who earlier in the week reacted icily to the idea of new gun legislation, referred to the advocates Thursday after the Senate vote. "Listen, our hearts and prayers go out to the families of these victims," Mr. Boehner told reporters. "And I fully expect that the House will act in some way, shape or form. "
WASHINGTON — While the Senate has been consumed with a divisive debate over expanded background checks for gun buyers, lawmakers have been quietly working across party lines on legislation that advocates say could help prevent killers like Adam Lanza, the gunman in the Newtown, Conn., massacre, from slipping through the cracks.Proponents say the plans, which stand a good chance of being included in any final gun-control bill, would lead to some of the most significant advancements in years in treating mental illness and address a problem that people on both sides of the issue agree is a root cause of gun rampages. Unlike the bitter disagreements that have characterized efforts to limit access to guns, the idea of improving mental health unites Republicans and Democrats, urban and rural, blue state and red state."This is a place where people can come together," said Senator Debbie Stabenow, Democrat of Michigan, who has worked with some of the Senate's most conservative Republicans on a piece of mental health legislation. "As we've listened to people on all sides of the gun debate, they've all talked about the fact that we need to address mental health treatment. And that's what this does."The issue also appeals to members of Congress in another important way: it serves as a political refuge for Republicans and more conservative Democrats who are eager to offer a federal response to the shootings in Connecticut and Aurora, Colo., but have no interest in taking any action that could be seen as infringing on constitutional gun rights.Senator John Cornyn of Texas, the No. 2 Senate Republican, who has not wavered in his opposition to tighter gun laws, met with families of Newtown victims and said he came away believing they wanted to attack mental health problems above all else."This is actually something we can and should do something about," Mr. Cornyn said. "We need to make sure that the mentally ill are getting the help they need."Advocates for better mental health services said that many of them were initially uneasy about seizing on an event as tragic as the Connecticut school shootings to win improvements in care. And many have noted that very few violent crimes are committed by mentally ill people. But they came to believe that the current time was the best opportunity for real change, and that they might not get another one for a while."This is our moment," said Linda Rosenberg, the president of the National Council for Community Behavioral Healthcare. "I hate the connection between gun violence and the need for better mental health care, but sometimes you have to take what you can get."The emerging legislation would, among other things, finance the construction of more community mental health centers, provide grants to train teachers to spot early signs of mental illness and make more Medicaid dollars available for mental health care.There would be suicide prevention initiatives and support for children who have faced trauma. The sponsors of one of the bills estimated that an additional 1.5 million people with mental illness would be treated each year.Ms. Stabenow's measure has attracted backing from some of the Senate Republicans who are strongly backed by the National Rifle Association, including Marco Rubio of Florida and Roy Blunt of Missouri. Both of those lawmakers opposed the successful effort on Thursday to overcome a Republican filibuster and begin debate on a gun measure.One of the proposals being negotiated, which has the support of Senators Tom Harkin, Democrat of Iowa, and Lamar Alexander, Republican of Tennessee, unanimously passed a Senate committee this week, something that could hardly be said about any of the gun legislation.President Obama has also joined the effort. His budget includes $130 million for programs that would help detect mental illness in young children, train educators to spot those signs and refer the students to treatment.Treatment for mentally ill people is but one of many issues before Congress, and it lacks not only headline-grabbing elements like semiautomatic weapons and gun-show loopholes, but also a backer like Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York who can bankroll a multimillion-dollar advertising campaign to remind voters to contact their senators.Nevertheless, the issue has moved rapidly through the Senate, because of the efforts of the mental health lobby and because many legislators have a personal connection to mental illness. Senator Harry Reid, the majority leader, spoke the other day about his father's suicide by gun.Senate Democratic aides said that there is likely to be at least one mental health bill offered as an amendment to the larger gun package. The problem will be accommodating all of the additions.Democrats have to agree to allow Republicans the same number of amendments as they give themselves. To reduce the likelihood that Republicans will offer multiple amendments that could water down and even torpedo the gun bill, it is in Democrats' interest to limit their amendments.A major reason proponents of this legislation see it as so significant is that unlike background checks or weapons bans, properly treating mental illness can prevent problems before a potential killer tries to buy a gun."Interestingly enough, if you look at Aurora, Tucson, Newtown, the people we're talking about are very likely not individuals whose names would be on any lists," said Ronald S. Honberg, the legal director for the National Alliance on Mental Illness. He noted that none of the recent spree killers he mentioned had been declared "mentally defective" by a judge, the legal standard for a name landing in the background check system.Though more stringent reporting standards into the nation's background check system will undoubtedly help, he added, there will always be holes."It's very difficult to come up with a system that's foolproof," he said. "The bigger point is if you really want to improve mental health care in this country, then let's improve mental health care."
WASHINGTON — Victims of the massacre in Newtown, Conn., had just been laid to rest when Wayne LaPierre , the chief executive of the National Rifle Association , met with his board of directors in early January. A national tide of grief had prompted new attacks on his group and a White House push for more gun control measures, while Mr. LaPierre — who had called for armed guards in every school — was pilloried as a " gun nut " on the cover of The New York Post."I don't know why the N.R.A. or the Second Amendment and lawful gun owners have to somehow end up in a story every time some crazy person goes off and kills children," he complained to Cleta Mitchell, a board member, who says Mr. LaPierre was "horrified" by the deaths and "insanely angry" that he and the N.R.A. were being blamed."These people are out to get us and the Second Amendment," she recalls him telling the board, "and we're not going to let them."Now, as the Senate takes up gun control measures, the no-compromise strategy Mr. LaPierre has honed over his 35 years with the association is facing its most difficult test in decades. Lawmakers may defy Mr. LaPierre by extending background checks on some gun purchases, which the N.R.A. opposes. But since that grim January planning meeting, Mr. LaPierre has prevented what he and his group feared most: bans on assault weapons and high-capacity magazines.Though Mr. LaPierre has long been on the public stage, today he provokes perhaps more debate than ever about who exactly he is. Supporters see him as a steadfast Second Amendment purist; critics cast him as a paranoid figure who believes, as he said last year, in "a massive Obama conspiracy" to seize the nation's firearms or as a cynical mouthpiece who is paid nearly $1 million a year to warn of crackdowns and crises he knows will never come."Wayne reminds me of the clowns at the circus," one of his most vocal detractors, Gov. Dannel P. Malloy of Connecticut, said after his state passed new gun control laws this month. "They get the most attention. That's what he's paid to do."Once so bookish that he was known for his copious note-taking and so clumsy with a gun that colleagues laughed at his shooting, Mr. LaPierre, 64, helped invent the modern N.R.A. and transformed himself along with it into a right-wing folk hero and a reliable source of polarizing statements.Liberals search for explanations as to how a man who is no one's idea of a highly polished spokesman can be so effective, and they accuse Mr. LaPierre of buying influence with campaign cash and intimidating lawmakers by "scoring," or issuing public report cards, on how they vote. But what his critics often overlook is the iron relationship Mr. LaPierre has forged with many N.R.A. members.Week after week, year after year, he is on the road, traveling to gun shows and hotel ballroom fund-raisers, where he dispenses affirmation and absolution, telling firearms enthusiasts that their N.R.A. ties have nothing to do with violence and everything to do with freedom.The attendees form a ready-made base that Mr. LaPierre can draw on whenever he sees a threat to gun rights, and after spending much of his career building the membership — now nearly five million, the group says — he knows it well."We've got one guy on our committee, he's 72 years old, he's got a two-foot-long gray ponytail, and twice Wayne has picked him out at the national convention to give him a hug, to say, 'You're my trouper,' " said Gary Kamp, a judge in Cape Girardeau, Mo., who helped host a recent "Friends of the N.R.A." dinner there for educational and training charities.N.R.A. members admire Mr. LaPierre, who declined to be interviewed for this article, as "a guy who will never fold," said Grover Norquist, the antitax crusader who is another board member."We are so used to electing politicians who go to Washington, D.C., and trim their sails and trade favors and do things they say they would never do," Mr. Norquist said. "If you are going to ask people to write $25 checks, you have to signal to people, 'I'm not folding; don't you think about folding.' And him not folding reminds everybody that we haven't given up."Three months and a day after the Newtown massacre, Mr. LaPierre, dressed in his trademark business suit and starched white shirt, arrived with a security detail at a convention hall overlooking the Potomac for the annual Conservative Political Action Conference, a gathering of thousands of activists sponsored, in part, by the N.R.A.From the earliest days after the shooting, Mr. LaPierre had been working to counter any legislative impact: sowing concerns about background checks, which in the late 1990s he supported; introducing his "National School Shield" plan to arm teachers, administrators and other school personnel; and making sure his base felt protected as the national trauma sank in.
WASHINGTON — The mother of a child killed in the school shooting in Newtown, Conn., delivered a raw plea on Saturday for the Senate to pass gun control legislation, using an avenue normally reserved for the president.Struggling to maintain her composure, Francine Wheeler spoke of her 6-year-old son, Ben, who was killed on Dec. 14 at Sandy Hook Elementary School, as President Obama took the unusual step of letting someone else deliver the White House's weekly address."I've heard people say that the tidal wave of anguish our country felt on 12/14 has receded — but not for us," Ms. Wheeler said with her husband, David, by her side. "To us, it feels as if it happened just yesterday. And in the four months since we lost our loved ones, thousands of other Americans have died at the end of a gun. Thousands of other families across the United States are also drowning in our grief.""Please help us do something before our tragedy becomes your tragedy," she said.The presence on Capitol Hill last week of the families of those killed in Newtown was considered a crucial element in getting the Senate to vote, 68 to 31, to proceed with debate on gun safety proposals. While the families of the 20 children and 6 educators killed do not all support tighter gun restrictions, those in favor of greater control have proved to be some of the most compelling advocates, successfully pushing for new laws in Connecticut.Mr. Obama, after delivering his own appeal on gun control on Monday in Hartford, gave families a ride to Washington on Air Force One so they could lobby members of Congress. The president "believes their voices and resolve have been critical to the continued progress we've seen in the Senate," Jay Carney, the press secretary, said of the families on Friday.But the victory in no way guaranteed passage of the gun measure; some Republicans and Democrats who voted for the initial step said they would not support the final bill.At the administration's request, Ms. Wheeler taped her message in the White House library on Friday, an Obama aide said. She and Mr. Wheeler composed her remarks, which she delivered sometimes with a smile, but always on the verge of tears."Sometimes I close my eyes and all I can remember is that awful day waiting at the Sandy Hook Volunteer Firehouse for the boy who would never come home — the same firehouse that was home to Ben's Tiger Scout Den 6," Ms. Wheeler said. "But other times, I feel Ben's presence filling me with courage for what I have to do — for him and all the others taken from us so violently and too soon."Ms. Wheeler encouraged viewers and listeners to call their senators and "help this be the moment when real change begins."The Wheelers have been some of the most visible of the Newtown parents, participating in multiple media interviews and speaking to lawmakers in both Washington and Connecticut.Released on YouTube and broadcast on radio and TV each Saturday, the weekly address is usually delivered by Mr. Obama as part of a tradition that began with Franklin D. Roosevelt's "fireside chats" and was brought back by Ronald Reagan in 1982. According to Mr. Carney, Ms. Wheeler's speech was the first time during the Obama administration that someone other than Mr. Obama or Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. has given the address.The Republicans' weekly address focused on another major issue from a busy week in Washington: Mr. Obama's budget request. "The president's budget isn't a compromise," said Representative Jackie Walorski of Indiana. "It's a blank check for more spending and more debt."
WEST PLAINS, Mo. — At 8:30 on a cloudy, frigid morning late last month in this folksy Ozark town, the superintendent of an area school strolled through the glass doors of the local newspaper office to deliver a news release.Hours later, the content of that release produced a front-page headline in The West Plains Daily Quill that caught residents off guard: "At Fairview School Some Employees Now Carry Concealed Weapons."That was how most parents of Fairview students learned that the school had trained some of its staff members to carry weapons, and the reaction was loud — and mostly gleeful."Sooo very glad to hear this," a woman whose grandchildren attend Fairview posted on the Facebook page of The Quill, adding, "All schools in America should do this."As federal and state legislators continue to debate gun control and school safety measures in the months after the school shooting in Newtown, Conn., communities around the country are wasting little time taking safety issues into their own hands. Some schools have hired armed guards. Others have implemented buzzer systems at their doors.Very few have gone so far as training teachers and other faculty members to carry weapons, and support for such measures seems to be lukewarm. Bills to allow school employees to arm themselves are stalling in most of the roughly two dozen states where they were introduced this year.But the community making up the 600-student Fairview School, where a sign at the main entrance reads "Drug Free Gun Free School Zone," represents a culture in which the idea of guns in classrooms is not necessarily intimidating. Hunting a variety of game like deer and turkey is as routine a form of recreation here in the craggy, wooded Ozarks of south-central Missouri as beer and baseball is in some parts of the nation.By the time they are 6, many young boys and girls already have learned how to safely handle a weapon and have shot their first deer. Some live in homes where guns are not under lock and key, or on vast prairies where they shoot skeet with their families.Sherri Roy, who has four children at the school, said in an interview that she "was really pleased" that some staff members were armed."If I didn't know anything about guns, if I wasn't raised with it, I'm sure I would be more uncomfortable," she said. "But in this area guns are pretty much a normal, everyday part of your life."But even in a place where hunting rifles are a staple of most households, attitudes about armed teachers are diverse.Fairview is one of five schools on the outskirts of West Plains, serving families mostly living outside the city. Administrators at some of the other rural schools have shunned the idea of allowing staff members to carry guns.Though it would take the Howell County Sheriff's Department at least 15 minutes to respond to any trouble at Glenwood School on the outskirts of West Plains, Karen Moffis, the principal, said that allowing employees to carry guns would be more dangerous than beneficial. Instead, the school is looking to better secure its entrances and is considering hiring an armed guard, she said.And it is not that she is uncomfortable around guns — she got her first when she was 6 years old. A teacher at the school gives lessons on firearms safety on campus after hours."Traditionally in this area, schools have already been a very safe and welcoming community," Ms. Moffis said. Referring to teachers having guns in the classroom, she added, "Nobody's ever thought about needing that kind of thing at school."Fairview, which runs from kindergarten through eighth grade, is a lot like any other grammar school. Colorful linoleum tiles line the floors, projects made of construction paper are taped to the walls, and the cafeteria, on a recent day, reeked of nachos.After the shooting at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown that killed 26 people, administrators at Fairview said some parents approached them about allowing teachers to carry guns. Becky Wright-Welty, whose 13-year-old son attends the school, said she asked the Fairview School District's board members: "What are we doing about security? I want to know."One of the biggest concerns of administrators and parents was that the quickest the sheriff's department could reach Fairview, the district's only school, would be nine minutes.
WASHINGTON — Deep divisions within both parties over a bipartisan measure to extend background checks for gun buyers are threatening its chances as the Senate this week begins debating the first broad gun control legislation in nearly 20 years.In spite of a vote last Thursday in favor of debating new gun measures, some Democrats who are facing re-election next year in conservative states have already said they will not vote for the background check measure offered by Senators Patrick J. Toomey, Republican of Pennsylvania, and Joe Manchin III, Democrat of West Virginia, forcing Democrats to look desperately across the aisle to fill the gaps.Republicans, in the meantime, are bitterly torn between moderates who feel pressure to respond to polls showing a majority of Americans in support of some new gun regulations and conservatives who are deeply opposed to them.Further, an impending immigration bill may force Republicans to choose between softening their stance on either immigration or guns, but not both.Sixty-eight senators, pressured by the families of those killed in gun violence, came together last week to overcome a filibuster threat that would have quashed the debate on a broader gun bill. But many of those votes are clearly not translating into yes votes for the only background check measure that has attracted bipartisan support."We've got some work to do," Mr. Manchin said in an interview Sunday. "You've got some very close Democratic colleagues who are having some difficulties, and our Republican colleagues are trying to get comfortable."On Sunday, a small gun rights group, the Citizens Committee for the Right to Keep and Bear Arms, came out in favor of the Toomey-Manchin amendment, prompting Mr. Manchin to say he hoped the endorsement would help win more yes votes. Also on Sunday, Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, said he was inclined to support the measure; his vote, should it be yes, could bring along others and push the bill toward the 60 votes needed for final passage. .And supporters of gun safety legislation, including President Obama, plan to campaign all week to win over some lawmakers who have expressed misgivings. Public pressure to pass gun legislation is also intensifying, with the families of the people killed in the Newtown, Conn., school massacre last year waging a highly public, and potent, campaign to win over lawmakers.But an accounting of likely votes shows how difficult it could be to pass new gun legislation.Senator Mark Begich, Democrat of Alaska, says he will vote against the measure, and at least three other Democrats are expected to join him in trying to defeat it, including Heidi Heitkamp, a freshman senator from North Dakota. Some left-leaning Democrats may also balk because of the gun-rights provisions that have been added to the bill to entice Republicans.Among the 16 Republicans who joined 50 Democrats and two independents in voting last week to proceed to consideration of gun legislation, roughly seven have already decided not to support the measure. Another half-dozen Republicans who voted to proceed on the bill remain ambivalent.The Republican Senators Lamar Alexander of Tennessee, Johnny Isakson of Georgia, Lindsey Graham of South Carolina and Bob Corker of Tennessee, all of whom voted to proceed on the bill, are no votes right now, and several others are expected to also vote down the amendment on Tuesday, the expected day of the vote.It is also unclear whether Senator Frank R. Lautenberg, Democrat of New Jersey, a likely yes vote who has been largely absent in the 113th Congress, would show up for the crucial vote this week.Mr. Manchin, who spent much of last week buttonholing colleagues at the Senate gym and giving out handwritten pleas for support on the Senate floor, said he felt certain that people who read the bill would find their objections quelled. "The thing is, the easiest vote for me or any senator to make is 'no,' " he said.The Republican conflict came to the fore last week during a closed-door luncheon for Senate Republicans, when Senator Susan Collins, of Maine, eyes blazing, stood up and complained about a series of attack ads that she was facing back home from a gun-rights group with deep ties to Senator Rand Paul, Republican of Kentucky.
WASHINGTON — Deep divisions within both parties over a bipartisan measure to extend background checks for gun buyers are threatening its chances as the Senate this week begins debating the first broad gun control legislation in nearly 20 years.In spite of a vote last Thursday in favor of debating new gun measures, some Democrats who are facing re-election next year in conservative states have already said they will not vote for the background check measure offered by Senators Patrick J. Toomey, Republican of Pennsylvania, and Joe Manchin III, Democrat of West Virginia, forcing Democrats to look desperately across the aisle to fill the gaps.Republicans, in the meantime, are bitterly torn between moderates who feel pressure to respond to polls showing a majority of Americans in support of some new gun regulations and conservatives who are deeply opposed to them.Further, an impending immigration bill may force Republicans to choose between softening their stance on either immigration or guns, but not both.Sixty-eight senators, pressured by the families of those killed in gun violence, came together last week to overcome a filibuster threat that would have quashed the debate on a broader gun bill. But many of those votes are clearly not translating into yes votes for the only background check measure that has attracted bipartisan support."We've got some work to do," Mr. Manchin said in an interview Sunday. "You've got some very close Democratic colleagues who are having some difficulties, and our Republican colleagues are trying to get comfortable."On Sunday, a small gun rights group, the Citizens Committee for the Right to Keep and Bear Arms, came out in favor of the Toomey-Manchin amendment, prompting Mr. Manchin to say he hoped the endorsement would help win more yes votes. Also on Sunday, Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, said he was inclined to support the measure; his vote, should it be yes, could bring along others and push the bill toward the 60 votes needed for final passage. .And supporters of gun safety legislation, including President Obama, plan to campaign all week to win over some lawmakers who have expressed misgivings. Public pressure to pass gun legislation is also intensifying, with the families of the people killed in the Newtown, Conn., school massacre last year waging a highly public, and potent, campaign to win over lawmakers.But an accounting of likely votes shows how difficult it could be to pass new gun legislation.Senator Mark Begich, Democrat of Alaska, says he will vote against the measure, and at least three other Democrats are expected to join him in trying to defeat it, including Heidi Heitkamp, a freshman senator from North Dakota. Some left-leaning Democrats may also balk because of the gun-rights provisions that have been added to the bill to entice Republicans.Among the 16 Republicans who joined 50 Democrats and two independents in voting last week to proceed to consideration of gun legislation, roughly seven have already decided not to support the measure. Another half-dozen Republicans who voted to proceed on the bill remain ambivalent.The Republican Senators Lamar Alexander of Tennessee, Johnny Isakson of Georgia, Lindsey Graham of South Carolina and Bob Corker of Tennessee, all of whom voted to proceed on the bill, are no votes right now, and several others are expected to also vote down the amendment on Tuesday, the expected day of the vote.It is also unclear whether Senator Frank R. Lautenberg, Democrat of New Jersey, a likely yes vote who has been largely absent in the 113th Congress, would show up for the crucial vote this week.Mr. Manchin, who spent much of last week buttonholing colleagues at the Senate gym and giving out handwritten pleas for support on the Senate floor, said he felt certain that people who read the bill would find their objections quelled. "The thing is, the easiest vote for me or any senator to make is 'no,' " he said.The Republican conflict came to the fore last week during a closed-door luncheon for Senate Republicans, when Senator Susan Collins, of Maine, eyes blazing, stood up and complained about a series of attack ads that she was facing back home from a gun-rights group with deep ties to Senator Rand Paul, Republican of Kentucky.
WASHINGTON — Short of votes for their compromise gun legislation, Senators Joe Manchin III , Democrat of West Virginia, and Patrick J. Toomey , Republican of Pennsylvania, on Monday considered changes to their plan to expand background checks for gun buyers as they scrambled to win needed converts.One approach designed to entice lawmakers representing large rural areas, particularly in Alaska, would exempt residents who live hundreds of miles from a gun dealer. Lawmakers are hoping that they can attract support from both Republicans and Democrats who are weighing the political costs and benefits of a bill against the perception that they are chipping away at gun rights.Headed into votes this week, Senate Republicans and Democrats continued to negotiate how the legislation and its amendments, including the Toomey-Manchin measure, will be brought to the floor.Some senators are advocating voting for a series of amendments in advance of the background check measure, allowing members to vote for or against proposals like a renewed assault weapons ban, a limit on high-capacity magazines and a new mental health provision before weighing in on the background check measure. Republicans are seeking their own amendments, including a measure that would make it easier to carry concealed weapons across state lines."I hope a few unreasonable extremists will not try to prevent an up-or-down vote on this legislation with a filibuster," Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, said on the Senate floor.In a possible complication for supporters, Senator Tom Coburn, Republican of Oklahoma, will introduce his own background check measure. It would mandate universal background checks through the Internet without the paper trail that law enforcement says is needed to track illegal guns.Mr. Coburn will promote the bill as bipartisan — although it will have no Democratic co-sponsor — in an appeal that Republicans hope will lure away members of their own party who were considering voting for Mr. Toomey and Mr. Manchin's amendment.Mr. Coburn circulated a letter to Senate colleagues promoting his approach to background checks. Under the proposal, would-be gun purchasers would obtain "preclearance" before attending a gun show or shopping online by running a background check on themselves through a government-run Internet site. Mr. Coburn believes that if the Manchin-Toomey approach fails, his amendment will obtain broad, bipartisan support; critics suggest that the amendment would weaken current background check laws.Last week, 68 senators voted to overcome a filibuster threat that would have quashed the debate on a broader gun bill that seeks to stem illegal gun trafficking and increase the number of gun sales subject to background checks.Mr. Manchin and Mr. Toomey have written an amendment intended to substitute for the background check component of the current bill, which has attracted scant support from Republicans. Mr. Manchin and Mr. Toomey's bill has far more exemptions as well as pieces that strengthen gun rights in some ways, and is seen as the best hope for a foundation of a bipartisan consensus measure.But the two senators have struggled to assemble the 60 votes needed to pass their measure. They are now trying to bring on reluctant Democrats from conservative states, and in some cases, members from both parties who represent a state together.Senator Mark Begich, Democrat of Alaska, has been cool to new gun measures, and Senator Lisa Murkowski, a Republican from the state, voted against even proceeding to debate gun measures. Supporters of the background check amendment believe the exemptions for people who live far from gun dealers might appeal to them.Among the 16 Republicans who joined 50 Democrats and two independents in voting last week to proceed to consideration of gun legislation, more than a half dozen have already decided not to support the measure, and other Republicans who voted to proceed on the bill remain ambivalent. The hope is that some changes to the bill may bring others along."The senator is still reviewing the proposal and has not made a final decision," said Rachel Barinbaum, a spokeswoman for Mr. Begich, who last week said the measure seemed out of step with Alaska voters.Democrats are also concerned about the extended absence of Senator Frank Lautenberg, a New Jersey Democrat and the oldest member of the Senate at 89, who has been away for weeks dealing with health complications partly from cancer treatment he received several years ago. Aides said Mr. Lautenberg hoped to be there for the gun votes this week.On Monday, Mr. Manchin and Mr. Toomey made their case on the Senate floor in an attempt to beat back criticism that their background check measure would somehow lead to a national gun registry."If you're a believer in the Second Amendment right to bear arms, you're going to like this bill," Mr. Manchin said.
WASHINGTON — As a crucial series of gun-control votes approaches in the Senate, lawmakers on Capitol Hill are suddenly preoccupied with one question in particular: when is Frank Lautenberg coming back?Mr. Lautenberg, a New Jersey Democrat and the oldest member of the Senate at 89, has been out for weeks dealing with health complications partly from cancer treatment he received several years ago.But with Democrats scrambling to come up with enough votes to overcome resistance to the most sweeping gun-control legislation in a generation, Mr. Lautenberg's presence (or absence) is shaping up to be critically important.Aides insist that Mr. Lautenberg, who has been undergoing physical therapy for weeks, will try to get to Washington once the voting begins on the assortment of gun-safety measures, which are expected to come to the floor in the coming weeks.Mr. Lautenberg's aides say he is eager to return, particularly given that he introduced an amendment to ban high-capacity ammunition magazines."Senator Lautenberg is feeling better and hopes to be in Washington for gun votes," Caley Gray, a spokesman for the senator, said in a statement on Monday.For weeks, rumors and concern have been swirling about the health of Mr. Lautenberg, who this year announced that he would retire rather than seek a sixth term in 2014. The senator cast his most recent vote in the Senate on Feb. 28.The preoccupation with Mr. Lautenberg, one of the chamber's most ardent advocates of gun control, has only intensified as the Senate moved in recent days to begin the most significant debate on gun legislation in two decades.For the last few weeks, Mr. Lautenberg, who received a diagnosis of stomach cancer three years ago, has been grappling with debilitating and long-term consequences that powerful chemotherapy treatment has had on his leg muscles, according to people close to him.As a result, he has been using a wheelchair while undergoing physical therapy to regain his strength. But Mr. Lautenberg, an extraordinarily proud man who served in World War II, has not wanted to show up in the Senate in a wheelchair, according to those who know him.For Democrats, the interest in Mr. Lautenberg's health goes far beyond the coming votes on gun legislation.Should Mr. Lautenberg decide to retire before his term ends, his departure could have a significant impact on the balance of power in the Senate, where Democrats hold 53 seats and are typically joined by two independents.Gov. Chris Christie of New Jersey, a Republican, would have the legal authority to make an interim appointment to the seat. And he would almost certainly select a Republican, depriving Democrats of a crucial vote in the Senate.
Feb. 27: "I got 200 250 cashlooking for a good handgun please let me know what u got."Feb. 28: "Looking to buy some 9 mm ammo and not at a crazy price."The intentions and background of the prospective buyer were hidden, as is customary on such sites. The person posting these ads, however, left a phone number, enabling The New York Times to trace them to their source: Omar Roman-Martinez, 29, of Colorado Springs, who has a pair of felony convictions for burglary and another for motor vehicle theft, as well as a misdemeanor domestic violence conviction — all of which bar him from having guns. Yet he was so determined he even offered to trade a tablet computer or a vintage Pepsi machine for firearms.When questioned in a telephone interview, Mr. Roman-Martinez said he ultimately decided not to buy a weapon. He also insisted that a 9-millimeter handgun he posted for sale on the Web site last month belonged to someone else.The mere fact that Mr. Roman-Martinez was seeking to buy and sell guns on Armslist underscores why extending background checks to the growing world of online sales has become a centerpiece of new gun legislation being taken up in the Senate this week. With no requirements for background  checks on most private transactions, a Times examination found, Armslist and similar sites function as unregulated bazaars, where the essential anonymity of the Internet allows unlicensed sellers to advertise scores of weapons and people legally barred from gun ownership to buy them.The bipartisan Senate compromise under consideration would require that background checks be conducted through federally licensed dealers on all Internet and gun show sales. Gun control advocates argue that such checks might have prevented shootings like that of Zina Haughton, 42, who was killed in October with two other women by her husband, Radcliffe, even though a restraining order barred him from having guns. Mr. Haughton simply contacted a private seller on Armslist and handed over $500 in a McDonald's parking lot for a .40-caliber semiautomatic pistol and three magazines.Seeking a glimpse into the largely hidden online gun market, The Times assembled a database and analyzed several months of ads from Armslist, which has become the dominant player in the arena, and examined numerous smaller sites.Over the past three months, The Times identified more than 170,000 gun ads on Armslist. Some were for the same guns, making it difficult to calculate just how many guns were actually for sale. Even so, with more than 20,000 ads posted every week, the number is probably in the tens of thousands.Notably, 94 percent of the ads were posted by "private parties," who, unlike licensed dealers, are not required to conduct background checks.Besides Mr. Roman-Martinez, the Times investigation led to Gerard Toolin, 46, of Walterboro, S.C., who is a fugitive from the Rhode Island police and has two outstanding felony warrants as well as a misdemeanor warrant. His legal status bars him from owning guns, but he was recently seeking to buy an AK-47 assault rifle on Armslist and was also trying to trade a Marlin rifle. He posted photos to his Facebook account of an AK-47 he had already purchased, along with a variety of other guns.There was also Martin Fee, who has a domestic battery conviction in Florida and other arrests and convictions in Florida and New Jersey, including for drug possession, burglary and larceny. He was selling a Chinese SKS rifle on the classified section of another Web site, BudsGunShop.com.The examination of Armslist raised questions about whether many sellers are essentially functioning as unlicensed firearms dealers, in contravention of federal law. The law says that people who "engage in the business" of selling firearms need to obtain a license and conduct background checks on customers. While the definition of engaging in business is vague, The Times found that more than two dozen people had posted more than 20 different guns for sale in a several-month span.Among them was Joshua Lovejoy, 32, who since November has advertised more than 100 guns on Armslist, mostly in Canton, Ohio, ranging from AR-15 assault rifles to Glock 19 semiautomatic pistols. He once listed more than 20 guns in a single ad. He insisted in a telephone interview, however, that he had sold only a few.Then there was Ron Metz, 49, who has advertised more than 80 guns from Anderson, S.C., since February. Mr. Metz said in an interview he had needed money, so he started selling some guns and trading for others. He also bought other guns, which he turned around and sold as well. He said he had no real idea how many he had sold, guessing that it was more than a dozen. He never keeps any records and does not do any background checks, explaining: "I can just sort of read people."Armslist was the brainchild of Jonathan Gibbon and Brian Mancini, friends who attended the United States Air Force Academy and then transferred to the University of Pittsburgh.Mr. Gibbon, who did not respond to requests for comment, said in a 2010 interview with Human Events, a conservative Web site, that he got the idea for Armslist during the summer of 2007 when he saw that the classifieds Web site Craigslist.com had decided to ban gun-related ads "because a few users cried out for it." Mr. Gibbon, who went on to law school at the University of Oklahoma, where he founded the Second Amendment Club, said he had been inspired to "create a place for law-abiding gun owners to buy and sell online without all of the hassles of auctions and shipping."
WASHINGTON —   The Senate will vote Wednesday afternoon on a series of gun measures that may determine the shape of legislation inspired by the shootings in Newtown, Conn. By late Tuesday night, a bipartisan amendment to the legislation, which would expand background checks for gun buyers, seemed all but doomed as two members who the measure's sponsors had hoped would support it announced they would not.Senator Dean Heller, Republican of Nevada, citing constitutional worries, said he would vote against it. And late Tuesday night, Senator Lisa Murkowski, Republican of Alaska, said she too would reject the amendment, and threw her support behind a competing Republican measure. A handful of Democrats who were key to its passage would not commit to voting for it, and seemed increasingly likely to turn against the measure as its prospects for passage dimmed.Senator Joe Manchin III, Democrat of West Virginia, said Wednesday he was still scrambling for votes on the background check amendment that he created with Senator Pat Toomey, Republican of Pennsylvania.Under an agreement reached Tuesday evening, the Senate will vote on as many as nine amendments in an afternoon rush. Three are largely Democratic: a provision expanding background checks to firearms bought at gun shows or on the Internet, a reinstatement of an assault weapons ban, and a ban on high-capacity ammunition magazines.Others are Republican: a mandate that any state permit for carrying a concealed weapon be honored by virtually every other state, a broad alternative gun measure aimed at mental health care and school safety, and another helping veterans clear their names to obtain firearms.Two other measures are bipartisan, one to crack down on gun trafficking and another to bolster mental health treatment.The outcome of the votes could determine the bill's fate. If Republicans prevail and the measure shifts too far in the direction of new gun rights, the Democratic-controlled Senate may end up killing its own bill.Republicans are lining up behind an amendment that would effectively create a national conceal-carry law, a goal that gun groups have been pressing for years."You could actually expand the Second Amendment" with the bill, said Senator Lindsey Graham, Republican of South Carolina.Senate Democrats, trying to simply hold their ranks together behind a background check amendment written by Senators  Manchin and Toomey met for an emotional luncheon on Tuesday. Mr. Manchin gave a tearful, impassioned appeal for his measure as former Representative Gabrielle Giffords of Arizona looked on. Senator Tim Kaine, Democrat of Virginia, retold in detail the story of the professor at Virginia Tech who threw his body in front of a door to save students during the massacre there in 2007."It was really dramatic and convincing," said Senator Amy Klobuchar of Minnesota.Most legislative battles are fought with one party on offense, the other on defense. On guns, both parties see an opportunity to press their agendas, pursuing opposite goals and battling over the votes of the same conservative Democrats and moderate Republicans. In 1999, after the Columbine High School shootings, the Senate voted to expand federal background checks to purchases at gun shows, only to see a bipartisan coalition in the House vote to loosen existing background check rules. The legislation ultimately died.The same dynamic could be developing this time. Republicans, increasingly confident that they will be able to sustain a filibuster on expanded background checks, have turned their attention to their own priorities, especially a conceal-and-carry measure being drafted by Senator John Cornyn of Texas.Under that measure, any state with a conceal-and-carry rule would have to recognize the permit of any other state. Only Illinois and Washington, D.C., prohibit concealed weapons.But while some state standards are low, other states maintain restrictive rules on concealed weapons and grant local law enforcement officials latitude to deny such permits, as they do in New York City, said Jonathan Lowy, the director of the legal action project at the Brady Center, a gun control group. The Cornyn amendment would allow a gun owner in Texas to carry his firearm in Times Square. Gun control advocates say the Cornyn measure would foster a race to the bottom, as gun owners in more restrictive states argue that they should not be held to standards that visitors are not held to.Advocates see no difference between that rule and regulations that make each state recognize driver's licenses from all other states, and it will almost certainly be backed by a number of Democrats. In 2009, a similar measure received 58 votes, including those of 20 Democrats, 13 of whom are still in the Senate. That was two votes short of the 60 needed for passage.Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, supported it then, and Mr. Manchin said he would support it now.Mr. Reid did not rule out voting "yes" again, but he added, "I think we've all learned a lot in recent years, about first graders mowed down, people watching a movie being victims of an attack, a courthouse in Las Vegas."Republicans were also readying their own background check amendments as alternatives to the Manchin-Toomey provision, which would extend such checks to firearms bought at gun shows or on the Internet. If the Manchin-Toomey version is defeated, the gun measure on the floor would be left with a more expansive background check provision with even less support, and the overall gun bill would have an even steeper climb to passage.
WASHINGTON — When Senator Dianne Feinstein led the successful push for a federal assault weapons ban in 1994, she had a simple pitch to skeptical colleagues: What would you need to support this bill?But when she started asking that question this year as she pushed for a renewal of the ban, the answer was almost always a resolute "Nothing.""It was just, 'I'm sorry, I can't,' " Ms. Feinstein, Democrat of California, recalled of the refusals that kept coming. "They didn't give me a long litany of reasons."On Wednesday, Ms. Feinstein suffered a defeat as decisive as it was personal when she watched her fellow senators vote her bill down, 40 to 60, as they scuttled a broader package of gun control legislation.Even after the school massacre in Newtown, Conn., in December reignited the national debate over gun control, Ms. Feinstein's proposal was never close to passing the Senate, even by the most generous estimates.But that did not keep her from trying. And it did not lessen the sting any for a lawmaker who has fought for stronger gun laws since watching Harvey Milk, her friend and fellow San Francisco city supervisor, bleed to death in her arms from an assassin's bullet in 1978."I don't think she was ever under any illusion that it would be easy," said Senator Barbara Boxer, also a California Democrat."We all have heavy hearts, every one of us," she added. "You have to as you look at what has happened, and you look at a lot of cowardice in the Senate on these votes."But renewing Ms. Feinstein's efforts to reinstate the assault weapons ban that expired in 2004 left many of her allies wondering whether she had misdirected her considerable energy and passion on the issue. Almost immediately after the murders in Newtown, gun control advocates and the Democratic leadership in the Senate decided that legislation strengthening background checks for gun purchases was their best avenue for success. (Though in a sign of how they miscalculated over all, that measure was also defeated on Wednesday, falling five votes short.)An assault weapons ban was never going to attract senators like Joe Manchin III, Democrat of West Virginia, and Patrick J. Toomey, Republican of Pennsylvania, with A ratings from the National Rifle Association, whose support would be needed for a compromise. And Democrats now privately complain that Ms. Feinstein's bill seemed to rally gun control opponents, who could point to it as Exhibit A in what they perceived as a federal conspiracy to take guns away from law-abiding citizens.But she proceeded undeterred, even after Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, told her late last month that the weapons ban would not be included in the main gun control package because it lacked sufficient votes.Drawing on her lessons from the 1994 debate, Ms. Feinstein wrote and rewrote the language in her proposal in the days after Newtown to try to assuage concerns that it would ban weapons favored by hunters and target shooters. She exempted more than 2,200 different guns.She met with police fraternal organizations, sheriffs' associations and mayors. And almost everywhere she went as Wednesday's vote approached, she carried a file folder with her vote count on one side and, on the other, a front page of The Daily News with the headline "Shame on U.S." written over the photos of the 20 child victims from Newtown."This is a mission for me," she said Wednesday in an interview. "As I look at the pictures of these children, I just can't believe that this happened."Reflecting on what has changed since 1994, she noted the growing power and inflexibility of the National Rifle Association on any new gun laws and the use of the filibuster in the Senate, which Democrats did not have to overcome when the assault weapons ban passed 19 years ago."Then there was a very different feeling in the Senate," she said.On Wednesday afternoon right before the Senate voted on her bill, she stood on the floor and implored them, "Show some guts."Then, as the Senate clerk read through the roll call, her colleagues came up to where she was standing near the front of the well, and one by one patted her gently on the back.
WASHINGTON — A wrenching national search for solutions to the violence that left 20 children dead in Newtown, Conn., all but ended Wednesday after the Senate defeated several measures to expand gun control.In rapid succession, a bipartisan compromise to expand background checks for gun buyers, a ban on assault weapons and a ban on high-capacity gun magazines all failed to get the 60 votes needed under an agreement between both parties. Senators also turned back Republican proposals to expand permission to carry concealed weapons and to focus law enforcement efforts on prosecuting gun crimes.Sitting in the Senate gallery with other survivors of recent mass shootings and their family members, Lori Haas, whose daughter was shot at Virginia Tech, and Patricia Maisch, a survivor of the mass shooting in Arizona, shouted together, "Shame on you."President Obama, speaking at the White House after the votes, echoed the cry, calling Wednesday "a pretty shameful day for Washington."Opponents of gun control from both parties said that they made their decisions based on logic, and that passions had no place in the making of momentous policy."Criminals do not submit to background checks now," said Senator Charles E. Grassley, Republican of Iowa. "They will not submit to expanded background checks."It was a striking defeat for one of Mr. Obama's highest priorities, on an issue that has consumed much of the country since Adam Lanza opened fire with an assault weapon in the halls of Sandy Hook Elementary School in December.Faced with a decision either to remove substantial new gun restrictions from the bill or to allow it to fall to a filibuster next week, Senate leaders plan to put it on hold after a scattering of votes Thursday. Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader and a longtime gun rights advocate who had thrown himself behind the gun control measures, is expected to pull the bill from the Senate floor and move on to an Internet sales tax measure, then an overhaul of immigration policy, which has better prospects.More than 50 senators — including a few Republicans, but lacking a handful of Democrats from more conservative states — had signaled their support for the gun bill, not enough to reach the 60-vote threshold to overcome a filibuster.Democratic leadership aides said the effort could be revived if a public groundswell demanded it. "The world is watching the United States Senate, and we will be held accountable," said Senator Richard Blumenthal, Democrat of Connecticut, who helped lead the gun control effort.But with the families of Sandy Hook students in the Senate gallery and a flurry of gun rights phone calls flooding Senate offices, it was hard to imagine how much more emotion could be brought to bear. Aides to senators supporting the bill said that only outside circumstances, like another mass shooting, might cause those who voted "no" to reconsider their positions."It's almost like you can see the finish line, but you just can't get there," said Andrew Goddard, whose son, Colin, was hurt but survived the shooting at Virginia Tech. "It's more annoying to be able to see it and not get to it."Mr. Obama — who avoided the gun issue in his first term and focused on proposals he thought had a better chance of passing, only to seize on expansive measures after the Newtown shootings — made last-ditch appeals to senators, including Dean Heller, Republican of Nevada, and Kelly Ayotte, Republican of New Hampshire. Both rejected his entreaties.Standing in the Rose Garden next to former Representative Gabrielle Giffords and other victims of gun violence, Mr. Obama flashed anger as he said that the gun rights lobby had "willfully lied" about the legislation, and that Republicans and Democrats had "caved to the pressure.""But," he added, "this effort is not over."For now, the gun rights lobby has proved more persuasive.The National Rifle Association mobilized members to blanket the Senate with phone calls, e-mails and letters. The group also spent $500,000 on Wednesday alone, on an advertising campaign criticizing "Obama's gun ban" and using Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg, a deep-pocketed gun control advocate, as a foil. "Tell your senator to listen to America's police instead of listening to Obama and Bloomberg," the ad said.
WASHINGTON — A wrenching national search for solutions to the violence that left 20 children dead in Newtown, Conn., all but ended Wednesday after the Senate defeated several measures to expand gun control.In rapid succession, a bipartisan compromise to expand background checks for gun buyers, a ban on assault weapons and a ban on high-capacity gun magazines all failed to get the 60 votes needed under an agreement between both parties. Senators also turned back Republican proposals to expand permission to carry concealed weapons and to focus law enforcement efforts on prosecuting gun crimes.Sitting in the Senate gallery with other survivors of recent mass shootings and their family members, Lori Haas, whose daughter was shot at Virginia Tech, and Patricia Maisch, a survivor of the mass shooting in Arizona, shouted together, "Shame on you."President Obama, speaking at the White House after the votes, echoed the cry, calling Wednesday "a pretty shameful day for Washington."Opponents of gun control from both parties said that they made their decisions based on logic, and that passions had no place in the making of momentous policy."Criminals do not submit to background checks now," said Senator Charles E. Grassley, Republican of Iowa. "They will not submit to expanded background checks."It was a striking defeat for one of Mr. Obama's highest priorities, on an issue that has consumed much of the country since Adam Lanza opened fire with an assault weapon in the halls of Sandy Hook Elementary School in December.Faced with a decision either to remove substantial new gun restrictions from the bill or to allow it to fall to a filibuster next week, Senate leaders plan to put it on hold after a scattering of votes Thursday. Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader and a longtime gun rights advocate who had thrown himself behind the gun control measures, is expected to pull the bill from the Senate floor and move on to an Internet sales tax measure, then an overhaul of immigration policy, which has better prospects.More than 50 senators — including a few Republicans, but lacking a handful of Democrats from more conservative states — had signaled their support for the gun bill, not enough to reach the 60-vote threshold to overcome a filibuster.Democratic leadership aides said the effort could be revived if a public groundswell demanded it. "The world is watching the United States Senate, and we will be held accountable," said Senator Richard Blumenthal, Democrat of Connecticut, who helped lead the gun control effort.But with the families of Sandy Hook students in the Senate gallery and a flurry of gun rights phone calls flooding Senate offices, it was hard to imagine how much more emotion could be brought to bear. Aides to senators supporting the bill said that only outside circumstances, like another mass shooting, might cause those who voted "no" to reconsider their positions."It's almost like you can see the finish line, but you just can't get there," said Andrew Goddard, whose son, Colin, was hurt but survived the shooting at Virginia Tech. "It's more annoying to be able to see it and not get to it."Mr. Obama — who avoided the gun issue in his first term and focused on proposals he thought had a better chance of passing, only to seize on expansive measures after the Newtown shootings — made last-ditch appeals to senators, including Dean Heller, Republican of Nevada, and Kelly Ayotte, Republican of New Hampshire. Both rejected his entreaties.Standing in the Rose Garden next to former Representative Gabrielle Giffords and other victims of gun violence, Mr. Obama flashed anger as he said that the gun rights lobby had "willfully lied" about the legislation, and that Republicans and Democrats had "caved to the pressure.""But," he added, "this effort is not over."For now, the gun rights lobby has proved more persuasive.The National Rifle Association mobilized members to blanket the Senate with phone calls, e-mails and letters. The group also spent $500,000 on Wednesday alone, on an advertising campaign criticizing "Obama's gun ban" and using Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg, a deep-pocketed gun control advocate, as a foil. "Tell your senator to listen to America's police instead of listening to Obama and Bloomberg," the ad said.
WASHINGTON — Senator Jeff Flake of Arizona was in an empty hallway in the Capitol on Tuesday when he bumped into Gabrielle Giffords , the former Democratic member of Congress from his home state who was critically wounded in a mass shooting. Both froze in anticipation of the painful minute about to unfold.Ms. Giffords, who had been fiercely promoting a background check bill for gun buyers, knew that Mr. Flake, a Republican and an old friend, had announced on his Facebook page the night before that he would not support the bill. So Ms. Giffords, who still struggles to speak because of the damage that a bullet did to her brain, grabbed Mr. Flake's arm and tried — furiously and with difficulty — to say that she had needed his vote. The best she could get out was the word "need."Mr. Flake looked at the ground. "I said I was sorry," Mr. Flake recalled Thursday, looking despondent. "I didn't know what else to say. It's very hard."In the end, Mr. Flake's rebuff of Ms. Giffords and his decision to vote with many of his Senate colleagues against the gun measure helped doom a search among a small group of Republicans and Democrats to find consensus around gun regulations. Their efforts were largely trounced by the intense lobbying of gun rights groups, which declined to support a modest initiative to expand criminal background checks for gun buyers.But the roots of the defeat can be traced to a variety of other factors: timing, convoluted Senate rules that allow minority opponents great influence, and an ultimately counterproductive alliance between Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, and Tom Coburn, Republican of Oklahoma, which inadvertently helped the groundwork for the opposition. The failure of the bill was complete on Thursday as Senator Harry Reid, the majority leader, said lawmakers would move on to other issues and take "a pause" in the gun control fight.Before its defeat, the background check bill sat on the same legislative runway as an impending immigration bill that soaked up the will of Republican lawmakers, like Mr. Flake, who were not ready to try two tough political sales to their constituents. Even gay marriage, which was bubbling up in the national political conversation, hurt the bill."There were some who could not sell it back home," said Senator Joe Manchin III, a West Virginia Democrat with strong support from the National Rifle Association who made the background check measure his passion. "Had some changed their minds on gay issues and taken that out front? Had some been out there on immigration and really had to work hard to sell and didn't need something else to sell? Because in the end you can really believe in something, but you have to go sell it."The effort to revisit the emotional and politically divisive notion of new gun laws began on a Friday night in December after 20 schoolchildren and 6 adults were gunned down in Newtown, Conn. That evening President Obama convened his top aides in the Oval Office and weighed whether he should make a big push on new gun control laws, even though he had planned to start the second term focused on new immigration laws.No one thought it would be easy, but aides counseled that Mr. Obama had little choice but to try. They said that it would rightly be seen as a failure of leadership if he did not and that a grieving nation, especially his supporters, would demand action.Mr. Obama edited the speech he would give that Sunday at the memorial for the Newtown victims and inserted a phrase promising to use "whatever power this office holds" to confront gun violence. Aides said his commitment was thus locked in.But the National Rifle Association was fighting back. Only a week after the Newtown massacre, Wayne LaPierre, the group's executive vice president, held a defiant news conference in Washington and called for putting armed guards in every school in the country. "The only thing that stops a bad guy with a gun is a good guy with a gun," he declared.Mr. Obama, who had deputized Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr., to hold public meetings with gun control groups, Hollywood executives and mental health professionals, countered with an impassioned plea for gun safety in his Feb. 11 State of the Union address. The Senate Judiciary Committee soon responded with legislation that included expanded background checks. An assault weapons ban and a measure to limit the size of gun magazines also passed the committee.Tempers sometimes flared. During an early hearing on the legislation, Senator Dianne Feinstein, a California Democrat who is a longtime proponent of an assault weapons ban, and Senator Ted Cruz, a Texas Republican and vocal supporter of gun rights, had a sharp exchange. When Mr. Cruz challenged the 79-year-old Ms. Feinstein on her constitutional knowledge, she scolded him. "I'm not a sixth grader," she said.Newtown continued to shift the mood on Capitol Hill.An early sign of the change in thinking came from Mr. Coburn, who has an A rating from the N.R.A. but was one of the first Republicans to say that a debate over gun safety was needed. On a parallel track with the Judiciary Committee, he began to work with Mr. Schumer on a measure to strengthen background checks to prevent criminals and people with psychological problems from obtaining guns.The two senators held a series of meetings starting in mid-January, even as Mr. Reid — who after Newtown had a falling out with the N.R.A. — was skeptical. Mr. Coburn had a history of flamboyantly engaging Democrats on bipartisan endeavors and then walking away.In this case, Mr. Coburn and Mr. Schumer were soon at an impasse over whether records would be kept for gun sales that did not involve gun stores, as they are for sales in stores. Mr. Schumer and gun-control advocates said the records were essential for effective background checks, but Mr. Coburn, who by now had come under attack from gun rights groups, said he feared it would create a national gun registry.
WASHINGTON — For President Obama , this week delivered a painful double blow, with the Senate defeating his emotional campaign to pass tougher gun legislation and a pair of crude bombs at the Boston Marathon bringing terrorism back to American soil.But Mr. Obama responded very differently to the setbacks — a difference that speaks to a conviction at the White House that the nation's counterterrorism policies are still basically sound, while the nation's gun laws are demonstrably not.On Wednesday in the Rose Garden, flanked by parents who lost children in the December rampage in Newtown, Conn., Mr. Obama seemed at a loss to understand why the Senate did not break from the past on gun laws, departing from his text to deliver a lecture that was by turns angry, sarcastic and sorrowful.The next day, standing in the sanctuary of the Cathedral of the Holy Cross in Boston, the president delivered a tightly written paean to the city's resilience, serving notice with his almost-jaunty greeting — "Hello Boston!" — that he was there as much to fight as to grieve."If they sought to intimidate us, to terrorize us," Mr. Obama said to swelling applause, "well, it should be pretty clear by now that they picked the wrong city to do it."To some observers, the contrast was revealing about the political costs and benefits of both issues for Mr. Obama."Boston looked polished, and the Rose Garden looked anguished," said Peter D. Feaver, a Duke University professor who was a national security aide to former President George W. Bush.At one level, the Boston bombings would seem to cast a long shadow over the White House. They were the first successful terrorist attack on an American city during Mr. Obama's presidency. And with the investigation still under way, it is too soon to say whether they were carried out by foreign or domestic individuals or terrorist groups.An act of terror carried out by a foreign group would raise broader questions about the administration's counterterrorism policies than would a domestic attack.Either way, Mr. Obama has moved swiftly to try to put the bombings in perspective — an act of terror and a tragic loss of life, but not enough to derail a single city, let alone the country. The bombers, he said, were "small, stunted individuals who would destroy instead of build, and think that somehow makes them important."For President Bill Clinton, the Oklahoma City bombing in April 1995 helped him reclaim the mantle of leadership after a dispiriting period in which the Democrats were trounced in midterm elections and Mr. Clinton had seemed almost marginalized by House Speaker Newt Gingrich.The Boston bombings could allow Mr. Obama to achieve a different goal: moving the country's response to acts of terrorism away from the sense of national crisis that followed the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks to a narrower focus on effective law enforcement."Boston is not big enough to change the narrative about President Obama," Mr. Feaver said, "but it might be big enough to change the public's response to terrorism."With the loss of the gun vote, by contrast, the president does not have a clear path forward. The Senate's rejection of even a watered-down system of background checks, experts say, all but extinguishes the chances to pass new legislation, and from here on, any significant action on gun-safety laws will be at the state level.For Mr. Obama, the loss is especially stinging because it came after the national revulsion at the schoolhouse slaughter in Newtown raised hopes for a once-in-a-generation change. Devastated personally, the president pledged at a memorial service to use "whatever power this office holds" to turn the tide on gun regulations.As they debated what Mr. Obama should do, administration officials said they were well aware that it would be an uphill struggle. But they believed that it was better to try and lose, than to appear cynical.Four months later to the day after the service, Mr. Obama stood in the Rose Garden, asking how senators could vote against a measure that was supported by 90 percent of the public. "There were no coherent arguments as to why we wouldn't do this," he said. "It came down to politics." Aides said it was the angriest they had ever seen Mr. Obama in public.The question now is whether the defeat will derail the president's other legislative priorities, like the budget and an overhaul of immigration laws. Administration officials argue that it will not: immigration, for example, poses different challenges to Republicans.In Boston, Mr. Obama did not draw any link between the bombings and the debate over gun violence. But the White House officials were quick to contrast the displays of heroism after the attacks with what they said was a lack of courage on the part of those who voted against the gun law."What you see is this fundamental belief in the greatness of the country, and the utter failure of the political system to serve it," said Dan Pfeiffer, a senior adviser to the president.For some in the White House, the president's remarks in the Rose Garden recalled a rousing speech he gave after unexpectedly losing the New Hampshire primary to Hillary Rodham Clinton in 2008. A deeply demoralizing moment was turned into a rallying cry.But this week has evoked even more distant memories. The arrest of a man for sending a letter to the president that was believed to be contaminated by ricin carried unwelcome echoes of the anthrax-laced letters that were delivered to two Democratic senators in the weeks after the Sept. 11 attacks.Two of Mr. Obama's top deputies — Denis R. McDonough, the chief of staff; and Pete Rouse, counselor to the president — worked for one of those senators, Tom Daschle, Democrat of South Dakota, at the time, and Mr. Pfeiffer joined his staff after that."In a week when a lot was happening," Mr. Pfeiffer said, "it was just one more thing."
Guns: Did Newtown Change Anything?: The Times's Michael Luo discusses whether attitudes toward guns have changed in America since the Newtown shooting, even though legislation died in the Senate this week.WASHINGTON — The last whimpers of the gun control debate in the Senate played out in anticlimactic fashion on Thursday as lawmakers began the process of formally moving on.All that remained of a broad package of measures representing the most serious changes to the nation's gun laws in 20 years were two amendments: one that would address mental health care, and another that would penalize states that divulge information about gun owners except under very specific circumstances like a criminal investigation.Both passed overwhelmingly, the only two gun-related measures to clear the Senate's 60-vote threshold for passage. The vote on the amendments has no practical effect, since the underlying legislation has no immediate prospect of passing.Despite the push from proponents of stricter gun regulations, the amendments that received the most support in two days of voting were not the ones that tightened restrictions on weapons purchases, but the ones that loosened them.Fifty-seven senators voted on Wednesday to essentially nullify state laws that prohibit carrying concealed weapons. Fifty-six senators voted to restore gun ownership rights to veterans who have had them taken away.In the end, only 54 voted for a compromise plan to expand background checks for gun buyers, 46 voted to ban high-capacity magazines and 40 voted to renew a ban on certain military-style rifles.While supporters of plans to strengthen the regulation of gun purchases, including Senator Harry Reid, the majority leader, vowed to keep the issue alive, the growing consensus on Capitol Hill was that any effort to resuscitate the legislation was far away.Senate Democrats believe that their best option is to put their bill in the procedural equivalent of a deep freeze. Mr. Reid is expected to exercise an option that allows him to put the bill in an indefinite hold so he can bring it back up later."Make no mistake: this debate is not over," Mr. Reid said Thursday. "This is not the end of the fight. Republicans are in an unsustainable position — crosswise with 9 out of 10 Americans."After the series of gun control amendments went down to defeat on Wednesday, Senator Charles E. Schumer of New York, who played a central role in the early efforts to bring together a bipartisan coalition to support stronger background checks, said he did not see a viable path forward in the near term, but remained optimistic about the months ahead.Asked on Thursday what the next step for the gun bill could be, the Senate's No. 2 Democrat, Richard J. Durbin of Illinois, responded, "That's a good question."The leading Republican who joined with Democrats to forge a bipartisan background check bill, Patrick J. Toomey of Pennsylvania, told a local newspaper that he was ready to deal with other matters. "I did the best I could," he told The Morning Call of Allentown. "I wish it had passed, but the Senate has spoken, and these things happen."Mark Glaze, the director of Mayors Against Illegal Guns, a group founded by Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg that has gone after lawmakers with aggressive advertising campaigns, said Thursday that efforts by his organization and others would not cease."Today and for the foreseeable future, mayors and supporters and survivors and some pretty outraged citizens will be letting senators know they're paying attention," he said. "And their memories are long."Senate Democrats were also looking at what options they might have to force a change in Senate rules that would make it harder for Republicans to subject everything to a 60-vote threshold instead of a simple majority vote."In matters like this, the majority ought to rule," said Senator Barbara Mikulski, Democrat of Maryland.But the Senate was already preparing to take up other issues. Next on the agenda: a bill that would allow states to collect sales tax for items sold online.But in the Senate, with its tangled knot of procedural hurdles, little moves forward without a fight.Senator Tom Coburn, Republican of Oklahoma, is preventing his colleagues from quickly taking up another matter because he objected when Democrats asked for a routine unanimous consent agreement to dispense with the gun bill. He said Thursday that he would not cooperate because Democrats refused to put his background check bill, which is opposed by gun control groups, up for a vote."There's only one way to get background checks, and they don't want to vote on it," he said.
In the months after his father's murder in early 1999, those months stretching formlessly between the mourning ritual of shiva and the impending trial of a suspect, Rabbi Joel Mosbacher received many messages of solace. There was one type, however, that tested every atom of clerical forbearance he possessed."People said in this trying-to-be-helpful way, 'This will make you a better rabbi,' " Rabbi Mosbacher, 43, recalled. "And nothing made me angrier. I didn't want to be a better rabbi. I wanted my dad back."He wanted Lester Mosbacher, who had been shot dead in a petty robbery at his small business on Chicago's South Side the day before he turned 53. He wanted the father who cheered the White Sox and gardened in the backyard and barbecued with a flashlight or umbrella if necessary. He wanted the grandfather for his firstborn son, just 11 months old at the time of the murder.As Joel Mosbacher raised his own family and advanced in his rabbinical career, moving from an assistant's position outside Atlanta to a senior one in this New Jersey suburb, he recognized that no prayer, no fast, no act of religious charity could give him what he wanted.Yet on a Sunday afternoon this month, Rabbi Mosbacher stood before an assembly of 200 clergy members, congregants, politicians and police officials in a North Jersey church to tell, in the cause of gun control, the story of his father's murder."All he did was drive to work, as he had done for 35 years, and he was stolen from his brothers, wife, his children and grandchildren," Rabbi Mosbacher said. "I've carried this story with me, this anger, every day for the last 14 years." Then he made reference to a verse from Leviticus: "I won't stand idly by my father's blood."What Rabbi Mosbacher was proposing was not just support for the gun control legislation then pending in the Senate. In fact, rather presciently, he warned the audience not to "hope for the best from the most dysfunctional institution in America."Specifically, as a leader of the faith-based coalition New Jersey Together, he was propounding its proposal that local mayors, gun retailers, firearms manufacturers and large buyers like the military sign a "covenant" of gun overhaul measures. Among its 30 points, the covenant called for voluntary limits on selling certain types of weapons and large-capacity magazines, sale of guns only through federally licensed dealers and mandatory safety classes for buyers. (Because the covenant was just announced on April 14, the process of getting signatures has not begun.)Rabbi Mosbacher had delivered a similar speech for a similar purpose in February in Chicago before 500 members of United Power, a sister organization of New Jersey Together, under the rubric of the national Industrial Areas Foundation. He had delivered it to a similar group in Westchester County. He had delivered it from his own pulpit at Beth Haverim Shir Shalom in Mahwah on Super Bowl Sunday.While the rabbi had done a bit of tentative speaking on gun control as early as 2000, his commitment accelerated after 2006, when he first learned about the Industrial Areas Foundation. As a legacy of the renowned community organizer Saul Alinsky, the foundation largely mobilizes religious congregations. Its style, far from being earnest, is proudly combative.One of the foundation's major principles is that anger, if channeled correctly, is welcome, for it derives from the Norse word angr, which can mean sorrow or grief at the condition of the world."It went past my brain right to my heart," Rabbi Mosbacher said of the exegesis of angr. "It felt like the closest thing to me to a revelation."The lesson on angr also evoked the prophetic tradition within Judaism. Rabbi Mosbacher heard in angr echoes of Micah's admonition to "to do justly, and to love mercy," as well as Deuteronomy's command that "Justice, justice shalt thou follow."Then, in the past year, the rabbi's prophetic summons arrived in grisly form: 12 people shot dead at a Colorado movie theater last July, 6 worshipers shot dead at a Sikh temple in Wisconsin the next month, 20 schoolchildren and 6 educators shot dead in Newtown, Conn., in December."The piling of murder upon murder and funeral upon funeral made me wonder if this is the moment when the people of this country, people of faith, would wake up," Rabbi Mosbacher said. "And I felt that I brought with me more than suburban guilt to the work of doing justice in this country. I brought a story, even if I didn't tell it at first."In those 14 years since Lester Mosbacher was killed, Joel Mosbacher has learned there is no such thing as closure. A young man was convicted of the murder, but then his conviction was overturned. Then, this week, what appeared to be the best chance in decades of enacting gun-control legislation ended in the same old futility. Yet his father's death had made Joel Mosbacher, if not a better rabbi, a rabbi with a moral cause.The Torah portion for this Sabbath, April 20, includes Leviticus 19:16, the verse about not standing idly by "while your neighbor's blood is shed." Mr. Mosbacher, writing an e-mail several hours after the Senate vote on April 17 tied it to another part of biblical text."In the book of Numbers," he wrote, "Moses sends out 12 spies to scout out the Promised Land; 10 come back and report that there are giants in the land who cannot be conquered. Two spies — Joshua and Caleb — acknowledge the challenge, but encourage the Israelites to move forward." And moving forward with the gun control covenant, he continued, would help America become a land "that flows with more milk and honey than blood."
WASHINGTON — Moments after the Senate defeated gun legislation this week, Patricia Maisch, a 64-year-old Tucson woman who helped stop the 2011 massacre there, stood up in the gallery and shouted "Shame on you!" at the lawmakers below. The next day, still furious, she recorded "robocall" messages for the advocacy group Mayors Against Illegal Guns.Mrs. Maisch has no background in politics. But she does have a passion for gun control acquired on Jan. 8, 2011, when she grabbed an ammunition clip away from the gunman who fatally shot 6 people and wounded 13, including her congresswoman, Gabrielle Giffords."A lot of our legislators have blood on their hands," Mrs. Maisch said Friday before leaving Washington on a train for New York, where she was scheduled to appear on a weekend talk show. "We will work to remove seated senators who choose to be the shills of the gun lobby."Mrs. Maisch, whose gallery outburst prompted Capitol police officers to escort her from the building, is among dozens of gun violence survivors and family members who descended on Washington to push for a measure to extend background checks on some gun purchases. Now that their lobbying blitz is behind them and the legislative debate is over in the Senate, the victims' advocates are forging ahead with new tactics and plotting their next moves. They hope to revive the bill, while pushing for new state laws and campaigning against politicians opposed to gun control.Many, like Peter Read, 50, a retired Air Force lieutenant colonel whose daughter Mary Karen was killed in the 2007 massacre at Virginia Tech, have been fighting for stricter gun measures since long before Adam Lanza killed 20 children and 6 adults at a school in Newtown, Conn., in December. They are accustomed to hearing lawmakers say no. "We are not going away," Mr. Read said.Some, like Andrew Goddard and Lori Haas, Virginia residents who met after their children were wounded at Virginia Tech, have already been lobbying their state legislature. On Friday, Ms. Haas was headed to a vigil outside the office of Representative Eric Cantor of Virginia, the House Republican leader, to recite the names of the dead.Others, like Pam Simon, a former aide to Ms. Giffords who was wounded in Tucson, are still focused on Washington. Ms. Simon turned up Thursday in the office of Senator Kelly Ayotte, Republican of New Hampshire, for a coffee intended for constituents. Ms. Ayotte voted against the background check measure because, she said, it would "place unnecessary burdens on law-abiding gun owners." Ms. Simon pressed Ms. Ayotte; a video of their encounter was posted by ThinkProgress.org.And some, like Dan Gross, whose brother was shot in the head in 1997 on the observation deck of the Empire State Building, are looking inward, re-examining a strategy that has for decades been rooted in grief.Mr. Gross, a former advertising executive, is the president of the Brady Campaign to Prevent Gun Violence. If gun legislation is to succeed, he said, groups like his must change social norms around guns, much like Mothers Against Drunk Driving changed norms around alcohol."As long as this is positioned as an issue that's just about victims, it's not going to work," he said. "Victims have been a very important part of the story, but so is, 'Friends don't let friends drive drunk.' "Not all the victims of gun violence and their families favor tighter gun laws. At least one Newtown parent, Mark Mattioli, whose 8-year-old son was killed, sided with the National Rifle Association in opposing the background check measure. But at least a dozen of the victims and family members who fanned out across the Capitol complex this week — organized by groups like the Brady Campaign and Mayors Against Illegal Guns — said they believed that the bill would have been a good first step.They had arrived in Washington in an optimistic mood. The Newtown parents had practically shamed senators into bringing the background check measure up for a vote, and after decades of gun control losses, many believed that they were on the verge of a big victory. But they were soon reminded that in the complex gun politics of Washington, being a victim is not enough to get legislation passed.For Mr. Read, that lesson was searing. Wearing a gray business suit with a picture of Mary Karen on his lapel, he arrived at a vigil outside the Capitol on Tuesday, the sixth anniversary of the Virginia Tech massacre, to recite the names of the dead — including his own daughter, a clarinet player and an aspiring educator who was 19 when she died.
WASHINGTON — Senator Mark Begich , Democrat of Alaska, asked President Obama 's administration for a little favor last month. Send your new interior secretary this spring to discuss a long-simmering dispute over construction of a road through a wildlife refuge, Mr. Begich asked in a letter. The administration said yes.Four weeks later, Mr. Begich, who faces re-election next year, ignored Mr. Obama's pleas on a landmark bill intended to reduce gun violence and instead voted against a measure to expand background checks. Mr. Obama denounced the defeat of gun control steps on Wednesday as "a shameful day."But Mr. Begich's defiance and that of other Democrats who voted against Mr. Obama appear to have come with little cost. Sally Jewell, the interior secretary, is still planning a trip to Alaska — to let Mr. Begich show his constituents that he is pushing the government to approve the road.The trip will also reinforce for Mr. Begich and his colleagues a truth about Mr. Obama: After more than four years in the Oval Office, the president has rarely demonstrated an appetite for ruthless politics that instills fear in lawmakers. That raises a broader question: If he cannot translate the support of 90 percent of the public for background checks into a victory on Capitol Hill, what can he expect to accomplish legislatively for his remaining three and a half years in office?Robert Dallek, a historian and biographer of President Lyndon B. Johnson, said Mr. Obama seems "inclined to believe that sweet reason is what you need to use with people in high office." That contrasts with Johnson's belief that "what you need to do is to back people up against a wall," Mr. Dallek said."Obama has this more reasoned temperament," he said. "It may well be that it's not the prescription for making gains. It raises questions about his powers of persuasion."Some supporters said the imperative of the moment requires more force from Mr. Obama. "He needs to turn up the heat every way he can and every chance he gets because it's not political points or poll numbers that are at stake but lives," said Representative Carolyn B. Maloney, a New York Democrat who has sponsored a gun control bill in the House.The White House on Monday defended the president's efforts on the gun legislation, saying he had made a vigorous effort to lobby wavering senators. "He made numerous phone calls and had numerous meetings," said Jay Carney, the White House press secretary. "And his entire team here engaged in this process completely and thoroughly."But the president has long struggled to master his relationship with Congress. During his first two and a half years in office, he favored what aides called an inside approach, working quietly in back rooms to convince lawmakers of the logic of his positions. That worked better when Democrats controlled both the House and the Senate, and he passed legislation to expand health care, regulate Wall Street and spend hundreds of billions of dollars to stimulate the economy.After Republicans took control of the House in the 2010 midterm elections, Mr. Obama grew exasperated by talks that rarely seemed to lead to deals. As a result, he adjusted to an "outside strategy" and used campaign-style rallies around the country to put pressure on lawmakers. That won him victories on a payroll tax cut and keeping student loan rates low, but when he tried it on gun control, it failed."There have been very few consequences for those that defeat the legislation, and that's what allows the legislation to be defeated," said former Senator Byron L. Dorgan, Democrat of North Dakota, who retired in 2011. But Mr. Dorgan said that in the modern era, constituent pressure is the key. "Put some real pressure on back home. The pressure back home is more important than pressure from the White House."William M. Daley, Mr. Obama's chief of staff from 2011 to 2012, wrote in The Washington Post that Democratic donors should hold back their support. "So I'll have some advice for my friends in Chicago, New York and Los Angeles: Just say no to the Democrats who said no on background checks," Mr. Daley wrote.White House officials insisted the president had mobilized the full weight of his office to wage a public campaign on behalf of the gun legislation. The president deputized Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr., a veteran of past gun control battles, to lead the public effort. Behind the scenes, outreach and coordination were managed first by Bruce Reed, Mr. Biden's chief of staff, and later by Denis R. McDonough, the president's new chief of staff.Not counting dinners that Mr. Obama held with senators, White House officials said he and Mr. Biden participated in more than 45 calls or meetings with 30 senators in March and April."I don't know how he could have been more all-in than he's been," said Dan Gross, the president of the Brady Campaign to Prevent Gun Violence.Some Democrats on Capitol Hill agreed, saying that Mr. Obama's reputation for not imposing discipline had more to do with the current nature of legislating in Washington, where the two parties have grown increasingly polarized. Several also noted that presidents can no longer use earmarks — the pet projects of legislators that are now banned — to help grease a bill's passage. Aides to Mr. Obama said such incentives would not have worked anyway for Democrats worried about the power of the gun issue."President Obama is not Lyndon Johnson, and this is not the 1960s," said Representative Mike Thompson, a California Democrat and chairman of the House Gun Violence Prevention Task Force. Mr. Johnson had large Democratic majorities in Congress during much of his presidency. "It's a different time and different people, and everyone has their own way of doing things. This president can be every bit as convincing as any president before him."Mr. Obama's former campaign operation has already pledged to go after Democrats who opposed gun control. In remarks after the gun legislation died Wednesday, Mr. Obama hinted that retribution might come after all. "If this Congress refuses to listen to the American people and pass common-sense gun legislation, then the real impact is going to have to come from the voters," he said.In the case of Mr. Begich, though, it is unclear whether Mr. Obama will punish him, and to what end. The administration has agreed only to reconsider its decision to block the road in Alaska, not to reverse it. And yet, the president also wants to keep a Democrat in Alaska to help hold onto control of the Senate."It certainly is the $64,000 question," Mr. Dallek said.
WASHINGTON — Talks to revive gun control legislation are quietly under way on Capitol Hill as a bipartisan group of senators seeks a way to bridge the differences that led to last week's collapse of the most serious effort to overhaul the country's gun laws in 20 years.Drawing on the lessons from battles in the 1980s and '90s over the Brady Bill, which failed in Congress several times before ultimately passing, gun control supporters believe they can prevail by working on a two-pronged strategy. First, they are identifying senators who might be willing to change their votes and support a background check system with fewer loopholes.Second, they are looking to build a national campaign that would better harness overwhelming public support for universal background checks — which many national polls put at near 90 percent approval — to pressure lawmakers.Senators Joe Manchin III, Democrat of West Virginia, and Patrick J. Toomey, Republican of Pennsylvania, have been talking in recent days about how they could persuade more senators to support their bill to expand background checks for gun buyers, which drew backing from only four Republicans last week."We're going to work it hard," Mr. Manchin said Thursday, adding that he was looking at tweaking the language of his bill in a way that he believed would satisfy senators who, for example, felt that background checks on person-to-person gun sales would be too onerous for people who live in rural areas far from a sporting goods store.Those concerns were an issue for Alaska's senators, Lisa Murkowski, a Republican, and Mark Begich, a Democrat.Meanwhile, a separate gun measure, an anti-trafficking bill, is the subject of talks between Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, and two Republican senators who voted no on the background check bill. The Republicans, Senators Kelly Ayotte of New Hampshire and Charles E. Grassley of Iowa, are discussing ways they might support the bill, which would criminalize the shipping or transfer of guns to someone who is barred from possessing a firearm.While the bill on its own falls short of what the families of victims of mass shootings have been pushing Congress to enact — and is therefore less controversial — some Democrats believe it could be a good starting point to build a broader bipartisan compromise."I think trafficking can be the base of the bill, the rock on which everything else stands," Ms. Gillibrand said. "I also think it's complementary to background checks because, let's be honest, criminals aren't going to buy a gun and go through a background check. So if you really want to go after criminals, you have to have to do both."Ms. Ayotte said Thursday that she would continue talking with Ms. Gillibrand and was confident that some areas of agreement, on areas like expanding mental health care, could be reached."There's a lot we have agreement on in terms of enforcing our current system," she said. "And so I certainly think we should look for the common elements, including the mental health piece, which I support as well, and try to move as much of that as possible forward."Ms. Ayotte — the only one out of 22 senators on the East Coast north of Virginia who voted against strengthening background checks — has been the target lately of some of the most furious lobbying by gun control proponents, who have inundated local newspapers with letters to the editor denouncing her vote, run radio ads saying she "ignored the will of the people" and swamped her office with phone calls. On Thursday, two receptionists placed one call after another on hold as they politely listened to callers vent and replied, "Thank you for your message."Next week when Congress is in recess, gun control groups coordinating with the Obama committee Organizing for Action will be fanning out across the country in dozens of demonstrations at the offices of senators who voted down the background check bill.As talks moved ahead on Capitol Hill, the White House was pressing on with its own efforts. Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. summoned a group of gun control proponents to his office on Thursday — including representatives from Michael R. Bloomberg's Mayors Against Illegal Guns, Gabrielle Giffords's Americans for Responsible Solutions and the Brady Campaign to End Gun Violence — and reassured them that the issue had become his highest priority.The vice president recalled the long struggle to enact the Brady Bill, which established a five-day waiting period to buy a gun. And he told them gun control would become his new campaign to end the Iraq war, according to two participants in the meeting, comparing it to the issue he devoted much of his energy to during President Obama's first term. The pressure campaign is evidently already starting to take its toll, the vice president added, because several senators have confided to him that they are feeling the backlash from constituents.Those senators, he added, told him that they needed to be assured there was adequate support for expanded gun control to pass because they did not want to take such a great political risk on something that was doomed to fail. And some of them are already beginning to ask about what tweaks gun control proponents might entertain that could make the bills more palatable, the vice president said."It's not a question of really changing their minds for or against this policy," one of the meeting's participants said. "It's demonstrating that it's safe to do the right thing and politically unsafe not to."
WARREN, N.H. — It was 45 minutes into Senator Kelly Ayotte 's town hall-style meeting here on Tuesday, and the local Republican official screening question topics had allowed just one query on gun control. A few in the crowd of about 150 started to get agitated."You like to regulate that," shouted Eric Knuffke, 72, a resident of nearby Wentworth who rose to complain about the way speakers were being cherry-picked. "But you don't want to regulate guns."The outburst reflected how central Ms. Ayotte (pronounced eh-AUGHT), the first-term New Hampshire Republican, is to the resurgent debate over gun control. As one of the senators who two weeks ago helped scuttle a bill that would have imposed a new standard for background checks, she has become a focus of gun control supporters looking to persuade a handful of senators to switch their votes.With lawmakers back home for the first time since the defeat of the gun legislation backed by President Obama, the experience of Ms. Ayotte is being watched by both sides in the debate.In an effort to settle the room down, Ms. Ayotte turned to Erica Lafferty, whose mother was one of the 27 people who were killed in the shootings in Newtown, Conn. Ms. Lafferty, 27, asked the senator about a previous remark that background checks could burden gun stores. "I'm just wondering," she said, her back stiffening, "why the burden of my mother being gunned down in the halls of her elementary school isn't as important?"The senator, her hoarse voice growing soft, said, "Erica, certainly let me first say, obviously, I'm so sorry."But her position on new gun laws, she explained, had not changed. "As you and I both know, the issue wasn't a background check system issue in Sandy Hook. Mental health, I hope, is the one thing we can agree on going forward."Gun control supporters focusing on a handful of Republican senators from Alaska to Arizona to Nevada see Ms. Ayotte as a natural if reluctant ally and are pushing her hard to flip. Second Amendment rights groups, meanwhile, are working to keep her where she is.Gun rights advocates need point no further than to Dick Swett, whose story still haunts New Hampshire politics after 20 years.Mr. Swett was a third-term Democratic congressman from the state when he cast one of the deciding votes for the 1994 federal ban on assault weapons. He would never see a fourth term."It was the worst experience of my life," Mr. Swett said, recalling the furious campaign carried out against him. He received death threats and started wearing a bulletproof vest.Ms. Ayotte, a former state attorney general, aggressively prosecuted some of the state's most notorious murder cases, including one in which she won the state's first capital conviction in nearly half a century.She is also a mother who represents a state that has become more diverse, more affluent and less Republican. She is the only Republican among the five people — all women — who hold statewide office."She was elected by these women voters from suburban bedroom communities, some of the people who care the most about this issue," said Jen Bluestein of Americans for Responsible Solutions, the group run by former Representative Gabrielle Giffords of Arizona and her husband, Mark Kelly. The group has been running a radio ad here in which two women express dismay over Ms. Ayotte's vote."Are you serious?" the ad says, "89 percent of the people in New Hampshire support universal background checks. She just ignored us?"Michael R. Bloomberg's Mayors Against Illegal Guns released a new television ad on Tuesday that attacks Ms. Ayotte's strongest asset: her law enforcement credentials. "Senator Ayotte is giving criminals a pass," an older man says.Organizing for Action, President Obama's nationwide political organization, and other left-leaning advocacy groups, are helping to recruit people to rallies across the state and urging them to show up in protest at Ms. Ayotte's town meetings this week. Ms. Lafferty was part of that effort on Tuesday.It is unclear whether Ms. Ayotte will yield to pressure or continue, as she and her supporters have so far, to write it off as noise kicked up by a well-organized coalition of liberal groups.Through a spokesman, she declined a request for an interview. Though her office organized a series of town meetings across the state this week, it barely publicized them. On her way out of the meeting here, she ignored reporters' questions.Ms. Ayotte has powerful allies in state and national gun owners' groups, two of which are running ads countering the message coming from gun control advocates."Kelly Ayotte is not just a senator," says a woman in one radio spot from the National Rifle Association's New Hampshire chapter, "she's also a mom who cares about protecting our kids. She knows the only way to prevent tragedies like Sandy Hook is to fix our broken mental health system."Another radio ad from the National Shooting Sports Foundation urges residents of this proudly libertarian state to call their senator and express gratitude, as it jabs at Mr. Bloomberg of New York as "a big-city mayor who thinks he knows what's best for the rest of us."Gun control has never been an easy sell in this state, where low crime and small government are prized."We don't have the large number of those types of crimes, so therefore it's not on our front burner all the time," said Russell Lary, a former police chief for the Town of Grantham and, like many current and former law enforcement officials in New Hampshire, an Ayotte supporter.Ms. Ayotte is, for now, resisting expanding background checks while talking with Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, about a bill to create a federal gun trafficking statute.Yet there is precedent for a Republican New Hampshire senator having a change of heart on gun control. Judd Gregg, whom Ms. Ayotte succeeded in 2011, initially voted against the assault weapons ban in 1994. He supported it 10 years later when it came up for renewal, though it ultimately never became law.Mr. Gregg, who won re-election after that 2004 vote, said he doubted Ms. Ayotte would suffer for her stance, especially given solid law enforcement credentials."In New Hampshire, if you're viewed as a person of integrity and you vote for what you think is right, people will give you a lot of running room," he said.
HOUSTON — In speech after speech at the National Rifle Association 's annual convention here this weekend, its top leaders and political allies blasted President Obama and other gun control advocates, warned against "all-out, historic attacks" on the constitutional right to possess firearms, and issued a rallying cry to members to become a political force in next year's midterm elections and the 2016 presidential race."We are in the midst of a once-in-a-generation fight for everything we care about," Wayne R. LaPierre, the association's executive vice president and principal spokesman, told a cheering throng of members at the convention center here on Saturday. "We have a chance to secure our freedom for a generation, or to lose it forever.""We must remain vigilant, ever resolute, and steadfastly growing and preparing for the even more critical battles that loom before us," he said.Praising the N.R.A.'s membership for helping defeat a bipartisan Senate proposal to expand background checks for gun buyers last month, Mr. LaPierre said that the Senate fight had helped swell the association's membership to a record five million people.Not surprisingly, perhaps, the convention theme was "Stand and Fight," and much of the fight was directed toward Mr. Obama, Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York and those Mr. LaPierre described as their supporters in the "media elite" who were "conspiring right now, regrouping, planning, organizing" to exploit "the next horrific crime."The Senate bill "wouldn't have prevented Newtown, couldn't have prevented Tucson or Aurora and won't prevent the next tragedy," he said.Later on, he added the Boston Marathon bombings to bolster his position."How many Bostonians wished they had a gun two weeks ago?" Mr. LaPierre said. "How many other Americans now ponder that life-or-death question?"Mr. LaPierre and James W. Porter II, who was expected to be named president by the board of directors on Monday, succeeding David Keene, both urged N.R.A. members to become active in the 2014 midterm elections — which Mr. Porter described as more important than last year's presidential election — and then the 2016 presidential race."We do that and Obama can be stopped," Mr. Porter said.The lineup of speakers at Friday's Leadership Forum looked like the early field for the 2016 Republican presidential primaries, featuring Senator Ted Cruz and Gov. Rick Perry of Texas, Gov. Bobby Jindal of Louisiana, and Sarah Palin, the former Alaska governor and Republican vice-presidential candidate, as well as video appearances by Representative Paul Ryan and Gov. Scott Walker, both of Wisconsin.Ms. Palin, wearing a black T-shirt that said "Women Hunt," criticized gun control proposals that "won't even work for their stated intended purposes." Mr. Cruz warned that any infringement on the Bill of Rights would undermine the entire Constitution. And just about every speaker poked fun at the N.R.A.'s favorite cast of enemies: Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr., Senator Dianne Feinstein of California, Senator Charles E. Schumer of New York, and Mr. Bloomberg, whom Mr. LaPierre described as the "national nanny."Critics of the N.R.A. lined up outside the convention center."Somehow they managed to make the N.R.A. the victims of the Newtown shootings," said Josh Sugarmann, executive director of the Violence Policy Center, which advocates for stricter gun control. "I think the average American would be shocked by their language."Across from the sprawling convention hall, a small group of gun control advocates spent Friday and Saturday reading the names of about 4,000 Americans killed by gun violence since the school shooting in Newtown, Conn. Among the protesters was Patricia Maisch, a survivor of the mass shooting in Tucson where former Representative Gabrielle Giffords was wounded. "I'm here to not let the issue go away," she said. "I don't think people are going to let that happen this time."Yet beneath the politically charged surface of the convention, it was clear that many of the tens of thousands of N.R.A. members had come for things other than speeches. There were seminars on competitive shooting, firearms law and hunting, including "Advanced Sausage Processing, BBQ and Smoke Cooking Techniques," taught by Brad Lockwood, an expert and TV host.Outside the "Defensive Shooting Skills Development" course, David Shoffner, 66, a car dealer from Redding, Calif., said he had owned guns since he was a boy, but had never taken a defensive shooting class. "I'm worried about society going downhill," he said, asserting that drug-related crime had picked up even in his largely agricultural region of Northern California.Amiable and engaging, Mr. Shoffner described himself as a "conservative guy" descended from a rancher who fled Missouri after shooting a man who cheated at poker. He professed to hating bloodshed and said he would not hunt because he did not like killing animals.But he admired the N.R.A.'s efforts to "keep the Second Amendment alive" and, like many other conventioneers, expressed bafflement with the mind-set that "you can stop evil" with gun control.Even as the speeches ground on in a huge meeting hall, thousands of members were downstairs, where acre-upon-acre of kiosks displayed the latest in hunting and camping equipment, and weaponry, from futuristic black-matte rifles to six-shooters to knives that would have made Jim Bowie envious.Conventioneers could admire a vintage Volkswagen bus outfitted with a kind of mini-Gatling gun (not for sale).And Jim Revis took photographs of his daughter, Lais, 19, as she posed with a pink-and-white military-style rifle. She said she planned to start attending gun safety classes because she wanted a gun for both hunting and self-defense. "The main thing I get out of this is to get together with people who think the way I do," said Mr. Revis, who lives in the Houston area.John Shia, an engineer from Houston who is also a yoga, martial arts and gun enthusiast, said he had come to love target shooting after emigrating from Japan 20 years ago. "Shooting is a fine motor skill, like sewing," he said. "Like yoga."Mr. Shia, 47, a longtime N.R.A. member, said he had come to the exhibition hall to check out laser-targeting systems."The speeches are a waste of time," Mr. Shia said. "The gun control debate, you can argue it either way. It just depends on what data set you use."He paused, recognizing that he was not voicing a typical N.R.A. viewpoint. "We can be a diverse group," he said. "But I guess I'm not the average member."
WASHINGTON — Gabrielle Giffords was scheduled to receive a Profile in Courage award Sunday at the John F. Kennedy Library in Boston. The award is fitting, though she is displaying a different kind of courage than was celebrated by the late president in his 1957 best-selling book.In 2011, Ms. Giffords, then an Arizona congresswoman, was gravely injured when she was shot in the head by a deranged gunman at a Tucson political event, where six people were killed.Ms. Giffords has undergone an excruciating rehabilitation and had to resign her House seat. She is partially blind and largely paralyzed on her right side, and she struggles to speak.Yet after the mass shooting at a movie theater in Aurora, Colorado, last summer, she and her husband, Mark Kelly, began thinking about solutions to the epidemic of gun violence in America. The killing of children at a Connecticut school in December was the final straw."If we could be effective in trying to come up with a solution, it was our obligation to do so," Mr. Kelly said.In "Profiles in Courage," Kennedy wrote about lawmakers who risked their careers by taking principled stands. Ms. Giffords doesn't meet that description. Mustering the energy to overcome her condition and become actively engaged in an issue that generates controversy and emotion, however, is a challenge few would undertake."It takes real courage to overcome a disability that is so personal," said Dr. Guy McKhann, the longtime leading neurologist at Johns Hopkins University in Baltimore.Although he hasn't treated her, he said it was clear that, distinct from cognitive abilities, retrieving the right words is difficult for Ms. Giffords. "What she wants to say sometimes doesn't come out," Dr. McKhann said. (A personal disclaimer: I am chairman of the Profile in Courage Committee that honored her Sunday and have a son with a brain injury.)On Jan. 8, the two-year anniversary of the shooting, Ms. Giffords and Mr. Kelly started Americans for Responsible Solutions. They have already raised more than $10 million, enlisted more than 300,000 supporters, aired national television ads advocating expanded background checks for gun purchases and campaigned for the measure in a dozen states.They are perfect for this role. She is a courageous survivor of a gun attack, a former member of Congress from a western state, a longtime hunter and a supporter of gun rights. He is a combat veteran, navy pilot and space shuttle commander. The National Rifle Association can't paint them as effete foes of the Second Amendment.In January, Ms. Giffords delivered emotional testimony on the measure to the Senate Judiciary Committee. She and Mr. Kelly personally lobbied members. Before the Senate vote on the proposal last month, she sought out Jeff Flake, a Republican senator from Arizona and a friend from her House days, and blurted out, "Need," as in we need you. Unlike his Arizona colleague John McCain, who backed the background checks compromise, Mr. Flake voted no. The measure failed; since then, polls show a drop in Mr. Flake's popularity in his home state.The coalition anchored by Mr. Kelly and Ms. Giffords, and working with the White House, is determined to reverse the Senate defeat on background checks. Supporters of the measure had a majority of the chamber, but the Republican leadership encouraged a filibuster and the measure fell 5 votes shy of the 60 needed to proceed.Ms. Giffords and Mr. Kelly then bought $350,0000 of radio ads in five states, attacking opponents of the measure, including the Senate Republican leader, Mitch McConnell. They also praised backers who are likely to face attacks from the National Rifle Association next year, like Mary L. Landrieu of Louisiana and Kay R. Hagan of North Carolina.An ad they produced in support of Ms. Hagan had the perfect narrator: a North Carolina sheriff nicknamed Moose.The toughest broadside was directed at Senator Kelly A. Ayotte, a New Hampshire Republican who was the only New Englander to vote against the measure. "Remember that ad Kelly Ayotte ran saying she's one of us?" the Responsible Solutions commercial asks. It goes on to say that Ms. Ayotte "went to Washington" and ignored the feelings of New Hampshirites about background checks. The freshman Republican lawmaker, Granite State politicians say, is squirming over this ad and the criticism she encountered at a recent town meeting.With a few cosmetic changes to the proposal, background check strategists are counting on pressuring Ms. Ayotte, Mr. Flake and several other Republicans, as well as a few Democrats, to switch their votes and help pass the measure. It then would face an uphill battle in the Republican-controlled House; no one could more effectively bring heat on her former colleagues than Ms. Giffords.Mr. Kelly says they're in it for the long run, and plan to move beyond background checks. "This is a complicated issue," he said in an interview. "There is not just one reason we have 15 times the murder rates with guns compared to similar countries."He acknowledges that the past two and a half years have been tough. The outpouring of support around the country has been heartening, he said, even though there "has been a real vacuum in Washington to promote public safety and responsible gun ownership."Sunday marked an unusually poignant moment in this struggle. Ms. Giffords was to be presented the Profile in Courage award by Caroline Kennedy, the daughter of the president slain a half century ago.
BURKESVILLE, Ky. — Last Monday, Kristian Sparks and his sister, Caroline, visited a Fred's Super Dollar store here. A store manager recalled that it was an ordinary shopping trip, saying that the boy was outgoing and energetic, his little sister was cute and their grandmother was "like any grandmother — she bought them anything they wanted."The next day Kristian, 5, shot and killed his 2-year-old sister with a gun marketed for children as "My First Rifle" in what the authorities said was an accident.The death has convulsed this rural community of 1,800 in south-central Kentucky, where everyone seems to know the extended Sparks family, which is now riven by grief. But as mourners gathered for Caroline's funeral on Saturday, there were equally strong emotions directed at the outside world, which has been quick to pass judgment on the parents and a way of life in which many see nothing unusual about introducing children to firearms while they are still in kindergarten."This town, there's nothing like it. They pull together," Anne Beall, a family friend, said as she left the Norris-New Funeral Home. Its online obituary showed Caroline as a smiling cherub in a flower-petal collar.Ms. Beall, a 64-year-old retiree, said she had not heard anyone in town call the parents irresponsible for giving a gun to a 5-year-old or for leaving it unlocked. "Pointing fingers doesn't really accomplish anything," she said. "Terrible mistakes happen, and I think that's what happened here."The authorities said the children's mother, Stephanie Sparks, briefly stepped outside the family's trailer home when Kristian shot his sister in the chest. Their father, Chris Sparks, shoes horses and works in a lumber mill.The parents "are taking this really hard," said a woman leaving the funeral who declined to give her name. A teenage girl said strangers from around the country had written scathing comments online blaming the parents, deepening the town's pain and anger.The shooting came after the recent failure in Washington of gun control legislation inspired by the shootings in Newtown, Conn., which exposed a bitter divide on guns. But Burkesville seemed to want no part of being a symbol in a national debate."I think it's nobody else's business but our town's," said a woman leaving a store, who like many people here declined to be interviewed. A woman who answered the phone at the office of John A. Phelps Jr., the chief executive of Cumberland County, whose seat is Burkesville, said, "No, I'm sorry — no more statements," and hung up.After the funeral service, two men advanced across North Main Street toward a single television crew present, from the German network RTL, and punched the cameraman, bloodying his face and knocking him down.Two other men told a newspaper reporter, "If you had any sense, you'd get out of here. You're next, buddy."The county coroner, Gary White, said Kristian's gun, a .22-caliber single-shot Crickett rifle designed for children and sold in pink and blue, had been stored in a corner, and his parents did not realize it was loaded."Down in Kentucky where we're from, you know, guns are passed down from generation to generation," Mr. White told The Associated Press. "You start at a young age with guns for hunting and everything."After the shooting, the Crickett's maker, Keystone Sporting Arms in Milton, Pa., deleted a Web page promoting it, but archived images show the company featured a "kids corner" with dozens of pictures of young children and their Cricketts at shooting ranges and out hunting.The company, which specializes in children's firearms, said that in 2008 it made 60,000 Cricketts and another model, the Chipmunk, and that it ranks as the country's 10th largest manufacturer of long guns.The shooting here, in a region of farms and timber mills, followed a spate of other gun accidents around the country involving young children.They included a 4-year-old boy who accidentally killed the wife of a sheriff's deputy at a cookout near Nashville, and a 6-year-old boy who was fatally shot with a .22-caliber rifle by a 4-year-old playmate in Toms River, N.J.A spokesman for the Kentucky State Police said last week that it was too soon to determine if charges would be filed in the death of Caroline Sparks. Although some states have strict laws aimed at negligent gun storage, including criminal liability for adults, Kentucky's laws are looser, according to the Law Center to Prevent Gun Violence. The state does not hold adults liable when a child gets hold of a firearm and causes an injury or death.A few Burkesville residents expressed skepticism of the parents for having a loaded, unlocked gun in the house.Curtis Spears, 59, a retired mechanic, said he introduced his three sons to hunting and shooting when they were about 8. "But they never touched a gun unless I was with them," he said. He kept the firearms locked up. His grandson Ryan, who is 5, owns the same Crickett model that Kristian used. But it is equipped with a safety that can be unlocked only with a key kept by his father, Mr. Spears said.April Anderson, a cashier, said that she, too, owned a gun at age 5. "We went deer hunting," she said. "I had a .22. You have to teach them at an early age," she noted, adding that she and her husband own more than 20 guns, but that they keep them secure. "Our guns are put up," she said.Her 11-year-old daughter, Taylor, said, "Since that little girl died, Dad got rid of all the guns in the house."Not quite, her mother corrected her. They removed at least one shotgun from their home, but not all. "You can't put your children in a bubble," Ms. Anderson said.
BOSTON — Caroline Kennedy was not even 6 years old when her father was assassinated 50 years ago. And on Sunday, she said the hurt never heals."Our family is still suffering the heartbreak caused by gun violence," Ms. Kennedy said here at the John F. Kennedy Presidential Library and Museum.She was here to honor another target of an assassin, one who lived. Gabrielle Giffords, the former Arizona congresswoman who was shot in 2011 at point-blank range and was nearly killed by a lone gunman, has devoted herself to pressing for measures to prevent gun violence since she has recovered.For that, Ms. Kennedy bestowed on Ms. Giffords the Profile in Courage Award in a small ceremony on Sunday afternoon at the library. The award is given annually to someone who demonstrates the kind of courage that President Kennedy highlighted in his book "Profiles in Courage," which praised eight senators who risked their careers by taking principled stands on unpopular positions."No one should have to lose a husband, a wife, a father, a child to senseless murder," Ms. Kennedy said in presenting the award to Ms. Giffords. "But as our honoree has shown, out of that pain and tragedy, we must find the strength to carry on, to give meaning to our lives, and to build a more just and peaceful world."They were perhaps the most personal words Ms. Kennedy has ever spoken publicly about the gunfire that took the life of her father, in 1963, and that of an uncle, Senator Robert F. Kennedy, in 1968. Nov. 22 will be the 50th anniversary of her father's death."Gabrielle Giffords has turned a personal nightmare into a movement for political change," Ms. Kennedy said. "Her work is saving lives and sparing countless families from the pain and loss caused by gun violence."Ms. Giffords, wearing a sleeveless, floor-length red gown, gingerly climbed the few steps to the podium with the aid of her husband, Mark Kelly, the former astronaut, who wore a tuxedo. A formal 500-person fund-raising gala for the library followed the more intimate award ceremony, attended by about 50 people.Ms. Giffords and Ms. Kennedy, who wore a slim royal blue dress, embraced as Ms. Kennedy handed her the award, a sterling silver lantern, which symbolizes a beacon of hope. The lantern was designed by Edwin Schlossberg, Ms. Kennedy's husband, and made by Tiffany & Company.The audience included many of the members of the committee that selected Ms. Giffords as this year's recipient, including Representative Nancy Pelosi of California, the House minority leader; former Senator Christopher Dodd of Connecticut; and Kenneth R. Feinberg, the chairman of the board of directors of the John F. Kennedy Library Foundation."We're so sorry for the violence and terror you all have endured," Mr. Kelly said from the podium, referring to the Boston Marathon bombings. "We know what that is like," he said. "We know how violence changes lives."His wife, he added, has chosen to try to inspire and motivate "a nation that is fed up with violence and fed up with Congressional inaction."Just recently the Senate failed to pass expanded background checks for those buying guns.Ms. Giffords spoke for a few seconds. "I believe we all have courage inside," she said haltingly, then veered from her prepared remarks to add: "I wish there was more courage in Congress."She said these two years since she was shot have been hard. "But I want to make the world a better place," she said. "More than ever."
WASHINGTON — The Justice Department's independent inspector general on Monday criticized a former top federal prosecutor in Arizona, Dennis K. Burke, for leaking to Fox News a document in June 2011 about a federal agent who was raising alarms about the gun trafficking investigation known as Operation Fast and Furious . He called the prosecutor's actions "particularly egregious" misconduct that was "wholly unbefitting a U.S. attorney."The 21-page report, by the office of Inspector General Michael Horowitz, filled in new details about the reaction of the Phoenix prosecutor's office to the furor over a botched investigation into a gun-smuggling network. Arizona-based agents of the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives allowed hundreds of weapons to reach criminal hands.Mr. Burke, who resigned in August 2011, was the United States attorney in Arizona at the time of the investigation, which ran from late 2009 to early 2011. He admitted shortly before his resignation that he had been the source for a document obtained by Fox News about the A.T.F. agent, John Dodson, who helped disclose risky tactics used in the case.After Brian Terry, a Border Patrol agent, was killed in December 2010 and two guns linked to the case were found nearby, Mr. Dodson contacted the office of Senator Charles E. Grassley of Iowa, the ranking Republican on the Senate Judiciary Committee, gave an interview to CBS News, and testified at a House hearing.The inspector general's report cites internal e-mails and testimony that show Mr. Burke was "frustrated" at Mr. Dodson's criticisms, in part because the previous year Mr. Dodson had proposed and carried out an undercover operation in another case in which he bought guns and resold them to a firearms trafficker, similarly letting them "walk" rather than taking action to interdict them and arrest the buyer upon the delivery."Unbelievable," Mr. Burke wrote of Mr. Dodson in one internal e-mail. "This guy called Grassley and CBS to unearth what he in fact was proposing to do by himself. When you thought the hypocrisy of this whole matter had hit the limit already. ..."Mr. Burke was also frustrated at how news media officials at Justice Department headquarters were responding to the Congressional inquiry, the report said, and in June 2011 he sent an internal memorandum written by Mr. Dodson about the other gun trafficking case to a Fox News journalist.The inspector general's report criticized Mr. Burke for taking matters into his own hands, portraying him as inappropriately seeking to undermine and retaliate against Mr. Dodson, and accusing Mr. Burke of violating several department regulations. It suggested that the department's ethics office review whether to file a professional misconduct complaint with the bar.Mr. Burke declined to comment, through his lawyer. He also declined to be interviewed by the inspector general's office, which relied on a transcript of an interview he gave to Congressional investigators, along with e-mails and testimony by other officials.In a statement, Mr. Grassley criticized Mr. Burke's actions as attacking a "whistle-blower who had the guts to come forward and tell Congress the truth about Operation Fast and Furious" and noted that in his comments about the case, Mr. Dodson had apologized for letting guns walk.The inspector general's report also said that Mr. Burke's leak of the Dodson memorandum came shortly after James Cole, the deputy attorney general, chastised him over the leak of a different internal document to The New York Times and "put him on notice that such disclosures should not happen."In the earlier leak, the report said, Mr. Burke's press office sent a Times reporter an internal memorandum related to Operation Fast and Furious, which the newspaper posted online with a related article.Contacted by Mr. Cole, Mr. Burke was initially evasive about how the memorandum might have reached The Times. But days later, he said that he had "not been candid with Cole" and that his press officer had sent it, taking responsibility as head of the office. Mr. Cole "could not get a clear answer from Burke about whether he had authorized the release" and concluded Mr. Burke had lied to him, the report said.Mr. Burke also said he sent the Dodson document to the Fox News journalist indirectly, e-mailing it from his personal account to a friend of Mr. Burke's, who then gave a printed copy to the journalist. He explained that he was worried about the document circulating in the Fox e-mail system, but the report said this instead "demonstrated to us that Burke was aware his actions were improper, particularly in light of Burke's recent experience in improperly disclosing" the other document to The Times.
ANNANDALE-ON-HUDSON, N.Y. — Speaking uncertainly but smiling broadly, Gabrielle Giffords, the former Arizona congresswoman who became a public face of the gun control movement after she was shot in 2011, delivered a kind of blessing in her commencement address to Bard College graduates here on Saturday afternoon, urging them to "be bold, be courageous, be your best."Ms. Giffords spoke for no more than two minutes at the commencement ceremony, where she also received an honorary degree, but earned several standing ovations.She did not address her gun control advocacy, which encountered a setback last month when the Senate blocked background check legislation. Instead, she left it to her husband, the astronaut Mark E. Kelly, to describe their joint efforts to curb gun violence and the shooting in which six people were killed and 13 others were wounded, including Ms. Giffords, by a gunman in Tucson.Mr. Kelly, who has emerged as an ardent spokesman for his wife, told the audience of Ms. Giffords's continuing recovery from a head wound, which left her struggling to perform basic tasks, including speaking. He said the gun control issue had moved her to re-enter public life despite her physical limitations."What we have been lacking is someone with the courage to not choose sides on this issue but to choose a new path," Mr. Kelly told graduates and their families, who were gathered under a tent. "Gabby is the moderate and determined voice that the movement for sensible gun legislation needs."He added that he and his wife were longtime gun owners with a "strong tradition of guns" in their past and present lives, and that they hoped to represent the majority of Americans who "believe in sensible solutions, like background checks, that will keep us safer but don't infringe on anybody's right, like yours, to own a gun if you want to."Mr. Kelly criticized the National Rifle Association for obstructing gun control legislation, saying, "They've forgotten what they used to stand for, which is gun safety and a proud tradition of hunting, and now they mostly stand for the gun manufacturers."Ms. Giffords then walked unsteadily to the lectern, supported by her husband, to deliver her few labored lines. "Graduates, your future shines bright," she said. "Find your purpose and go for it."She continued: "The nation's counting on you to create, to innovate" — she paused, and seemed to stumble — "to create, to lead, to innovate."When she paused and when she finished, she waved and waved again, as if to convey with her hands all she could not say.It was the end of an academic year marked by violence, as the college's president, Leon Botstein, noted. First came the mass shooting in Newtown, Conn., in December, then the Boston Marathon bombings in April."Few have paid so dearly for their idealism," said a college trustee, Charles S. Johnson III, as Ms. Giffords was presented with an honorary doctorate in humane letters.Mr. Kelly and Ms. Giffords are connected to Bard through Pia Carusone, an alumna who was Ms. Giffords's chief of staff. It was Ms. Carusone who called Mr. Kelly in 2011 to tell him of the shooting."Pia called with life-changing news," he said in his speech. "Very simply, she said, 'Mark, I don't know how to tell you this, but Gabby's been shot.' ""Try to imagine that phone call," he said. "Nothing in either of our careers could have prepared us for that moment."
NEW BOSTON, Tex. — A quiet neighborhood in this small town in Northeast Texas has become the focus of the investigation into threatening letters laced with the deadly poison ricin that were mailed to President Obama and Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York, the authorities said Friday.Federal investigators have questioned a man who lives on Maple Street and on Friday continued searching the redbrick house where he lives with his wife and stepchildren. But they have not identified him, arrested him or named him as either a suspect or a person of interest.Neighbors and property records identify the man who lives in the Maple Street house as Nathaniel D. Richardson, 33. He is an Army veteran and works at the nearby Red River Army Depot, a repair facility for Army vehicles. Among the more than three dozen officers and agents at the house were representatives of the Army depot's fire department.The three letters addressed to Mr. Obama, Mr. Bloomberg and the mayor's gun control advocacy group in Washington were the latest in a string of ricin-laced letters sent to a variety of officials across the country in recent months.In April, letters with ricin were sent to the president, a Mississippi senator and a local Mississippi judge, and the F.B.I. quickly arrested Paul Kevin Curtis of Corinth, Miss. But the criminal charges against Mr. Curtis were dropped, and another man, J. Everett Dutschke, 41, of Tupelo, was arrested and accused not only of mailing the letters but also of trying to frame Mr. Curtis.Other ricin letters have been mailed to officials in what appeared to be separate cases, including one that was sent last month to Mr. Obama from Spokane, Wash.A spokeswoman for the F.B.I. in Dallas declined to comment about the investigation here, but said that no one was in custody on Friday evening and that no one had been arrested.The three letters in the latest case were handled by a Shreveport, La., mail sorting facility that services the New Boston area, and all were postmarked May 20. Officials said the ricin used was not nearly as powerful as the kind used in other cases. The letters addressed to Mr. Bloomberg and his advocacy group, Mayors Against Illegal Guns, focused on gun rights and referred to a "God-given right" to bear arms."You will have to kill me and my family before you get my guns," the letters said. "What's in this letter is nothing compared to what I've got planned for you."In New Boston, a town of 4,500 about 20 miles from the Arkansas state line, F.B.I. agents and technicians as well as officers with the United States Postal Inspection Service and the New Boston police interviewed neighbors on Friday and unloaded trailers filled with equipment.They set up three large blue tents in the driveway of the house, next to a basketball hoop, and two men in white hazardous-materials suits prepared to go inside. The scene clashed with the normally tranquil routines in the Twin Oaks subdivision, with its redbrick homes, neatly trimmed lawns and tall trees shading front yards.Mr. Richardson served as a wheeled-vehicle mechanic at Fort Bliss from August 2001 to August 2004, an Army spokesman said. His rank was specialist, and his service records did not indicate any deployments. He later joined an Army Reserve program in Seagoville, Tex., until his discharge in September 2011, the spokesman said.He and his wife, Shannon Rogers Guess, married the same year and moved into the house in New Boston. He appears to have grown up in the area, graduating from James Bowie High School in nearby Simms, Tex., in 1999, according to his Facebook page.Mr. Richardson's wife has five sons, and she is an actress who has had small roles in commercials, films and television shows, including as a zombie on "The Walking Dead." Officials said that the man being questioned came to the attention of investigators after his wife called the authorities.
That was the question 16 months ago, after Mr. Zimmerman pulled a handgun from his waistband and shot Mr. Martin once in the chest as they fought in the darkness. It was the question the initial police investigation and the first prosecutor wrestled with, an investigation shadowed by Florida's expansive law on self-defense — Stand Your Ground — which, if imposed, could have classified the shooting as justified.And it remains the question now, as potential jurors file into the Seminole County Courthouse in Sanford, Fla., on Monday at the start of Mr. Zimmerman's trial on charges of second-degree murder. The selection process is likely to take a few weeks, and the media coverage of the case has been so exhaustive that Judge Debra S. Nelson has chosen to withhold the identities of the six jurors who are eventually chosen, though not to sequester them.Because no one saw the fight unfold, the case may ultimately come down to which version of events the jury finds more believable: Mr. Zimmerman's assertion that he was attacked by Mr. Martin, or an entirely different account by a young woman who was talking to the victim on the phone moments before he was killed. In her statements, the young woman has said Mr. Martin sounded scared and asked Mr. Zimmerman why he was following him before the struggle started and the call ended abruptly.The credibility of both will be examined closely, and that of each has already taken a hit. Last June, the court found that Mr. Zimmerman and his wife had lied to the court about their finances so he could obtain a lower bail. The young woman said she had been unable to attend Mr. Martin's funeral because she had been ill and had gone to a hospital, but it came out at a recent hearing that no medical records existed to support her statement.At trial, prosecutors will assert that Mr. Zimmerman was a reckless vigilante who provoked the fatal confrontation by profiling Mr. Martin, a black 17-year-old who was minding his own business.Defense lawyers will portray Mr. Zimmerman as a dutiful watchman for a condominium development who, on the rainy night of Feb. 26, 2012, spied an unfamiliar young man with the hood of his sweatshirt pulled up, began to follow him and wound up shooting him dead out of fear that he himself would be killed.The courtroom battle to come also promises to be a replay, in part, of the angry public debate that has swirled around this racially charged case from the start and has inflamed observers on both sides, spawning a throng of online conspiracy theorists.As the case evolved quickly last year from a homicide investigation into a modern-day civil rights crusade, thousands of demonstrators donned hoodies and protested around the country in memory of Mr. Martin. The Rev. Jesse Jackson and the Rev. Al Sharpton championed the cause while the Martin family stood in the spotlight. President Obama weighed in a month after the shooting, expressing sympathy for Mr. Martin's family, urging a thorough investigation and saying, "If I had a son, he'd look like Trayvon," though he avoided any direct reference to the racial issues raised by community leaders.The general outcry and the delay in charging Mr. Zimmerman until six weeks after the shooting helped lead to the firing of the Sanford police chief; the case's reassignment to a special prosecutor, Angela B. Corey, who is the state attorney based in Jacksonville; and the filing of second-degree murder charges against Mr. Zimmerman.But the jurors will be ordered to set aside the furor and focus on evidence.That night, a high school student carrying only a phone, a soft drink and a bag of Skittles faced off against a gun-wielding volunteer guardian of the neighborhood. Minutes later, Mr. Zimmerman was on his back, with gashes on his head and a broken nose; Mr. Martin lay dead.The basic story, by now, is familiar. Mr. Zimmerman was in his car in his gated community when he spotted Mr. Martin walking. Mr. Zimmerman became suspicious. He called the police nonemergency line, as he had done numerous times before to report things like a stray dog and an open garage door.
WASHINGTON — Six months after the mass shooting in Newtown, Conn., and with no major gun legislation on the horizon in Congress, the White House is quietly moving forward on an executive package of gun safety measures.The package, which includes 23 executive actions announced by President Obama earlier this year, is intended to bolster the nation's database used for background checks and make it harder for criminals and people with mental illnesses to get guns.Among other things, the executive orders relax health care privacy regulations that some state executives say prevent them from putting the names of those Americans with mental health records into the database. The orders also give states more money to help them add data to the system and compel federal agencies to share more mental health data on workers. The goal is to add thousands of new people into the database — those with a history of mental illness, for example — who would not legally be allowed to buy a gun under current law.Gun control groups said that they admired the efforts, but that they would never carry the weight of legislation to expand the number of gun buyers who are subjected to the background check system. "Everything they have done helps," said Mark Glaze, the director of Mayors Against Illegal Guns. "They are important and significant and will make a big difference, but the biggest reduction in gun violence will come when every American gets a background check."This week, families from Newtown visited Capitol Hill to press for new legislation, while B. Todd Jones, Mr. Obama's choice to head the embattled Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, endured a testy nomination hearing."We've only just finished round one in our fight to get Congress to pass common-sense measures to save lives, and we will continue to join 90 percent of Americans in calling on them to close loopholes in the background check system," Denis McDonough, Mr. Obama's White House chief of staff, said Wednesday in an e-mail. "But in the meantime, we are doing everything in our power without them — including strengthening the existing background check system."The administration's progress enrages some Republicans and the National Rifle Association, which has aggressively fought any changes to gun laws. "The reason President Obama is using executive actions is to circumvent the will of the people and to bypass Congressional oversight," said Andrew Arulanandam, a spokesman for the group.The National Instant Criminal Background Check System, known as NICS, is a database made up of law enforcement, mental health and other records maintained by the F.B.I. to screen out prohibited firearms purchasers, including people with a record of felonies, those with active domestic violence protection orders lodged against them or those who have been involuntarily committed. The background check database contains more than 10 million active records, but states have been lax in some cases about uploading records to the system, particularly ones related to mental health.Without an act of Congress, the administration is unable to significantly expand the number of gun buyers who are subject to background checks, nor curb certain types of weapons and clips, both central to Mr. Obama's gun agenda. Those efforts failed in April on the Senate floor and have yet to be revived.The executive orders also direct the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention to begin research into gun violence, which administration officials and gun control groups say will help make the case for new gun safety regulations. During the gun debate this past spring on Capitol Hill, there was little available data about the reasons for gun violence, buying patterns and other gun-related public health issues. The reason is that Congress, under pressure from the gun lobby in the 1990s, redirected money that had been allocated for gun research by the C.D.C. and wrote legislation that was interpreted as a ban on government-financed studies of gun violence.
WASHINGTON — Democratic leaders in Congress and the White House renewed their push for gun legislation on Thursday, just months after it was defeated in the Senate, amid delicate talks on a new background-check measure that advocates hope could change enough votes from no to yes.But those negotiations met a warning from Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, who said he would not accept any bill that is substantially weaker than the one defeated in April."The bill that passes the Senate must have background checks, and not a watered-down version of background checks," Mr. Reid declared in the Capitol, flanked by the families of Newtown, Conn., school shooting victims.Those families also visited President Obama on Thursday at the White House and Speaker John A. Boehner.Quiet talks between Senators Mark Begich, Democrat of Alaska, and Kelly Ayotte, Republican of New Hampshire, officially do not exist. Both senators voted no in April, and aides to both deny the existence of negotiations or legislation."There are no talks," said Jeff Grappone, a spokesman for Ms. Ayotte. "There is no legislation. She stands by her vote."But other senators are openly acknowledging and encouraging the effort and say the talks are building momentum. Senator Richard Blumenthal, Democrat of Connecticut, said a new version of the gun bill would most likely enhance prosecutions of those who violate existing gun laws and further clarify that new legislation would not and could not lead to a national database of guns or gun ownership.Other Democrats said the defeated background check measure, written by Senators Joe Manchin III, Democrat of West Virginia, and Patrick J. Toomey, Republican of Pennsylvania, would probably be amended to exempt more rural sales and person-to-person sales from mandatory checks."We have to give them a credible and commendable way to change their votes," Mr. Blumenthal said of a handful of senators who could be persuaded, starting with Mr. Begich and Ms. Ayotte. Such modifications do not have to weaken the bill substantially, he added."Sometimes clarification can have the appearance of change," he said.Six months after the massacre at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, the emotions of the gun issue are still raw. Jillian Soto, whose older sister was one of the teachers killed in Newtown, told lawmakers, "America has not forgotten."Americans remain broadly supportive of legislation that expands background checks on gun purchases but are skeptical that such a bill will pass. A New York Times/CBS News poll released this month found that 69 percent support passage of a measure to expand such checks, but 56 percent say that significant change to gun policy is not likely this year.But while Democratic leaders insisted Thursday that passage of a tough gun bill was inevitable, the numbers are daunting. Advocates of expanded gun background checks need five senators to change their votes, and a sixth vote if New Jersey's newly appointed Republican senator, Jeffrey S. Chiesa, is opposed.Senators pressing forward believe that if Ms. Ayotte and Mr. Begich could strike an accord, they could bring along Senator Heidi Heitkamp, Democrat of North Dakota, and possibly Senators Max Baucus, Democrat of Montana, Lisa Murkowski, Republican of Alaska, and Jeff Flake, Republican of Arizona.But on Thursday Ms. Heitkamp, Mr. Flake and Mr. Baucus either avoided the question about changing their votes or said they had no intention of doing so."I've had a lot of these conversations," Mr. Toomey said. "I'm not aware of any real movement on the part of people who opposed it last time."Democrats are also divided over how to pressure members of their own caucus to get behind a new push.Senator Christopher S. Murphy, Democrat of Connecticut, praised what he called "the political infrastructure" emerging to push gun control, and said "members who voted no are not real excited about having to face hundreds of thousands of dollars of ads" from groups like Mayors Against Illegal Guns, which was founded by Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York.But Democratic leaders are increasingly vocal in their admonitions against Mr. Bloomberg's attacks on Democrats who voted no in April.Mr. Reid said Thursday that he spoke to the mayor this week to impress on him that "to have Republicans control the Senate is a sure sign we will never, ever get anything done."Mr. Reid was not sure that message had gotten through."He's kind of a free spirit, and a very rich one," he said.
As more schools consider arming their employees, some districts are encountering a daunting economic hurdle: insurance carriers threatening to raise their premiums or revoke coverage entirely.During legislative sessions this year, seven states enacted laws permitting teachers or administrators to carry guns in schools. Three of the measures — in Kansas, South Dakota and Tennessee — took effect last week.But already, EMC Insurance Companies, the liability insurance provider for about 90 percent of Kansas school districts, has sent a letter to its agents saying that schools permitting employees to carry concealed handguns would be declined coverage."We are making this underwriting decision simply to protect the financial security of our company," the letter said.In northeast Indiana, Douglas A. Harp, the sheriff of Noble County, offered to deputize teachers to carry handguns in their classrooms less than a week after 26 children and educators were killed in a school shooting in Newtown, Conn. A community member donated $27,000 in firearms to the effort. School officials from three districts seemed ready to sign off. But the plan fell apart after an insurer refused to provide workers' compensation to schools with gun-carrying staff members.The Oregon School Boards Association, which manages liability coverage for all but a handful of the state's school districts, recently announced a new pricing structure that would make districts pay an extra $2,500 annual premium for every staff member carrying a weapon on the job.Scott Whitman, an administrator at the Jackson County school district in southern Oregon, where a committee is looking at arming school staff members next year, said costs would be a factor in the decision. With 10 buildings, the expense of arming and training more than one staff member at each school would easily exceed $50,000 a year."Pretty much every last bit of our money is budgeted," he said, adding, "To me, that could be quite an impediment to putting this forward."Increasing the number of firearms in classrooms across the country has been the cornerstone of the National Rifle Association's response to the Newtown massacre and the legislative fights over proposed gun laws that followed it. In April, the gun-rights group released a report that called for armed police officers, security guards or staff members in every American school.More than 30 state legislatures introduced bills that permit staff members to carry guns in public or private schools this year, according to the National Conference of State Legislatures.Supporters say training teachers to carry guns would better protect students and, if anything, should put insurance companies more at ease. But worries remain about who could be sued if a gun-related accident occurred on school property, giving way to business realities for some insurance providers, which include both commercial carriers and nonprofit cooperatives."Some are saying this is so high risk we're not going to touch it," said Kenneth S. Trump, the president of National School Safety and Security Services, which discourages districts from implementing concealed carry policies. "Others may say this is so high risk that you're going to pay through the nose."Few districts in the nation currently allow teachers to carry firearms in K-12 schools; those that do are often in rural areas where it could take a while for first responders to arrive. It is still too soon to tell whether that number will rise as more states consider laws, as many administrators have started discussing the matter with parents and school lawyers only in the past six months.Jenny Emery, head of the Association of Governmental Risk Pools, said none of her members plan to withhold coverage like EMC. But many are strongly recommending other security alternatives, she said, noting that cooperatives provide some form of risk financing to about 80 percent of public entities across the country."I haven't seen evidence yet that suggests people are determining that arming teachers is a recommended way to manage risk," she said. "Far from it."Still, insurers in some states said they were unsure how to approach the subject when the time comes.Days after the new law took effect in Tennessee last week, the state's largest K-12 insurance provider, Tennessee Risk Management Trust, had not reached a conclusion about whether the price of its coverage would increase if employees carried guns.
CHICAGO — Amid the flash and bang of fireworks, gunshots from 47 separate shootings echoed through this city over the extended Fourth of July weekend, killing 11 and wounding dozens more, including a 5-year-old boy. The events were a sober reminder to residents that despite a drop in homicides this year, gaining control over gun violence in Chicago will be a long road, and the political pressure it has put on Mayor Rahm Emanuel 's first term is far from over."It's a day-by-day, minute-by-minute crime," Garry F. McCarthy, the Chicago police superintendent, said at a news conference on Monday. "Yes, we're seeing great response to our efforts to build a deeper partnership with the communities and the residents that we serve, but we know there's more work to be done."Homicides in Chicago drew national attention last year after a spike in gun violence and gang activity contributed to more than 500 deaths, exceeding the level of bloodshed in the country's two larger cities, New York and Los Angeles. But the city has been encouraged by a 24 percent reduction in shootings so far this year (from 1,193 to 909) and 28 percent reduction in homicides (from 276 to 200) — an improvement officials attribute partly to an increased police presence, with as many as 400 officers a day patrolling the most dangerous areas. The police say the violence is mostly gang related and in a small number of neighborhoods on the city's South and West Sides.In the first week of July, the police say, there were 65 shootings across the city, down from 76 over the same period in 2012. Sixteen people were killed last week, the same as in 2012. In New York City, where homicides are also down this year, there were 38 shootings and seven fatalities last week.Early July, in particular, is typically a tough time for Chicago violence, said Roseanna Ander, the executive director of the University of Chicago Crime Lab."It's a holiday weekend, you've got people out drinking, the weather is nice," she said. "That is a challenging confluence of factors to be working against."Ms. Ander added, "I don't think this necessarily tells us what the rest of the summer is going to be like, but it does serve as a reminder that this is a very complicated problem."In a statement released Monday, Mr. Emanuel said, "Any amount of violence is unacceptable." Noting that new policing strategies and increased summer programs for children have helped address the problem, he added, "Our work will continue until all residents share the same level of safety."Some experts point to colder spring months as a contributing factor to this year's decline in gun violence.Among the victims shot in the 80-degree weather last weekend, one person was killed and seven were wounded on Saturday after someone fired an assault weapon from a moving minivan on the West Side. The police said the attack was gang related.Early Friday, a 5-year-old boy was shot while walking home with his family after a Fourth of July party. Around 1 a.m., the family stopped to talk to some friends in a park on the city's South Side when someone fired into the crowd, striking the boy, Jaden Donald, in front of his three older siblings."They were only in the park for a few minutes," said the Rev. Dan Willis, the family's pastor. One bullet pierced his leg, another damaged his kidney, spleen and pancreas, he said. Jaden was still in a hospital Monday — stable, but unconscious and on a ventilator.The police said two others were wounded in the park shooting. A suspect, Darryl Chambers, 24, a gang member, has been charged with three counts of attempted murder and aggregated battery with a firearm.Already, state and city officials have used the rash of violence to renew calls for tougher gun laws and increased community involvement in addressing violence in Chicago.Gov. Pat Quinn joined a community "walk against violence" on the South Side on Saturday and visited a church on the West Side on Sunday as he tried to gain support for amendments he made to a concealed carry law that passed both chambers in May. He wants a limit of one gun and one 10-cartridge ammunition magazine per person, among other changes. But lawmakers are expected to override his veto in a special session on Tuesday.At the news conference Monday, Mr. McCarthy also called for harsher sentences for people caught carrying a gun illegally. He said a three-year minimum sentence would have stopped five of the gunmen last week, including Mr. Chambers, who had been arrested in 2011 and was given probation."Folks, it's absolutely unacceptable," Mr. McCarthy said. "The examples go on and on."
DENVER — As he prepared to vote for some of the strictest gun control measures in the country earlier this year, John Morse, a former police chief and president of the State Senate, knew he would infuriate some constituents."There may be a cost for me to pay, but I am more than happy to pay it," he said in a recent interview.Now, after months of gathering signatures and skirmishing in court, gun activists in Colorado, with the support of the National Rifle Association, have forced Mr. Morse and a fellow Democrat, Senator Angela Giron, into recall elections. The recall effort is seen nationally as a test of whether politicians, largely Democrats, outside big cities and deep-blue coastal states can survive the political fallout of supporting stricter gun laws."Legislators should be scared," said Becky Mizel, chairwoman of the Republican Party in the old steel and railroad town of Pueblo, Ms. Giron's home district. "We have a battle here."Around his Colorado Springs-area district, Mr. Morse has spent the summer in campaign overdrive. He walks door to door, explaining his votes to people in his narrowly divided district.At first, the recall drive was against four Democrats. But the organizers failed to collect the required signatures against two of them, leaving only Mr. Morse and Ms. Giron to face a recall vote on Sept. 10, a first for the state. Voters must decide whether either of the Democrats should be recalled and, if so, who should replace them. So far, only two Republicans — one a former police officer, the other a former city councilman — are expected to be on the ballot to replace the incumbents."They're going to turn out to ride me out of town on a rail," Mr. Morse said. "Symbolically, if you could take me out, that would be a benefit to the special gun interests."For Colorado gun-rights supporters — and their allies like the N.R.A. and the Republicans who opposed the gun bills — the recall elections are a chance to send a message to any politician who would support similar legislation. If Mr. Morse and Ms. Giron survive the recall vote, it might bolster lawmakers in other gun-friendly states to consider more controls on firearms.The recall campaign began just weeks after the state's Democratic-controlled Legislature passed Colorado's first new gun limits in more than a decade — measures that required background checks for private transactions and limited the rounds in ammunition clips.To supporters, the limits were an overdue response to mass shootings that have haunted Colorado since the Columbine High School attack in 1999. But in a state where avid support for hunting and sport shooting crosses generations and partisan lines, the measures drew an angry response from many quarters.Supporters of the new gun laws — including Gov. John W. Hickenlooper, a Democrat — said they were tailored for Colorado. Lawmakers increased the proposed limits on clip size to 15 rounds from 10, and added provisions to allow parents to pass down guns to their children without a background check. Supporters released opinion polls showing they had the support of solid majorities of Colorado residents.But to Victor Head, a plumber in Pueblo, the new measures were a travesty. One day, Mr. Head said, he was chatting with friends on a Web site for enthusiasts of the AR-15 assault rifle when the discussion shifted to how they could strike back at their legislators."You can only write so many e-mails and go to so many meetings and protests," Mr. Head said. "They have to listen to a recall."Democrats criticized the recall effort as a waste of time that would cost taxpayers $200,000. They pointed out that Mr. Morse had to step down next year because of term limits, and that Ms. Giron, a first-term senator, would be up for re-election.But gun-rights activists said they needed to act."We're sick of saying, 'Let's just wait until next year,' " Mr. Head said. "We've got to send a message."
TALLAHASSEE, Fla. — The college and high school students arranged themselves in the colonial-style chairs and on the green carpet, a portrait of the state's Old Capitol building above them, as they exchanged stories about their lives and the travails of the "black and brown youth" in Florida.One young woman whose parents were both drug addicts spoke about how she had defied the odds; she will graduate from college next year. A young man mentioned that he was one of the few in his family who had not ended up in prison. Another talked about his years in and out of homeless shelters while he was growing up in Miami.Only a stone's throw away, beyond the two receptionists in front of them and behind an imposing white door, was the office of the person they hoped would hear them and respond with action: Florida's Republican governor, Rick Scott.On July 16, three days after George Zimmerman's acquittal in the shooting death of Trayvon Martin, the Dream Defenders, as they are called, streamed into the governor's suite to hold a sit-in. Encamped there since then, they are demanding changes to Florida's self-defense laws, specifically the Stand Your Ground provision, and to the way minorities are treated in the state's schools and on the streets. They have vowed to stay until a special legislative session is called on their issues.Their goal is a long shot: the governor and the Republican-controlled Legislature strongly support the self-defense law, and polls have shown that many Floridians favor it.But the students are staying the course, encouraged that their mission has already gained some ground."I've had it going through the normal routes because it doesn't work," said Ciara Taylor, 24, a Florida A&M University political science graduate who helped lobby lawmakers as a student and is now the Dream Defenders' political director. "People tell us that certain things aren't possible, but they are coming through every day. We are proving them wrong every minute."So far, the Dream Defenders, which formed last year to fight for social change after Mr. Martin's death, have scored a few victories. The first was when Governor Scott, who initially ignored the protesters, agreed to sit down with them. The governor listened for more than an hour but did not agree to call a special session.The group persisted, growing larger and attracting high-profile figures like the Rev. Jesse L. Jackson, who angered the governor by calling Florida an "apartheid state"; the entertainer and social activist Harry Belafonte; and the rapper Talib Kweli.Most recently, the speaker of the Florida House, Will Weatherford, announced that he would ask a House subcommittee to conduct a hearing on the Stand Your Ground law this fall — an important first step, the students feel."We have a plan, a plan to persevere," said Phillip Agnew, the leader of the Dream Defenders and the only one who is being paid. The Service Employees International Union is paying his small salary.But the students may have to persevere for a long time. Besides the stiff resistance from the governor and the Legislature, State Representative Matt Gaetz, a Republican who will lead the House subcommittee hearing, said recently that he did not want to alter "one damn comma of Stand Your Ground.""I think you have protesters in the Capitol today who are protesting without a whole lot of knowledge about the fact patterns associated with Stand Your Ground," Mr. Gaetz said in an interview. "They are protesting for the sake of protesting, and we shouldn't capitulate to that."Mr. Gaetz said he would ensure a "fair debate" on the issue and would work with Democrats to help them air their agenda. But he was critical of the protesters, saying they were capitalizing on Mr. Martin's death to "begin their own movement.""Do you really think that there would be this great push to repeal the Stand Your Ground law if Zimmerman had been convicted?" Mr. Gaetz asked.Don Gaetz, Mr. Gaetz's father and the president of the State Senate, called the protesters cooperative and respectful. But he recently declined a request by the Senate Democratic leader to convene a select committee to review the law.Florida was the first state to pass a Stand Your Ground law. It did so in 2005, with strong support from the National Rifle Association. The law allows people who fear serious injury or death to defend themselves, even if they have the opportunity to retreat and are in a public place.
For decades, weapons confiscated by the police in Texas were supposed to be used for law enforcement purposes — or else destroyed. Starting next month, police departments across the state will be allowed to sell some of them.Some local departments have already been selling confiscated weapons, operating under a gray area of existing law, said T. Edwin Walker, president of Texas Law Shield, which provides legal services to Texas gun owners.House Bill 1421, which passed during the last legislative session, formally permits law enforcement officials to sell found or unclaimed weapons to licensed firearms dealers. They can also sell confiscated weapons that are left unclaimed after cases that were never prosecuted or did not result in a conviction. In cases that do result in a conviction, police departments keep the firearms as evidence in case they are needed for appeals.The new rule gives law enforcement another option, said State Representative Charles Perry, Republican of Lubbock and the author of the bill. "It has a fiscal impact in a positive way, and it makes sense if the weapons are in good shape."It is unclear how well the measure will meet its stated goal, which Mr. Walker said is allowing the police to "recoup some money, to put some money back in their budget." Police departments in large Texas cities like San Antonio, Houston and Austin, which destroyed hundreds of guns in 2012, have said they would not participate.Some law enforcement officials said they already had department policies against selling confiscated firearms and worried about putting more weapons back on the street.The Waco Police Department has not yet decided if it will sell confiscated guns, but "at first blush it is probably not something we will be willing to do just for the fact that we don't want to put additional weapons back out there on the street that have already been confiscated or used in a crime," said Sgt. W. Patrick Swanton, the department's public information officer.Those who might rely on the new law? Small, cash-starved departments in rural Texas, some of which have already been making such resales.In Crane County, home to about 4,300 people at the base of the Texas Panhandle, even two gun confiscations a year are a lot, said Chief Deputy Andrew Aguilar of the county sheriff's office. Firearms his department has seized in the past have already been sold, he said.In many rural towns, sheriffs' sales of seized property are common sources of income, said Alice Tripp, the legislative director of the Texas State Rifle Association.After the law takes effect on Sept. 1, law enforcement agencies will be able to sell confiscated guns to licensed weapons dealers. The proceeds will first cover outstanding court or auctioneer's fees; the remainder will go to the police department that seized the weapon.Jason Knowles, the manager of Patriot Firearms in Lubbock, said he doubted the confiscated gun market would be bustling."The majority of firearms seized by law enforcement typically are relatively cheap and of low quality," he said. "You don't get a lot of high-end guns in the seizure world."Sgt. Jason Lewis, the Lubbock Police Department's public information officer, said the department had destroyed 56 firearms in 2012, many of them cheap, stolen guns in very poor condition. He said it would not participate in gun sales."Every once in a while, you get something that you are like 'Whoa, that's too bad that you are melting that,' " Sergeant Lewis said. "For the most part, it is junk."
JEFFERSON CITY, Mo. — Unless a handful of wavering Democrats change their minds, the Republican-controlled Missouri legislature is expected to enact a statute next month nullifying all federal gun laws in the state and making it a crime for federal agents to enforce them here. A Missourian arrested under federal firearm statutes would even be able to sue the arresting officer.The law amounts to the most far-reaching states' rights endeavor in the country, the far edge of a growing movement known as "nullification" in which a state defies federal power.The Missouri Republican Party thinks linking guns to nullification works well, said Matt Wills, the party's director of communications, thanks in part to the push by President Obama for tougher gun laws. "It's probably one of the best states' rights issues that the country's got going right now," he said.The measure was vetoed last month by Gov. Jay Nixon, a Democrat, as unconstitutional. But when the legislature gathers again on Sept. 11, it will seek to override his veto, even though most experts say the courts will strike down the measure. Nearly every Republican and a dozen Democrats appear likely to vote for the override.Richard G. Callahan, the United States attorney for the Eastern District of Missouri, is concerned. He cited a recent joint operation of federal, state and local law enforcement officials that led to 159 arrests and the seizing of 267 weapons, and noted that the measure "would have outlawed such operations, and would have made criminals out of the law enforcement officers."In a letter explaining his veto, Mr. Nixon said the federal government's supremacy over the states' "is as logically sound as it is legally well established." He said that another provision of the measure, which makes it a crime to publish the name of any gun owner, violates the First Amendment and could make a crime out of local newspapers' traditional publication of "photos of proud young Missourians who harvest their first turkey or deer."But the votes for the measure were overwhelming. In the House, all but one of the 109 Republicans voted for the bill, joined by 11 Democrats. In the Senate, all 24 Republicans supported it, along with 2 Democrats. Overriding the governor's veto would require 23 votes in the Senate and 109 in the House, where at least one Democrat would have to come on board.The National Rifle Association, which has praised Mr. Nixon in the past for signing pro-gun legislation, has been silent about the new bill. Repeated calls to the organization were not returned.Historically used by civil rights opponents, nullification has bloomed in recent years around a host of other issues, broadly including medical marijuana by liberals and the new health care law by conservatives.State Representative T. J. McKenna, a Democrat from Festus, voted for the bill despite saying it was unconstitutional and raised a firestorm of protest against himself. "If you just Google my name, it's all over the place about what a big coward I am," he said with consternation, and "how big of a 'craven' I was. I had to look that up."The voters in his largely rural district have voiced overwhelming support for the bill, he said. "I can't be Mr. Liberal, St. Louis wannabe," he said. "What am I supposed to do? Just go against all my constituents?"As for the veto override vote, he said, "I don't know how I'm going to vote yet."State Representative Doug Funderburk, a Republican from St. Peters and the author of the bill, said he expected to have more than enough votes when the veto override came up for consideration.Adam Winkler, a professor of law at the University of California, Los Angeles, who follows nullification efforts nationally, said that nearly two dozen states had passed medical marijuana laws in defiance of federal restrictions. Richard Cauchi, who tracks such health legislation for the National Conference of State Legislatures, said: "Since January 2011, at least 23 states have considered bills seeking to nullify the health care law; as of mid-2013 only one state, North Dakota, had a signed law. Its language states, however, that the nullification provisions 'likely are not authorized by the United States Constitution.' "
COLORADO SPRINGS — Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York and the billionaire philanthropist Eli Broad have each donated hundreds of thousands of dollars. The National Rifle Association is buying political advertisements. New York's junior senator sent a fund-raising e-mail. And the election has attracted news coverage from as far away as Sweden.All this over a homegrown campaign to oust two Democratic state senators who provided crucial support for a package of strict new state gun control laws. As the recall elections — the first of their kind in Colorado's history — draw closer, the race has swelled from a local scuffle into a proxy battle in the nation's wrenching fight over gun control.Over all, both sides have dedicated about $2 million to the campaigns, most of it in support of the two senators: John Morse, the president of the Colorado Senate, and Angela Giron, who represents the Southern Colorado city of Pueblo. That might not seem large compared with the multimillion-dollar governors' races that can be commonplace across the country these days. But the money and the attention have transformed an off-year campaign that started with homemade signs and volunteers collecting signatures in grocery store parking lots.Voters say they are being bombarded with telephone calls and pamphlets, radio and television commercials. Each day seems to bring a new procedural battle: over the language on the recall ballot, how the vote will be conducted or which candidates will appear as possible replacements. Mr. Morse, who represents Colorado Springs, and Ms. Giron each have one Republican challenger on the ballot.Mr. Bloomberg, who has bankrolled other gun-control supporters across the country, recently contributed $350,000 to fight the recall efforts. Mr. Broad gave $250,000. Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, has stepped in on behalf of Ms. Giron, in particular, enlisting support through her Off the Sidelines political action committee.Mr. Bloomberg "has said he is going to support officials across the country who are willing to stand up to the N.R.A. and Washington gun lobby to support sane gun laws that will keep guns out of the hands of criminals," Marc La Vorgna, a spokesman for the mayor, said in an e-mail. "These two senators did that."The N.R.A. has also jumped into the Sept. 10 race, contributing nearly $109,000 for mailings and radio, cable and online ads, according to campaign finance records.The influx of money has allowed each side to claim that its opponents are being manipulated by outside interests. One advertisement by the Rocky Mountain Gun Owners said Mr. Morse was taking "marching orders" from the "billionaire playboy" Mr. Bloomberg. A fund-raising e-mail from Senator Gillibrand called the election "a wrongful recall by the N.R.A."Colorado's vote is being watched closely around the nation as a litmus test of how voters respond to new gun measures in a swing state with an ingrained culture of hunting, sport shooting and gun ownership."There's symbolic importance to both sides," said Eric Sondermann, a political analyst in Denver. "If they're recalled, it would be interpreted as a rejection of the gun control agenda, a rejection of what Colorado passed. If these two prevail, then maybe that's one more nick in the armor of the N.R.A. and the gun advocates."To Democrats, the recall offers a chance to defend what they have called sensible and moderate gun regulations: specifically, requiring background checks on private gun sales and limiting ammunition magazines to 15 rounds. To firearms advocates, the vote is a way to demonstrate the political consequences of supporting gun control."The peasants have grabbed ahold of their pitchforks and torches," said Dudley Brown, the executive director of Rocky Mountain Gun Owners.The passions on display in the recall effort also represent a widening rift in the state's identity, some analysts say, between the Colorado of F-150s, hunting trips and rural towns, and the Colorado of Subarus, ski passes and downtown lofts.This year, with Democrats' controlling the legislature and governor's mansion, they not only passed new gun control laws, but also laws allowing people living in the country illegally to pay in-state tuition, creating new green-energy requirements for rural electric cooperatives and approving civil unions for same-sex couples.In Northern Colorado, some counties are so frustrated with the state's trajectory that they will vote this fall on whether to secede and form their own state.
BOSTON — The Boston Marathon bombings produced an outpouring of attention to this city, but in violence-prone neighborhoods like Roxbury and Dorchester, some say the attention has made them feel only more isolated."Since April 15, we're at over 115 shootings," a city councilor, Tito Jackson, told a Boston police officer from the department's gang unit at a public safety meeting at a Roxbury community center late last month.April 15 was the day the bombs went off at the marathon, killing three people and wounding more than 260, resulting in a widespread manhunt, a national outpouring of shock and sympathy, and the creation of a fund that has raised $60 million to help the victims.In the nearly five months since the marathon, however, community activists, clergy members and others have used the mounting tally of shootings to call attention to the everyday reality of violence and to push for measures to address the weapons trafficking, gangs and fundamental mistrust between the community and the police that they believe contribute to it."When three people die, because it happened in the downtown area, where the tourists come, that gets the attention, that gets the state of emergency," said the Rev. Bruce H. Wall, the pastor of the Global Ministries Christian Church in Dorchester, who has discussed the issue on his radio program. "It's that pain that we have to live with."The tally — which rose to 124 with a shooting in Mattapan on Thursday — is showcased daily in an image designed to look like a marathon runner's number on Blackstonian.com, a Web site aimed at black Bostonians. The image, which has spread on Facebook, Twitter and other social media, was created by Jamarhl Crawford, a writer and graphic artist who is running a write-in campaign for Mr. Jackson's council seat and who convened a rally at City Hall last month to mark 100 shootings since the marathon.After the event he led more than 40 people to Mayor Thomas M. Menino's office to request a meeting with his staff about gun violence; no meeting has been scheduled,  although the mayor has since attended other events aimed at raising awareness about gun violence."It is almost indicative of that classic tale, the 'Tale of Two Cities,' because I don't believe there's one Boston," Mr. Crawford told the crowd, referring to the "One Boston" slogan that emerged after the bombings. "There's at least two."Even Senator Elizabeth Warren alluded to the violence since the marathon in a recent e-mail to supporters urging stronger gun control laws. "If 100 people went to Massachusetts General Hospital with a mysterious virus in four months, we would treat it as an epidemic," read the message. "There would be headlines, alarms and calls for action."As of Aug. 26, there were 185 shootings in Boston this year, compared with 164 during the same period last year. That is well below the more than 400 shootings a year that took place in the early 1990s, but it is likely to overtake the fewer than 200 shootings a year recorded during most of the late '90s.Many activists have called for stronger gun laws and better tracking of guns, as well as efforts to create better relationships between officers and the neighborhoods they patrol, citing a campaign by the Massachusetts Association of Minority Law Enforcement Officers to increase the number of high-ranking black officers in the Police Department.The group recently took a "no confidence" vote in the department's commissioner, Ed Davis, who has defended his record on race. Both the association's president, Larry Ellison, and Mr. Wall say they will urge their supporters not to vote for candidates in this fall's mayoral election who seem content with the status quo.In an interview, Mr. Davis acknowledged the disparity in the response to the bombing, which included scores of federal investigators, and the city's daily violence, which disproportionately affects minority neighborhoods. But, he said, "to try to equate it to a terror attack — it's difficult to compare the two."Still, he added, "I really think there needs to be more federal recognition" of everyday urban violence in the city.As she watched the search for the bombers unfold from her home on the border between Dorchester and Mattapan, two neighborhoods with high rates of gun violence, Kim Odom, a 50-year-old pastor, thought of her son Steven, who was 13 when he was shot and killed in 2007, just steps from their home."I can remember sitting on my couch and thinking to myself, Wow, did they do this the night that my son was killed?" said Ms. Odom, who has become a vocal violence-prevention activist since the murder. "Was there such a task to find the perpetrator that took my child's life that night?"It was 18 months before the authorities announced that an accomplice in her son's killing had been arrested. The shooting suspect, the authorities said, was shot dead a week after her son's death.Many speaking out say they do not mean to diminish the pain of the bombing victims and their families. "How do you even begin to talk about it without sounding insensitive?" said Mona Lisa Smith, the president of Mothers for Justice and Equality, which works to curtail urban violence.But such violence, she added, is "our reality, for all of these families, every day."
PUEBLO, Colo. — At first, Angela Giron was surprised to find herself in the cross hairs of a campaign to recall Colorado lawmakers who had supported a slate of new gun-control laws. She had won her State Senate seat by a 10-point margin. Her Southern Colorado district is heavily Hispanic and reliably Democratic, hardly ideal terrain to oust a lawmaker with Mexican roots whose mother once worked picking beans."I thought, what the heck?" Ms. Giron said. "Why would they do that?"But over the summer, Ms. Giron found herself at the center of a citizen-led recall campaign heavily financed by the National Rifle Association and other conservative groups and Second Amendment advocates, who have spent hundreds of thousands of dollars on advertisements and mailings to oust her  and a fellow Democrat, John Morse, the president of the Colorado Senate.In her fight, Ms. Giron has found support among liberal groups and unions across the state, as well as gun-control supporters with deep pockets like Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York, who contributed $350,000 to fight the recall campaigns. Emily's List, which supports Democratic women who favor abortion rights, and New York's junior Democratic senator, Kirsten E. Gillibrand, have also sent fund-raising e-mails urging their supporters to help Ms. Giron.The campaigns have grown from a novelty into the central political battle here in Colorado. Fiercely fought and heavily financed by outside groups, they are widely seen as referendums on whether swing-state Democrats can survive the populist reaction after supporting gun restrictions.On Tuesday, constituents in this struggling old steel town will go to the polls to decide whether Ms. Giron should be ejected from office before her term is up. A former police official, George Rivera, will be on the ballot as her potential Republican replacement. Mr. Morse, too, will face a recall vote in his Colorado Springs district, about 45 miles to the north.But even as national interest crested, Ms. Giron and Mr. Morse have tried to focus on local issues. In a race dominated by guns, Ms. Giron has promoted her support for laws on juvenile offenders and overtime pay, and how she helped secure money for a new academic building at the Pueblo campus of Colorado State University.As the race barreled into its final days, the two Democrats and their opponents stepped up what has become an all-out fight for every vote in the two Senate districts, which have less than 200,000 registered voters. On Sunday, 80 volunteers gathered inside a union hall in Pueblo for their marching orders: Find supporters, and get them to the polls. After thanking everyone, Ms. Giron, clipboard in hand, set out for another day of knocking on doors and rallying support."I'm a fast walker," she said as she headed out through a working-class neighborhood under a sweltering morning sun.But it was slow. Most people, it seemed, were either at church or still asleep, so Ms. Giron scrawled her hellos onto glossy leaflets and wedged them into doorways. One man responded to her knocks by shouting, "I already voted!" from his living room. Ms. Giron thanked him, and moved on.She guessed she has knocked on about 4,000 doors this summer, defending her pivotal support for new laws that require background checks on private gun sales and limit ammunition magazines to 15 rounds. She recalled one voter who approached her and yelled, "Angela, I'm so mad at you! I can't sell my guns at the garage sale.""I thought, well, that's a good thing," she said.Ms. Giron had never fired a gun before this winter, when Colorado's Democratic-controlled legislature began an emotional and divisive effort to pass the state's first new gun-control laws in more than a decade. Despite almost unanimous opposition from Republicans, Democrats pushed ahead with the bills, calling them a moderate, sensible response to mass shootings at an Aurora, Colo., movie theater and at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Connecticut.
COLORADO SPRINGS — Two Colorado Democrats who provided crucial support for a package of state gun laws were voted out of office on Tuesday in special elections seen as a test of whether swing-state voters would accept gun restrictions after mass shootings at a Colorado movie theater and a Connecticut elementary school.The vote, which came five months after the United States Senate defeated several gun restrictions, handed another loss to gun-control supporters and gave moderate lawmakers across the country a warning about the political risks of voting for tougher gun laws.The immediate effect of the recalls — the first of their kind in Colorado — was to remove two state senators, Angela Giron of Pueblo and John Morse of Colorado Springs, and replace them with Republicans.Although the election was confined to two small districts in Southern Colorado and does not repeal Colorado's gun laws or change partisan control of the General Assembly, both sides spent heavily and campaigned fiercely, fighting to prevail in what analysts called a proxy battle between gun-control advocates and the National Rifle Association.In a spirited concession speech, Mr. Morse, who lost the vote by just two percentage points, called the loss of his seat "purely symbolic" and defended the record of the last legislative session as "phenomenal.""You're not judged by how you got knocked down but how you got back up," he said.Mr. Morse, who was also the Senate president, will be replaced by his challenger on the ballot, Bernie Herpin, a Republican former city councilman from Colorado Springs.For advocates on both sides, the stakes in Tuesday's elections were far bigger than the fates of two state politicians. As money and national attention poured into Colorado, a state of hunters that has been stained by two mass shootings, the races became a symbol of the nation's bitter fight over gun control, with one side bolstered by Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York and the other by the National Rifle Association.While both sides campaigned vigorously, knocking on doors, holding rallies and driving voters to the polls, gun-control advocates far outspent their opponents. A range of philanthropists, liberal political groups, unions and activists raised a total of $3 million to defend Mr. Morse and Ms. Giron. Mr. Bloomberg personally gave $350,000.It was not enough to help Mr. Morse overcome the conservative outrage that erupted this winter as Colorado's Democratic-controlled statehouse passed several gun laws over near-unanimous opposition from Republicans and Second Amendment advocates. Among other things, the new laws require background checks for private gun sales and limit ammunition magazines to 15 rounds.Mr. Morse's hand was on the tiller during much of that debate. A former police chief, he said he found himself in a position of not just rounding up votes, but actually explaining the mechanics of guns to fellow Democrats. He brought a magazine to show his colleagues how it worked. In an emotional speech in March, as the debate reached its peak, Mr. Morse stood on the Senate floor and spoke of gun violence and "cleansing a sickness from our souls."His opponents pounced on the remark, framing it as a sign of Mr. Morse's disregard for his gun-owning constituents, as well as a symptom of the widening gap between Colorado's urban Democrats and its rural Republicans.Mr. Morse represented a slice of Colorado Springs that straddles those fault lines. His district is closely split among Democrats, Republicans and unaffiliated voters. And on Tuesday, despite huge voter-turnout drives and Obama-style neighborhood canvassing, more of Mr. Morse's opponents showed up to cast him out.The passions ignited by the vote were on full display on Tuesday, as opposing sides lined up side by side outside polling places here in Colorado's second-largest city. They spoke of knowing survivors of the mass shooting inside the Century 16 theater in Aurora, Colo. Two of Mr. Morse's sisters held up a banner, and complained that their brother's opponents were twisting his record and his words in bitter attack ads.A few feet away stood Steven Martin, 53, a recall supporter with a Beretta handgun holstered on his hip."It's a deterrent," he said. "I love my country."The recall movement drew support from as far away as New York and California. Organizers say it began locally, in living rooms and backyards, as a response to new gun-control laws that were the marquee achievements of Colorado's new Democratic majorities.
DENVER — When Colorado passed a series of tough gun restrictions last winter, Democrats and gun control advocates hailed it as a sign of changing attitudes in a Western swing state. But moments after a pivotal vote in the state Senate, a Republican lawmaker named Greg Brophy warned that Colorado's independent-leaning voters would rebel against the new laws."The backlash will be severe," he said.On Tuesday, Democrats here got a taste of that popular anger, as voters in a recall election ousted two state senators who had been strong supporters of the gun control laws. Although it was a small, off-year election, the recall campaign grew into a referendum that pitted the National Rifle Association against Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York.On Wednesday, gun advocates called the result a huge victory that they said would dampen other states' efforts to pursue gun restrictions.While some voters in the two districts groused about the flood of donations Mr. Bloomberg and outside groups made in the recall campaigns, analysts in Colorado said the election results were shaped by an eruption of local discontent from voters who say their leaders are ignoring the concerns of gun owners and abandoning Colorado's rural, libertarian roots.After years of gains propelled by shifting demographics and voter attitudes, Democrats now control the state legislature and the governor's mansion, and make up most of Colorado's Congressional delegation. But state officials said that the recalls showed how Colorado's political pendulum could still swing in surprising directions, and that deep rifts still lay beneath its increasingly blue veneer."This is a state with a wide variety of interests at stake," said Bill Ritter, a Democrat and former governor. "The Democratic Party cannot be the party of metro Denver and Boulder. It has to be the party who understands the values, views and aspirations of people who live outside of those areas."In addition to the gun laws, Democratic majorities in the legislature passed green-energy requirements for rural electric cooperatives, offered in-state college tuition to illegal immigrants who were Colorado high school graduates, and expanded mail-in voting. And Gov. John W. Hickenlooper, a Democrat, granted a reprieve to a convicted killer, heading off the state's first execution in 16 years. Republicans opposed many of those acts.As they fought for their political lives, the two senators facing recall, John Morse and Angela Giron, described themselves as common-sense Democrats who understood their state's values. Mr. Morse, also the state Senate president, had been a police chief. Ms. Giron represented the heavily Hispanic, working-class town of Pueblo, which has struggled through years of layoffs at its steel mill.They said the new gun laws, which include background checks on private gun sales and limits on ammunition magazines, were moderate restrictions that made sense in a state scarred by gun massacres at Columbine High School in 1999 and a movie theater in Aurora last year. In a state where hunting and shooting have long been part of everyday life, Mr. Morse and Ms. Giron had to make a nuanced case that they supported both gun rights as well as some restrictions.But on Tuesday, many of their constituents seemed to reject their arguments. Mr. Morse lost his recall by 343 votes — almost the same margin by which he had eked out re-election in 2010.Ms. Giron's loss raised far more red flags for Democrats. She represented a district where registered Democrats outnumbered Republicans by two to one, and she won her seat in 2010 by 10 percentage points. But on Tuesday, voters lined up against her, 56 percent to 44 percent.Of the state's four Hispanic lawmakers from Pueblo County, Ms. Giron was the only one to back the most contentious gun legislation, said Theresa Trujillo, the Southern Colorado director for the Colorado Progressive Coalition. She also said that young Latino voters — a likely source of support — were not committed to the election. Recall proponents, she said, were gung-ho.
CHICAGO — Gun owners in the nation's third-largest city will no longer have to register their firearms with the local authorities, ending a policy that has helped the police track guns here for decades.Chicago's City Council voted to make the change on Wednesday, modifying the municipal code to comply with a new state law that will make Illinois the last in the nation to allow people to carry concealed weapons in public. While the city's strict bans on assault weapons and gun dealers remain, the loss of control over its own registry, in effect since 1968, was another setback for gun control proponents — this time in President Obama's hometown, in a state run by Democrats."This is an ongoing battle and struggle to make sure our laws reflect the safety our residents need," Mayor Rahm Emanuel said at a news conference on Wednesday, expressing disappointment with the "concealed carry" state law.The change, which the Council made reluctantly, comes as Chicago is trying to control a rash of gun violence that drew national attention when the city's homicide count surpassed 500 last year. The Chicago Police Department has cited gang activity and a flow of firearms from suburbs and from across the Indiana border into the city, which continues to pursue more aggressive gun restrictions.Chicago's homicide rate has declined 22 percent in the past year, according to the Police Department. There have been 295 homicides in Chicago this year, compared with 377 during the same period last year. That is still more than the number of homicides in other large cities like New York and Los Angeles during the same time frame.Criminal experts say the gun registry database in Chicago, which contains more than 8,000 gun owners and about 22,000 firearms, has helped the police better understand the movement of weapons in the city as they put in place new law enforcement strategies. Adam Collins, a spokesman for the Police Department, said in a statement that officers would be able to use a new online database of permit holders maintained by the Illinois State Police under the law."There's no scenario where this makes the jobs of police easier," said Jens Ludwig, director of the University of Chicago's Crime Lab, about having to repeal the registry.The city was forced to make the move after the United States Court of Appeals for the Seventh District ruled in December that Illinois's ban on the carrying of concealed weapons in public was unconstitutional. The decision gave state lawmakers a task they never wanted: to write and pass a law by June 9 creating rules that allow concealed carry.That was more difficult than expected for a Democratic-majority Legislature, as downstate rural lawmakers clashed with Chicago-area lawmakers over whether the city could set more restrictive policies than the rest of Illinois.In the end, legislators enacted a law that gives full control of gun licensing to the Illinois State Police, abolishing Chicago's gun registration and firearm permit requirements. Other changes included a block on new assault weapons bans, though Chicago was one of a dozen cities and villages to tighten restrictions during a 10-day grace period.Richard A. Pearson, executive director of the Illinois State Rifle Association, said Chicago's gun registry was unnecessary, nothing more than a bureaucratic headache for residents who wanted to protect themselves."It was just harassment of law-abiding gun owners, and that's all it was ever meant to be," he said. Illinois law requires that individuals keep records for a decade of any firearms they sell privately.But even with the recent legal victory, Mr. Pearson is far from ready to declare Chicago gun-friendly.At the City Council meeting Wednesday, members toughened other gun ordinances, approving new penalties for people who commit gun-related offenses within 100 feet of public transportation and a separate ordinance requiring all restaurants that serve alcohol to prohibit concealed guns or risk losing their liquor licenses. The state law bans firearms only in places that make more than half of their revenue from liquor sales.Illinois residents are expected to begin applying for concealed-carry permits in January.
JEFFERSON CITY, Mo. — Missouri's Republican-dominated state legislature was dealt a stinging blow on Wednesday when lawmakers failed to override the Democratic governor's vetoes on two emotionally charged measures: one for sweeping tax cuts, and another preventing the enforcement of federal gun laws in the state.Legislators had returned to the State Capitol here to chip away at the 29 bills and four line items that Gov. Jay Nixon had vetoed — the most vetoes he has issued in a single session in his five years as governor. He was overridden more times in a year than any previous governor since the two-thirds majority rule was instituted.But Mr. Nixon won victories on the two most divisive measures, in an unlikely turn for a man who, for the first time in his tenure, faced veto-proof Republican supermajorities in both chambers."It's a defining moment," Mr. Nixon said at a news conference after his veto on the tax-cut bill was upheld. "Today was about protecting our economy, our communities and, especially, our schools from this costly and misguided bill."Over the summer, Mr. Nixon devoted most of his attention to the tax-cut bill, barnstorming the state to argue that it would decimate financing for education, mental health and other services. The bill would have slashed taxes for businesses and lowered the state's income tax rate for the first time in more than 90 years.The governor stitched together a broad coalition of support from the educators, with more than a hundred school boards across the state passing resolutions to sustain the veto.Mr. Nixon also enraged some opponents by withholding $400 million in state spending that he said he would release only if the tax cut failed. On Wednesday he said he would work to distribute the money quickly.After a summer of escalating confrontation and more than an hour and a half of debate on the House floor, 94 members, all of them Republican, voted in favor of overriding the veto of the tax cut, and 67 voted against it, with 15 Republicans joining the Democrats. That fell well short of the 109 votes needed.Representative T. J. Berry, the Republican sponsor of the tax-cut bill, conceded that there were some unintended consequences of the bill that Mr. Nixon had pointed out — the elimination, for instance, of an exemption on prescription drugs that could have caused people to pay more. Mr. Berry said he expected the legislature to fix those technicalities when it reconvened next year."We're like the old Greek demigod who pushed the rock up the hill, just to watch the rock fall back down," Mr. Berry said after Wednesday's vote. "I'm sure in January we will turn around and pass almost the exact same bill and put it on the governor's desk during session, and he will veto it. But at least then the arguments will be clean. They won't be that this is a flawed bill."Despite the defeat, supporters of big tax cuts said they were heartened that a majority of lawmakers had favored the measure."We ran a campaign that was aggressive, out there talking in the general public about tax cuts," said Aaron Willard, the treasurer of the Grow Missouri Coalition, a chief advocate of an override. "We got resounding support from the general population."The House barely passed the gun measure, 109 to 49, with three abstentions. But hours later, the Senate, which has 24 Republicans, failed to get an override by one vote, with 22 senators voting for an override and 12 against, including two Republicans.The veto of the gun bill appeared to be headed for an override until the past week. Chris Koster, the state's Democratic attorney general, wrote a letter last week opposing the bill. Mr. Koster said that some of the provisions were likely to be deemed unconstitutional, and he pointed to several problems even if parts of the law stood; that it could, for instance, prevent local and federal law enforcement agencies from working together.Then this week, the Republican floor leader in the Senate, Ron Richard, said that he was withdrawing his support for the bill because of concerns over its legality. Mr. Richard was one of the two Republicans to vote against it on Wednesday night.Senator Brian Nieves, the sponsor of the gun bill, said he believed that Mr. Koster's letter shifted the tide. "Two weeks ago, I would've placed a very large wager in support of override," he said. "Chris Koster made a perfect tactical move and released his letter at the perfect time, when there wouldn't be time to sufficiently rebut his argument."Hundreds of protesters had descended on the Capitol on Wednesday and packed the legislative chambers to push for overrides.Mr. Nixon attributed the many challenges to his vetoes to the partisan atmosphere in the assembly. "My sense is that there has been, over a period of time, a shift a little bit into more of a political discourse than a governing discourse," he said Wednesday.He said he hoped that the rebuff of the tax bill would change that. "My certain hope and expectation is that we get to a focus on the issues that really matter as far as making better education, creating new opportunities for our kids," he said.
The weeks after a gunman killed 20 schoolchildren in Newtown, Conn., were characterized by a new optimism about a goal that had seemed elusive for almost a decade: tougher gun laws. The shooting was called on more than one occasion "a game changer."In the nine months since, although supporters of stricter legislation have won some victories, those high hopes have been tempered by a series of losses, most notably in April when the Senate defeated several measures to strengthen gun restrictions and then last week in Colorado, where two state senators who had backed stronger gun laws lost recall elections.The greatest successes of gun control supporters came in the form of sweeping new laws in a handful of Democratic-led states, including Maryland and New York, as well as in politically mixed Colorado. But more than two dozen states, most of them controlled by Republicans, moved in the opposite direction, broadly expanding the rights of gun owners.Now those on both sides in the debate are raising money, developing new strategies and turning their focus to potential battles in at least half a dozen states."What happened in Colorado was a very powerful reminder to elected officials that voters still count," said Andrew Arulanandam, a spokesman for the National Rifle Association.But Mark Glaze, the executive director of Mayors Against Illegal Guns, the group founded by Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York, said that the recall election, with its low turnout, was not a true test of what Colorado voters wanted and that his group was moving forward."Our plans are full speed ahead," he said. Both the N.R.A. and Mr. Bloomberg poured money into the Colorado election.Mr. Glaze and other supporters of tougher gun laws pointed to states like Minnesota, New Mexico and Oregon as places for potential campaigns to pass bills requiring background checks for private gun sales or other firearms legislation. Gun bills in those states came close to passing this year.And in Maine and Washington, gun control supporters intend to push ballot initiatives, going directly to voters and bypassing elected officials, who they say are vulnerable to pressure from the gun lobby."After Newtown, there couldn't have been a more powerful moment to get this done," said Ethan Strimling, a former state legislator in Maine and a leader in discussions there about putting a background check initiative on the ballot as early as next year."And when you can't get it done through our elected officials under that kind of emotion because of the N.R.A., you have no choice but to go directly to the people," Mr. Strimling said.Gun rights groups, in turn, are mounting initiatives of their own. In Washington State, where gun control supporters have already collected 225,000 of the more than 244,000 signatures needed for a ballot initiative on requiring background checks for private gun sales, their opponents have begun their own, dueling initiative, which would prevent the state from requiring background checks that are more restrictive than federal standards.Gun rights supporters in other states are also focusing on legislators. In Nevada, for instance, a recall campaign has already begun against State Senator Justin Jones, a Democrat who led the successful passage in June of a bill to strengthen background checks. Gov. Brian Sandoval, a Republican, vetoed the bill.In the decade before the Newtown shooting, state after state had gradually extended the rights of gun owners. But the push for new legislation that followed the massacre inspired a new burst of energy on the other side.Angered by talk of a renewed assault weapons ban and fearful of increased government oversight, opponents of tighter restrictions increased their efforts.Ammunition and semiautomatic rifles flew off the shelves of gun stores. Second Amendment groups welcomed a flurry of new members. Dave Trahan, the executive director of the Sportsman's Alliance of Maine, said the group's membership had grown 120 percent over the last year, gaining 70 to 100 new members each month. The alliance, he pledged, would fight any attempt to place an initiative for background checks on the state ballot.But even some staunch supporters of gun rights concede that advocates of stronger legislation have won some striking victories."I think the Bloomberg side made very significant progress in some states," said Dave Kopel, a lawyer and the Second Amendment project director at the Independence Institute, a research group."When you look at the state scoreboard," Mr. Kopel said, "they're roughly in a position of parity this year, which is doing well for them."
WASHINGTON — The suspect in the killing of 12 people at the Washington Navy Yard on Monday test-fired an AR-15 assault rifle at a Virginia gun store last week but was stopped from buying one because state law there limits the sale of such weapons to out-of-state buyers, according to two senior law enforcement officials.Instead, the suspect, Aaron Alexis of Texas, bought a law-enforcement-style shotgun — an 870 Remington pump-action — and used it on Monday as he rampaged through the navy yard, said the officials, who requested anonymity because the investigation was continuing."The gun was broken in half, and he had it in a bag," one official said of the Remington. "He went inside the building and assembled it in a bathroom."The gunman then perched himself above an atrium where he fired down on people who had been eating breakfast, officials said, adding that he used shotgun shells that had roughly a dozen large ball-bearing-like shots in them, increasing their lethal nature."When he discharged, the pieces of lead would spread the farther they went," the one official said. "It is similar to weapons used in bird shooting but on a more serious scale. These were not bullets but many small pieces of lead flying through the air."After firing down on people, the gunman began to search for more people to shoot, and as he searched, he was confronted by a security guard near an exit, according to the officials. The gunman shot the guard and took his semiautomatic handgun, then headed back to the atrium."He runs back upstairs and cranks off more rounds with the handgun and then heads to another stairwell, where he confronts a worker there and shoots him," the official said.The gunman is believed to have shot the Navy employee, who worked in maintenance, with the pistol near another exit.On Saturday, Mr. Alexis bought the Remington shotgun and ammunition at the gun store and range in Lorton, Va., Sharpshooters Small Arms Range, where he also rented a rifle and practiced with it, according to a lawyer for the store.The lawyer, J. Michael Slocum, said in an e-mail that Mr. Alexis bought a Remington 870 Express 12-gauge shotgun and about two boxes of ammunition, or about 24 shells. The purchases were approved after the store owner conducted the required federal background check, Mr. Slocum said."After the terrible and tragic events at the navy yard, the Sharpshooters was visited by federal law enforcement authorities, who reviewed the Range's records, including video and other materials," Mr. Slocum wrote. "So far as is known, Mr. Alexis visited the Range only once, and he has had no other contact with the Range."The Virginia State Police said Tuesday that Mr. Alexis had passed all state and local background checks to buy the shotgun.Despite statements on Monday from senior law enforcement officials — which were widely reported in the news media, including in The New York Times — that an AR-15 had been found at the scene, no such gun has been found. The authorities say they do not believe the gunman used one.Federal officials said that there was some initial confusion at the scene about which firearms had been used and that it was hours before investigators were able to analyze video from the scene.It is unclear whether Mr. Alexis's psychiatric issues ever progressed to the point that he was involuntarily committed to a mental health institution, or legally determined to be mentally ill or incompetent, either of which would have barred him from buying a gun.If neither applied — and most people who are treated for mental illness never get to that point — then his situation would be similar to other gunmen, like Jared L. Loughner, who killed 6 people and wounded 13, including former Representative Gabrielle Giffords, in Tucson in 2011, and James E. Holmes, who killed 12 people and wounded dozens in a Colorado movie theater last year.Mental health experts point out that the vast majority of people with mental illness are never violent. On the other hand, studies have found an increased risk for violence among those with serious mental illness, including schizophrenia, major depression or bipolar disorder.
WASHINGTON — Despite deep divisions that have kept Congress from passing new gun safety laws for almost two decades, there is one aspect of gun control on which many Democrats, Republicans and even the National Rifle Association agree: the need to give mental health providers better resources to treat dangerous people and prevent them from buying weapons.Yet efforts to improve the country's fraying mental health system to help prevent mass shootings have stalled on Capitol Hill, tied up in the broader fight over expanded background checks and limits on weapons sales.Now the shooting at the Washington Navy Yard by a man who authorities say showed telltale signs of psychosis is spurring a push to move ahead with bipartisan mental health policy changes. The new debate over gun control is beginning to turn not on weapons or ammunition, but on the question of whether to spend more money on treating and preventing mental illness.Proponents again face a steep uphill push, but they see an opening even if it remains unclear whether any changes under consideration could have headed off the latest attack, in which the authorities say Aaron Alexis, a former Navy reservist, bought the shotgun he used in Virginia."Given the clear connection between recent mass shootings and mental illness, the Senate should not delay bipartisan legislation that would help address this issue," Senators Kelly Ayotte, Republican of New Hampshire, and Mark Begich, Democrat of Alaska, wrote Wednesday in a joint statement to the Senate leadership. The legislation they are pushing, which was held up when a more sweeping gun measure was defeated earlier this year, would establish programs to train teachers to recognize the signs of mental illness and how to defuse potentially violent situations.Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader and a strong proponent of the failed Senate plan to expand the federal background check system, is resisting any move to advance the mental health provisions, fearing that it would be used as a fig leaf by those who oppose expanded checks while closing the door to weapons restrictions in the future. Both Ms. Ayotte and Mr. Begich opposed the gun control bill that failed in April.Some gun rights advocates fear the opposite: that opening discussion on mental health could be a back door to a flood of new federal gun laws.But several senators, like Senator Richard Blumenthal, Democrat of Connecticut, who has pushed for tougher gun laws since last year's elementary school massacre in Newtown, Conn., see mental health policy as a way forward."Mental health is really the key to unlocking this issue," Mr. Blumenthal said. "I've become more and more convinced that we should establish the mental health issue as our common ground."But while state lawmakers have taken steps in recent years to make buying weapons harder for certain people showing signs of mental illness in places including New York, Connecticut and Florida, where the legislation won the blessing of the National Rifle Association, there is not yet serious discussion in Congress of doing so."If you're having auditory hallucinations, that's a sign of schizophrenia," said Senator Tom Coburn, Republican of Oklahoma, referring to reports that Mr. Alexis suffered from delusions. Though someone like that should not have a gun, Mr. Coburn said, he expressed little faith that Congress could come together to write a law to fix that."It's all politics," he said. The senator helped lead negotiations on a background check proposal that fell apart earlier this year.Mr. Alexis appears to be only the latest gunman whose mental health issues did not reach the level at which he would have been prohibited from buying a firearm under federal law. And it is unknowable whether even the most drastic improvements to the nation's mental health system would have caught and treated the symptoms of someone like Mr. Alexis. The same can also be said for laws that restrict gun ownership for people with histories of mental illness.The Veterans Affairs Department said Wednesday that on the two times Mr. Alexis visited an emergency room in August, he seemed alert and denied being depressed or thinking of harming himself.
CLARKSVILLE, Ark. — The slim, black 9-millimeter handguns that the school superintendent David Hopkins selected for his teachers here weigh about a pound and slip easily into a pocket. Sixteen people, including the janitor and a kindergarten teacher, wear them to school every day.Although state law prohibits guns on campus, Mr. Hopkins found a way around it.Like rural educators who are quietly doing the same thing in a handful of other states, Mr. Hopkins has formulated a security plan that relies on a patchwork of concealed-weapons laws, special law enforcement regulations and local school board policies to arm teachers.Without money to hire security guards for the five schools he oversees, giving teachers nearly 60 hours of training and their own guns seemed like the only reasonable, economical way to protect the 2,500 public school students in this small town in the Ozark foothills."Realistically, when you look at a person coming to your door right there with a firearm, you've got to have a plan," Mr. Hopkins said. "If you have a better one, tell me."After the Newtown, Conn., rampage last December, 33 states considered new legislation aimed at arming teachers and administrators, according to an analysis by the National Conference of State Legislatures. Only 5 enacted laws that expanded the ability for public educators to arm themselves at school.Still, some teachers and administrators around the country have carried guns for years under state or local laws that impose few restrictions on where concealed weapons can be carried."It's a fairly common practice among the schools that do not have sworn officers," said Asa Hutchinson, a former congressman and a candidate for governor in Arkansas. He recently led the National Rifle Association's school safety initiative, which produced a 225-page report that advocated armed security officers or, in some cases, armed teachers in every public school.Mr. Hutchinson said he recently spoke with a superintendent in Arkansas who had been carrying a firearm for 10 years. The district was among 13 in the state, including Clarksville, that have special permission to use rules designed for private security firms to arm their staff members.Just before the school year began, the state suspended the practice temporarily after Attorney General Dustin McDaniel issued an opinion that school districts could not act as private security companies. This month, however, a state board voted to allow the districts to continue using the law until the legislature reconsiders the issue in two years.The number of teachers who carry guns in the nation's 99,000 public schools is impossible to calculate, school security experts, education officials and people on both sides of the gun debate agree. It is likely 10 percent or less, by some estimates, but the number is growing."It's been creeping up on us without a lot of fanfare," said Bill Bond, a school safety specialist for the National Association of Secondary School Principals.Mr. Bond was the principal of a Paducah, Ky., high school in 1997, when a 14-year-old boy shot and killed three students and wounded five others.Like many others, Mr. Bond says arming teachers is the wrong approach to preventing school shootings. But some educators, especially in rural districts, have been quietly carrying guns to school for years by making use of permissive state gun laws.In Georgia and Missouri, guns can be on campus as long as they are in a locked car. In Massachusetts, Louisiana and Nevada, a teacher can carry a gun on campus with written permission from school officials.Hawaii and New Hampshire do not have any prohibition against weapons on school property for those with concealed-carry permitsAnd for more than a dozen years in Utah, anyone with a permit to carry a concealed weapon can take a loaded gun to school without even telling the principal.This year, for the first time, dozens of states have considered more formal approaches to regulating the ways educators may arm themselves. Only a few have moved ahead.In Kansas, a law that took effect in July allows school districts to select employees with concealed-carry permits to bring guns to school. But Denise Kahler, a spokeswoman for the Kansas State Department of Education, said she was not aware of any districts that were pursuing it.In Tennessee, where a similar law passed, insurance concerns stopped some districts from arming teachers. Lee Harrell, director of government relations, labor relations and policy for the Tennessee School Boards Association, said this week that he was not aware of any districts that were arming teachers.The most sweeping new law is in Texas, where the Protection of Texas Children Act went into effect on Sept. 1. Teachers who want to serve as armed school marshals must have a license to carry a concealed weapon, pass a mental health evaluation and be trained specifically to respond when someone with a gun is inside a school shooting students.The program is still being developed, and unlike the Arkansas effort, teachers would have to keep the guns under lock and key and only one school marshal would be allowed for each 400 students.Meanwhile, in states where the laws do not prohibit teachers from carrying guns, teachers and other school personnel are seeking private training in increasing numbers."I think the number would shock people," said Jim Irvine, a firearms trainer in Ohio who has taught 168 teachers to carry guns in school since he began a program specifically for educators this year.Mr. Irvine said he knew of several districts whose teachers and administrators were armed or training to be."Our law has always been that it's up to the individual school district," he said. "It's not new, but it's new in popularity."One is the Newcomerstown Exempted Village School District, in rural eastern Ohio, where the school board in June approved a policy that allows employees who have a concealed-weapon permit and specialized training to go to school with a gun.Part of the strategy is to keep the identities of which teachers have guns under wraps so neither students nor potential attackers will know where the guns are, so Jeff Staggs, the superintendent there, is not talking much about it.But, he said in a recent interview, "the community feels over all that their kids are safer in the district this school year."Still, in Arkansas and other states, the notion of arming teachers is meeting strong resistance."The idea that a single relatively untrained teacher is going to bring this person who is heavily armed down is a stretch," said Mark Glaze, the director of Mayors Against Illegal Guns. "The idea is to keep the guns from the hands of the shooter."Those who have spent their lives in the classroom have similar concerns."No teacher that I know of could ever receive enough training," said Steve Gunter, a retired history teacher in Bentonville, Ark."If I had a gun in my room with some of these students where I taught? They'd get it from me and shoot me," he said. "They'd say, 'Mr. Gunter, you gave me an F? Here's your F.' "
The .45-caliber pistol that killed Lucas Heagren, 3, on Memorial Day last year at his Ohio home had been temporarily hidden under the couch by his father. But Lucas found it and shot himself through the right eye. "It's bad," his mother told the 911 dispatcher. "It's really bad."
LOS ANGELES — Democrats in the California Legislature passed a sweeping package of gun control bills after a string of mass shootings across the country, cracking down on assault rifles, high-capacity magazines and lead ammunition. But on Friday, Gov. Jerry Brown, also a Democrat, vetoed several key pieces, including a ban on semiautomatic weapons that many had considered the toughest restriction on gun ownership in the country.The bill, by Darrell Steinberg, the State Senate president pro tem, would have banned semiautomatic rifles with detachable magazines. Mr. Brown, calling the bill overly broad, said the ban would have unduly constrained hunters and others using guns legally."The State of California already has some of the strictest gun laws in the country, including bans on military-style assault rifles and high-capacity ammunition magazines," Mr. Brown wrote in a veto statement. "I don't believe this bill's blanket ban on semiautomatic rifles would reduce criminal activity or enhance public safety enough to warrant this infringement on gun owners' rights."Mr. Brown signed several other pieces of gun legislation on Friday, including curbs on high-capacity magazines, a ban on lead hunting ammunition, new limits on firearms storage and several measures intended to keep mentally ill people from possessing firearms.Still, his action has substantially muted the effect of the gun control legislation passed this year in California.The Brady Campaign to Prevent Gun Violence, which already ranks California's gun control laws as the strongest in the country, had especially championed a package of four gun control bills, known as the LIFE Act, including the semiautomatic rifle ban. Mr. Brown vetoed three of those bills.The vetoes underscore the difficulty of enacting new gun control legislation, even in Democrat-dominated California, where the party controls every statewide office and both houses of the Legislature.With a race for re-election coming up next year (though, at age 75, he has not yet announced whether he will run), Mr. Brown was no doubt well aware of the political price other Democratic elected officials had paid recently for supporting gun control legislation.Last month, two Colorado lawmakers were recalled after their key support for gun control laws in that state.Republicans have warned that Democrats who support gun control could face a backlash, even in California.Tim Donnelly, a Republican state assemblyman, said he was relieved Mr. Brown had vetoed the semiautomatic rifle bill, which, he said "would have been the most draconian and sweeping erasure of the Second Amendment in the history of our country."But Mr. Donnelly railed against some of the other gun restrictions the governor signed, calling the lead ammunition ban a de facto prohibition on hunting."Jerry Brown and his party will pay a price in the next election because they've gone way too far," he said.Mr. Steinberg expressed disappointment about the veto of his bill. "I believe aggressive action is precisely what's needed to reduce the carnage in our communities," he said, "and to counter the equally aggressive action by the gun industry, which is intent on exploiting loopholes in our existing ban on assault weapons."
HOUSTON — Hundreds of armed demonstrators are planning to converge at the Alamo in San Antonio on Saturday to test the limits of the gun laws in one of the most gun-friendly states in the country, by openly carrying their shotguns, assault weapons and other types of rifles in public.Organizers of the rally — a flier declares "Get your guns & Head to San Antonio" — said they were planning a peaceful event. But the demonstration, intended to both celebrate the state's gun culture and challenge it, has concerned officials. Amid a heavy police presence, more than 1,000 men and women carrying loaded rifles over their shoulders are expected to assemble at the site of the historic gun battle in one of the busiest sections of downtown.Gun advocates say they have a simple goal — to remind ordinary citizens and law enforcement officials that they are allowed in Texas to legally and openly carry what are known as "long guns," including shotguns and assault rifles.In the world of Texas gun rights, size counts.The carrying of handguns is regulated in Texas: many residents are allowed to carry a concealed pistol if they receive a state-issued permit, but they are forbidden from carrying that weapon openly and unconcealed in public. The carrying of rifles, however, is largely unregulated. Texans can walk down the street with a loaded rifle slung over their shoulder so long as they are not intentionally carrying the weapon in a public place in a manner, according to state law, "calculated to alarm."Hunters in rural Texas have quietly enjoyed and exercised the right to openly carry rifles for decades. But in recent months, as gun advocates have pushed for the passage of open-carry legislation that would allow those with concealed-carry permits to wear their handguns unconcealed on their hips, pro-gun Texans have sought to put the freedom to carry long guns to the test in Austin and other cities."A right that goes unexercised is a right that will be in jeopardy in the future," said Jerry Patterson, the state land commissioner and a former state senator who wrote the concealed handgun law. "It used to be that everyone drove around Texas with a shotgun or rifle in a pickup visible for all to see. It's normal. It's routine. It's lawful. We want to demonstrate that there's no reason to call up the National Guard. Somebody might be offended, but that's just too bad."Mr. Patterson, 66, who is scheduled to speak at the rally, used to carry a pistol in his boot on the floor of the Senate chamber when he was a legislator in Austin. But he will not have a rifle at the event on Saturday, because doing so, he said, would be too cumbersome.When asked if he was bringing a rifle to the Alamo, the Rev. Terry Holcomb, a rally organizer and a pastor at a Baptist church near Huntsville, Tex., replied, "No sir, but my wife is.""She'll be bringing an AR-15 Bushmaster .223," he said.Mr. Holcomb, 45, has carried that weapon as well as his Civil War-era replica revolver — certain antique guns and replicas that do not fire modern ammunition can be carried unconcealed — in public dozens of times during individual and group demonstrations, including on walks around his neighborhood in Coldspring, Tex."We get actually very little negative reaction," said Mr. Holcomb, the executive director of the gun rights group Texas Carry, one of the rally's sponsors. "We do not have a problem with police engagement at all. We appreciate those encounters."One such encounter, however, angered gun advocates, and prompted the idea for the rally. Three members of another gun group, Open Carry Texas, were cited for disorderly conduct with a firearm as they sat outside a Starbucks in San Antonio with their rifles in August. Mr. Holcomb and other gun advocates have said the three men were cited illegally.The rally has put San Antonio officials in a difficult position. A city ordinance prohibits any person other than a police or security officer from carrying a firearm within the city limits at a political rally or at other public sites and events. Mr. Patterson, the state land commissioner, said that Chief William McManus of the San Antonio Police Department told him that the city was suspending enforcement of that ordinance for the rally on Saturday. Gun advocates believe that the ordinance is unlawful, pointing to sections of local government code that prohibit municipalities and counties from passing laws regulating firearms.Chief McManus did not address suspending the ordinance in a statement. But he said police officials were "expecting it to be a peaceful gathering and within the limits of the law."The rally's organizers have made full symbolic use of the site of their protest, which will be on the grounds of the Alamo on state-owned property that Mr. Patterson's office is in charge of overseeing. Fliers for the event feature a Texas flag emblazoned with an assault rifle and the words, "Come and Take It, San Antonio!"But amid such bluster, the organizers have also sought to give the event a family-friendly tone. Mr. Holcomb said they would be conducting "chamber checks" to prevent accidental discharges. Such checks, which will be done by organizers to ensure that bullets remain in the clips rather than loaded into the chamber, will be mandatory. They have also asked those participating to observe "proper muzzle etiquette" and to carry their weapons with a sling, a long strap that allows the gun to be slung over the shoulder, to "promote a nonaggressive manner of carry."
SAN ANTONIO — Angela L. Pena brought her family to the Alamo on Saturday. She also brought her black assault rifle, a .223-caliber LWRC M4, and had it strapped across her back. Her daughter brought her M&P rifle; her son-in-law carried his .308-caliber Remington R-25; and her 8-year-old grandson, Sebastian Gonzalez, had his Ruger 10/22 rifle."A rifle on our back is part of our everyday life, just like a cellphone is part of our everyday life," said Ms. Pena, 48, who manages her husband's dental practice in South Texas.Here in the heart of the seventh-largest city in the country on Saturday, hundreds of gun owners like Ms. Pena and her family carried their firearms in the open outside the entrance to the Alamo as part of a gun rights rally that was peaceful but loud.For tourists, it was a startling sight: men, women and children openly carrying loaded and unloaded shotguns, hunting rifles, AR-15s and AK-47s as if they were purses or backpacks. A young man in jeans ate a breakfast sandwich with his assault rifle resting behind his back. A rally speaker with his own assault rifle confronted and quizzed police officials about their views of the Second Amendment, and the officials calmly looked on.Fathers and sons, husbands and wives, teenagers and retirees all had their guns out, as visitors to San Antonio came and went from the Alamo. Police officers monitored and filmed the rally from a building across the street.Demonstrators were exercising a little-known privilege of Texas gun culture; Texas law allows people to walk down the street with an assault rifle, shotgun or other type of long gun. A state-issued license is required to carry a concealed handgun.Gun advocates in Texas have started using their right to carry rifles publicly as part of a push to expand handgun laws. They want Texas to join several states that have allowed people licensed to carry concealed firearms to wear their weapons on their hips, unconcealed, if they wish.Rally organizers and participants said they wanted to remind San Antonio that the carrying of rifles was not only legal but normal, and that the carrying of unconcealed weapons in public was no cause for alarm. But at the request of organizers, most at the rally stuck plastic straws or strips into the chambers of their rifles to show that though there might be bullets in the clip, there were none in the chamber.Ms. Pena and her family, including Sebastian, had straws sticking out of their weapons.Scott Gibbons had a pen in the chamber of his AR-15 rifle, which was strapped across his back as he stood next to his wife, Mandy. "Our children have been shooting guns since they were 8 and 9, and they're now 28 and 29," Ms. Gibbons said. "We want our grandchildren to also have that right."A group called Moms Demand Action for Gun Sense in America held an opposing rally nearby, and a San Antonio man walked through the crowd with a sign reading, "The rule of the gun will kill everyone," angering many gun owners. There was a tense though civil tone throughout."Look at here, we've got a stroller going by here, with kids running around," said Jerry Patterson, the state's land commissioner. Mr. Patterson, whose office oversees the Alamo, was one of several speakers at the rally."The 190 folks that died here were defending their right to bear arms," he said. "It's specifically mentioned in the Texas Declaration of Independence of March 2, 1836."San Antonio's police chief, William McManus, said his goal was to allow rally participants to exercise their constitutional rights, though his officers were on the lookout for violations. A local ordinance prohibits anyone other than a law enforcement official from carrying a loaded rifle or shotgun on any public street in the city. And a state law prohibits carrying a firearm in a public place in a manner calculated to cause alarm.Chief McManus said he was not suspending the enforcement of any ordinances, and rifle owners at the rally walked a fine legal line as a result. It was unclear, for instance, whether some who carried rifles with a loaded magazine but an empty chamber were violating the local ordinance. Gun owners said the ordinance was unlawful regardless, because of a state law that prohibits municipalities from regulating firearms.Near the end of the rally, Chief McManus said there had been no arrests. "Everything's been running pretty smoothly," he said. "I have to admit I was a bit apprehensive."
HOUSTON — A small meeting of a group seeking tougher gun laws was interrupted Saturday at a suburban Dallas restaurant when the woman who helped organize it saw something outside that startled her: at least two dozen men and women in the parking lot with shotguns, hunting rifles, AR-15s and AK-47s.The scene unfolded near AT&T Stadium in the suburb of Arlington about 30 minutes after three women associated with the local chapter of Moms Demand Action for Gun Sense in America met inside the Blue Mesa Grill."I was terrified," said the woman who helped coordinate the meeting and who spoke on the condition of anonymity because she said she feared for her safety. "They didn't want to talk. They wanted to display force."The armed group of men, women and children was made up of members of a gun rights organization called Open Carry Texas, and they stayed in the parking lot about 10 or 15 minutes to protest the Moms Demand Action meeting and then left.The long-distance face-off — word of which spread on the Internet on Facebook and blogs — was the latest skirmish in a battle that has been intensifying over the limits and freedoms of the Texas gun culture. Gun rights advocates have been gathering in public places with their firearms to try to convince people that the carrying of unconcealed guns in broad daylight should be no cause for alarm. But such displays do indeed frighten many, even in a gun-friendly state like Texas, and the so-called open-carry gatherings have grown bigger, bolder and more problematic for the police and city officials.Leaders of Open Carry Texas disputed any suggestion that they were intimidating the women. They said their members stayed far away from the restaurant, posed for a group picture and left without incident. They said the gathering was peaceful and legal. Texans are allowed to legally and openly carry what are known as long guns, including shotguns and rifles, in public."This is how Moms Demand Action works," said C. J. Grisham, 39, the president and founder of Open Carry Texas. "They don't want guns anywhere in the public square, and they've made that very clear. No matter what we do, they're going to label us intimidating. It doesn't matter how we carry, where we carry."Police officers arrived at the location, but made no arrests. "There were no issues that we are aware of," said an Arlington Police Department spokeswoman, Tiara Ellis Richard. "Texas law does not prohibit the carrying of long guns."Open Carry Texas encourages its members to walk around their neighborhoods and towns carrying their weapons out in the open. The Dallas-area members learned where the mothers' group was meeting — by pretending to be interested in their activities, the woman who coordinated the meeting said — and made it a stop on their weekly walk on Saturday. At a gun rights rally at the Alamo in San Antonio last month, Moms Demand Action held a counterrally nearby and, gun advocates said, sent their supporters into the crowd to take pictures. "They crashed our Alamo event," Mr. Grisham said. "Let's crash their event."Leaders of Moms Demand Action — a national group that formed after the mass shooting at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, Conn., and modeled itself after Mothers Against Drunk Driving — said the women inside as well as restaurant customers were frightened by the armed group. "Sadly, these bullies are attempting to use guns to intimidate moms and children and to infringe on our constitutional right to free speech," the group's founder, Shannon Watts, said Sunday in a statement.The carrying of a concealed handgun in public in Texas requires a state-issued permit, and those holding such licenses are prohibited from displaying their handguns openly and unconcealed. But the open carrying of a rifle in public is largely unregulated and requires no license. In Texas, in other words, you are prohibited from walking down the street with a small revolver in a holster on your hip but entitled to be out in public with a large shotgun slung over your shoulder. Gun rights' groups are pushing to change the law to allow the open carrying of handguns, and using their freedom to carry rifles as part of their campaign.The woman at the Arlington restaurant — a mother and a member of the local chapter — expressed dismay that the gathering outside the restaurant was permitted by Texas law. "They're walking around with killing machines strapped to their backs in a suburban area," she said.
When the police chief in Tacoma, Wash., shot and killed his wife in a parking lot after years of abusing her, the shock from that event 10 years ago mobilized national support for a more aggressive response to domestic violence in police households.While police officers today are more aware of the problem, the following is also true: In many departments, an officer will automatically be fired for a positive marijuana test, but can stay on the job after abusing or battering a spouse.In the wake of the Tacoma killing, the International Association of Chiefs of Police strengthened its efforts to persuade departments to adopt a set of model rules on domestic violence in their own ranks. Responding to concerns that domestic violence had long been treated more leniently than other forms of misconduct, the organization called for zero tolerance for abusers, tougher pre-employment screening and a separate set of procedures to ensure rigorous investigation of every accusation.But police departments have been slow to adopt the rules. And while most officials say they treat domestic abuse by officers as they would any other form of misconduct, interviews and disciplinary records indicate that, in fact, punishment is often light and job loss uncommon.Only a quarter of the 56 largest city and county police departments that responded to a recent survey have a distinct policy for domestic violence involving officers. And only one, Nashville, has adopted the entire model policy, according to the survey, conducted by The New York Times and the PBS investigative news program "Frontline." Three others — Charlotte, N.C.; Chicago; and Columbus, Ohio — follow most of its provisions."Why is it that we've taken violence against women and separated that from other crimes?" said Mark Wynn, a former Nashville police lieutenant who advises departments worldwide on the model rules. "Whenever you are aware of a crime and you don't hold someone accountable, then you are colluding with a criminal. Is that what we want in the ranks of law enforcement?"Experts believe domestic abuse to be the most commonly unreported crime. Police officers can be particularly dangerous because of their access to guns and special training in fighting and controlling those who challenge them. Yet their victims often do not report abuse because they fear retaliation and they believe that their abuser's colleagues, as well as prosecutors, will not take their complaints seriously."It's been covered up since the beginning of time," said Penny Harrington, a former police chief in Portland, Ore. Ms. Harrington said that even when accusations are reported, prosecutors may be reluctant to pursue them because they need officers to testify in other cases and do not wish to create ill will.What's more, it is not always clear what happened. One example is the case of Michelle O'Connell, a young woman killed with a gun belonging to her boyfriend, a deputy sheriff in St. Johns County, Fla. After the local authorities ruled that she had shot herself, a state investigative agency disagreed, suggesting that her death was a result of domestic violence. Ultimately, a special prosecutor closed the case without bringing charges.With no central reporting system and little definitive research, there is no accurate way to measure the problem — how often officers abuse their domestic partners and how severely abusers are punished. In some instances, researchers have resorted to asking officers to confess how often they had committed abuse. One such study, published in 2000, said one in 10 officers at seven police agencies admitted that they had "slapped, punched or otherwise injured" a spouse or domestic partner.A broader view emerges in Florida, which has one of the nation's most robust open records laws. An analysis by The Times of more than 29,000 credible complaints of misconduct against police and corrections officers there strongly suggests that domestic abuse had been underreported to the state for years.After reporting requirements were tightened in 2007, requiring fingerprints of arrested officers to be automatically reported to the agency that licenses them, the number of domestic abuse cases more than doubled — from 293 in the previous five years to 775 over the next five.The analysis also found that complaints of domestic violence lead to job loss less often than most other accusations of misconduct.
DENVER — A populist backlash against Colorado's new gun-control laws claimed its third political casualty on Wednesday as a Democratic state senator resigned her seat rather than face a recall vote that could have cost her party control of the chamber.For Democrats in this swing state, the resignation of the senator, Evie Hudak, was a sign of the growing political cost of their votes last winter to expand background checks and limit the size of ammunition magazines — measures once hailed as breakthrough victories in the effort to respond to mass shootings.Polls show that voters embrace aspects of the new laws. But the measures have infuriated gun advocates and Republicans, and have become political liabilities in a state where the gun debate is shaped by traditions of hunting and sport-shooting, as well as by the shadows of mass shootings at Columbine High School and the Century 16 movie theater in Aurora.In September, two prominent gun-control supporters were ousted in recall elections, reducing the Democrats' edge in the State Senate to one seat. Ms. Hudak, who represents the suburbs northwest of Denver, would have been the third to face a recall vote, and she and state Democrats acknowledged that neither she nor the party's 18-17 majority was likely to survive it."By resigning, I am protecting these important new laws for the good of Colorado," she wrote in her resignation letter, referring to the slate of gun restrictions, including one she sponsored that seeks to keep guns away from domestic-violence offenders.Ms. Hudak's decision averts another potentially humiliating recall vote and allows a panel of county Democrats to choose her temporary successor, ensuring that Republicans cannot immediately take control of the Senate and force vulnerable Democrats into uncomfortable votes to repeal the gun laws or new regulations on rural electricity providers.But Floyd Ciruli, a political analyst in Denver, said Ms. Hudak's resignation amounted to a surrender before the fight began and was another sign of trouble for state Democrats. It comes weeks after voters overwhelmingly rejected a $1 billion tax increase to reform Colorado's schools, a measure championed by Gov. John W. Hickenlooper and other prominent Democrats."When you add all that in together and stir in the collapse of the national brand, the congressional Democrats, the president and the Affordable Care Act, it's close to panic," Mr. Ciruli said.In recent weeks, as the recall efforts against Ms. Hudak gained momentum, she discussed her options with supporters and Democratic leaders, according to Morgan Carroll, the incoming Senate president. It quickly became clear that resignation was the least bad choice."She really, really struggled with it," Ms. Carroll said. "She felt this was a necessary sacrifice to protect these things that were so important to her."Such tactical surrenders are not uncommon, said Joshua Spivak, a senior fellow at the Hugh L. Carey Institute for Government Reform at Wagner College in New York who tracks recall elections. There were at least 168 recall elections nationwide last year, he said, and in 26 cases, officials resigned before the vote.Democrats, gun-control supporters and gay-advocacy groups offered thanks to Ms. Hudak on Wednesday, while her opponents expressed a mix of elation and outrage that she had left office before a vote could take place. A pro-recall Facebook page stamped the word "Coward" on her photograph."We all know that this is about control and power and the gun-grabbing, citizen-ignoring Democrats elected to the Colorado State Legislature," some opponents wrote on the "Recall Hudak Too" website.In Ms. Hudak's district, her critics said they were thrilled. For weeks, they have been gathering signatures to force a recall vote, putting up "Recall Hudak" lawn signs and writing blog posts outlining the case against her. Gordon Allison, who helped gather signatures, said that weeks of knocking on doors and chatting with neighbors had paid off."This is just a politician who needs to be gone," he said.But others felt shortchanged and said they were angry that Ms. Hudak's successor was likely to share many of her views."She walks away, the Democrats get to appoint another Democrat," said Dave Palm, who has helped circulate petitions and run the pro-recall website. "They saw the writing on the wall."Ms. Hudak, 62, a former teacher and member of Colorado's Board of Education, faced an uphill fight against a passionate opposition in a low-turnout election. She was re-elected in 2012 by 584 votes. Her opponents failed to gather enough valid signatures to force a recall vote in their first effort this spring, but they believed they were within reach this time.Colorado is one of 19 states that allow recalls of state officials, according to the National Conference of State Legislatures. Voters can oust officials for any reason if they collect enough signatures and win a special election.Until this year, no state lawmaker here had been removed in a recall vote. That changed in September, when John Morse, the State Senate president, and Senator Angela Giron lost their seats in an election that was funded heavily by the National Rifle Association and by gun-control advocates like New York's mayor, Michael R. Bloomberg.On Wednesday, Ms. Hudak's supporters gathered at a library to offer words of support and thanks. Her opponents attended, too, offering more criticism. Ms. Hudak did not attend.
WASHINGTON — In the movie "In the Line of Fire," a deranged killer smuggles a homemade gun past the Secret Service and tries, unsuccessfully, to shoot the president.That situation might have seemed far-fetched when the film, which starred Clint Eastwood as the agent who dives in front of the assassin's bullet, came out in 1993. But today, police officials and members of Congress fear that if a law known as the Undetectable Firearms Act is not renewed and updated when it expires on Dec. 9, firearms that can slip past metal detectors and X-ray machines will become a law enforcement problem across the country.It is not an idle concern: Homemade plastic guns are a reality, made possible by the proliferation of 3-D printing technology that was only getting started when the law was first passed by Congress and signed by President Ronald Reagan in 1988."They are so frightening because they render most standard detection useless," said Tim Murphy, a former deputy director of the F.B.I.The expiring law bans guns that can pass unnoticed through a metal detector, and has been renewed twice in the 25 years since it was first enacted. But with the expiration date a little more than a week away, reauthorizing it has been caught up in a political standoff that has thwarted other recent attempts to enact gun safety legislation."We're on the clock, and as we know, this Congress doesn't deal well with deadlines," said Dan Gross, president of the Brady Campaign to Prevent Gun Violence.For now, the extension is delayed as lawmakers fight over whether to simply extend the law or amend it to include new provisions aimed specifically at 3-D printed weapons.Shortly before the Senate broke for its Thanksgiving recess, it set aside a measure to extend the law for a year because of objections by Republicans. Senator Jeff Sessions, Republican of Alabama, said he was concerned not about extending the law as written but about senators who support gun safety measures using the law as a backdoor way of attaching more provisions when it expires again."They're considering altering it, putting more language in it," Mr. Sessions said. "There's concern that it may be altered in a way that would be problematic."The House is expected to approve a 10-year extension of the law when it returns next week. Democrats, led by Representative Steve Israel of New York, want to include the 3-D-printed weapons provision, but Republicans have agreed only to consider renewing the law as it is now."It's hard to believe that anyone would oppose a piece of legislation like this, so tied into, so connected with our safety," said Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, one of the senators leading the effort to extend the law. "In a world of terrorism, to say that we would make legal guns that can pass through metal detectors so people can slip them through airports, stadiums, schools?"The National Rifle Association, whose position will carry significant weight with many in Congress, has not publicly signaled where it stands. A spokesman for the N.R.A. did not respond to several requests for comment.But Gun Owners of America, a smaller and more vocal gun rights group, said that both the extension of the current law and the new provisions would be unnecessary because 3-D printing technology was still so new and not widely available."They're not going to be in Kinkos," said Larry Pratt, the group's executive director. "And at the moment, they can't fire that many rounds. It's just not something that we're going to be dealing with anytime soon."Those who argue that these guns are not a true safety threat often point to the cost of 3-D printers, which can be as expensive as some automobiles. But as the technology becomes less expensive and accessible, concern is growing.To technically comply with the current law, manufacturers of 3-D-printed guns only have to make their firearms detectable to security screeners in some way, usually by including some form of metal, which can be nonfunctional and easily removable.The Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives recently assembled one such gun using designs downloaded from Defense Distributed, a group based in Texas that describes itself as dedicated to defending "the civil liberty of popular access to arms as guaranteed by the United States Constitution."The bureau tested the gun and found it capable of firing multiple .380-caliber metal bullets. Federal authorities demanded the group remove the designs from its website.To close the loophole in the current law, the changes proposed by Democrats would require that an essential, nondetachable piece of the gun be made of enough metal to be picked up in a security screening.But some officials say the real challenge is to find a way to detect plastic weapons, and want more money devoted to that."The law is not the story — someone that wants to do harm is not going to abide by the law," said Mr. Murphy, the former F.B.I. official. "It may stop large-scale production, but won't stop the lone wolf or adversary. Someone needs to be thinking bigger."After attempts by terrorists to bring down airliners over the past decade, the government and security companies made some strides in detecting plastic explosives. But far less time and money were devoted to detecting plastic weapons, because they were not seen as a major threat.While body scanners are considered a reliable way to detect a weapon on a person's body, they are expensive and difficult to transport and have raised concerns about privacy."They're so good they can see a credit card in your pocket," said a senior law enforcement official who has overseen the use of such machines. "But people don't like them. And people don't like pat-downs."
CHICKAMAUGA, Ga. — Deanne Westbrook had tried everything to keep her husband, Ronald, in the house.He was 72. Alzheimer's had erased much of his talent for music and flying airplanes.No one is sure how, in the frigid hours before dawn last Wednesday in this small north Georgia community near the Tennessee border, Mr. Westbrook ended up nearly three miles from home with a handful of other people's mail, jiggling Joe Hendrix's doorknob.Mr. Hendrix, 34, stepped onto his porch with a Glock pistol in his hand and his fiancée inside on the phone with a 911 dispatcher. He fired four shots. One hit Mr. Westbrook in the chest.On a cold and damp day Tuesday, Mrs. Westbrook buried her husband of 51 years, his death adding another chapter to the debate over the nation's patchwork of self-defense laws."I understand the man who shot him is real upset, and I think he should be," Mrs. Westbrook said in an interview. "He shot an innocent man. He should have stayed in the house like a normal person would."Investigators and a district attorney are weighing whether to charge Mr. Hendrix, a decision that exposes the challenge of balancing the right to use deadly force to defend oneself with the imperfect reality of snap decisions.Unlike a case last month in Michigan when a white man shot a young black woman on his porch and the closely followed case of Trayvon Martin in Florida last year, this one had no racial overtones. Both men were white.The legal issue revolves around the question of how scared was Mr. Hendrix — a young man who had just moved into the quiet neighborhood with his fiancée — in those early hours.According to the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and Sheriff Steve Wilson of Walker County, a sheriff's deputy first encountered Mr. Westbrook about 2:30 a.m. the day he died.In the confusion that comes from Alzheimer's, Mr. Westbrook had taken to collecting the mail from neighbors' mailboxes. He was doing so that night on Marbletop Road, which is a mile or so from his home. He told the deputy he lived in a nearby house, which at one time, years ago, he had."Better get home," the deputy said. "It's cold."The deputy drove on, and Mr. Westbrook, in a straw hat and a jacket too light for the weather, continued walking with his dogs.Just before 4 a.m., he was nearly three miles from home in the subdivision of modest new houses where Mr. Hendrix lives, near Chattanooga.Mr. Hendrix, a veteran of the Iraq war who last year served as the spokesman for a Republican candidate for Congress from Tennessee, Scottie Mayfield, did not return calls seeking an interview.At least twice, Mr. Westbrook climbed onto the small porch, tried to open the door and rang the doorbell, Sheriff Wilson said. Dogs were barking. The police were called.The sheriff and Mr. Westbrook had played together in their church's orchestra. Mr. Westbrook had been a skilled trumpet player, retired from the Air Force as a lieutenant colonel.Sheriff Wilson said he wished Mr. Hendrix had just stayed inside. But he knows it was a tense situation."When you listen to the 911 calls, it's evident to me that there was fear displayed at least by the female who lived there," he said.As Mr. Westbrook came around a corner of the house, Mr. Hendrix took his gun and repeatedly called for him to identify himself, he told the police. Then he fired the shots. Mr. Hendrix told investigators that Mr. Westbrook continued to approach him, so he fired the shot into his chest.Deputies were six minutes away."When we sat down and told him the age of the victim and the diagnosis, he broke down and became emotional," Sheriff Wilson said.Within two weeks, investigators will meet with Herbert Franklin, the district attorney, to decide if Mr. Hendrix will face charges.Mr. Franklin is already weighing another so-called Stand Your Ground case. Earlier in November, a 69-year-old man in neighboring Catoosa County came home to find two teenagers trying to break into his house. He shot one in the neck, a 17-year-old boy who died at the hospital.In both cases, Mr. Franklin will be guided by what legal experts call the "reasonable person" standard as outlined in the state's 2006 self-defense law."In order to use deadly force, you have to reasonably believe you are in imminent danger," said the Gwinnett County district attorney, Danny Porter. "You weigh whether the homeowner can show he was in fear of receiving death or great bodily injury."Nearly two dozen states have some version of a Stand Your Ground law, and their popularity continues to grow. The Ohio House of Representatives last month approved a bill that, like many, would remove the need for a person to retreat before using deadly force in self-defense.Georgia's Stand Your Ground law was recently challenged by the Rainbow/PUSH Coalition, whose leader, the Rev. Jesse Jackson, came to the state in early November to announce a lawsuit against Gov. Nathan Deal and the state attorney general.Citing two recent cases, Mr. Jackson argued that the state's law was being unequally applied to whites and blacks.Mr. Westbrook's death shows the continuing controversy over the law, even here in a part of the country where gun ownership is treated as a cherished right.Chris Brown, 50, who lives down the street from the Westbrooks, supports Stand Your Ground laws. He is well-armed and not afraid to pull out a gun if someone broke into his home or tried to steal his truck."But if he's out in my yard and I've done called the cops, I'm waiting for the cops," he said. "What that guy did wasn't Stand Your Ground."Mr. Westbrook's widow herself is not sure that Mr. Hendrix should be charged."I don't know what his mind-set was, and I don't know enough about the law to know," Mrs. Westbrook said. "But that's all over now. His life is already taken. He took the life of a real gentle man, and it's a crying shame."
WASHINGTON — The House voted on Tuesday to extend a law banning firearms that can pass undetected through airport X-ray machines, but left out provisions that law enforcement officials say are necessary to combat the growing threat of guns made with 3-D printers.The legislation was approved overwhelmingly on a voice vote, meaning House members on both sides of a politically fraught gun-safety issue avoided having their individual votes officially recorded.The focus now shifts to the Senate, where Democrats will introduce a stricter measure of their own next week, along with the extension the House passed.But they are expected to act on Monday, the day the law expires. That leaves little time for senators to debate the more controversial aspects of the legislation, which would impose new restrictions on 3-D printed weapons.Senators who want to go beyond the current law believe the most likely outcome is that they will pass the 10-year extension next week so the law does not lapse and then return to the issue sometime next year, Democratic aides said."The House bill is a step in the right direction, but it doesn't get us across the finish line," said Senator Charles E. Schumer of New York, who is part of a group of Democrats pushing the Senate to take a harder line. "A few years ago, these undetectable plastic guns were science fiction. Now, they're frighteningly real."Opponents of expanding the current law argue that 3-D printed guns are expensive to make and unreliable to fire, and so not worth regulating.But law enforcement agencies, including the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, say the proliferation and improvement of 3-D printing technology, along with the falling cost of the machines that make it possible, have created a very real security threat. The bureau tested a 3-D printed gun that it assembled from designs downloaded online and found it capable of firing multiple metal .380-caliber bullets.In the past, renewing the Undetectable Firearms Act, as the law is known, has been a largely noncontroversial move. It first passed in 1988 and was signed into law by President Ronald Reagan; Congress has renewed it twice since.But this time, it has become tangled up in the fraught politics of gun control in the Capitol. Democrats in the Senate tried to renew it before the Thanksgiving recess with a simple one-year extension, hoping they could use the coming year to pass the 3-D printing provisions.As the law is currently written, manufacturers of 3-D printed guns are only required to make their firearms detectable to security screeners in some way, usually by including some form of metal. But some designers have made that metal piece nonfunctional and easily removable.To close the loophole in the current law, the changes proposed by Democrats would require that an essential, nondetachable piece of the gun be made of a sufficient quantity of metal to be picked up in a security screening.
The most effective way to reduce gun violence without significantly curtailing Second Amendment rights is to treat the problem as a public health issue, like smoking or drunken driving, rather trying to profile potential shooters, according to a report released Thursday by a panel of experts who were commissioned by the American Psychological Association to study the issue in the wake of the Newtown, Conn., massacre.The panel reviewed evidence on a wide variety of interventions intended to reduce violence, including suicides and homicides, in schools and in the workplace. It concluded that trying to predict who will act out by profiling was unreliable, and that more systemic preventive policies were far more effective.The report offers a list of such policies, including legal changes like tighter background checks on gun sales, and programs in schools to teach nonviolent conflict resolution. The report also sharply criticized the lack of government money to study firearm violence."There's been so much focus on crisis response, on getting to the scene on time and fortifying our schools, and that's not going to take care of the problem," said Dewey G. Cornell, a clinical psychologist and professor of education at the University of Virginia, who led the panel. "We need to focus on prevention more broadly, before the violence, to have a real impact."Experts who were not involved in compiling the report generally agreed with its conclusions, while acknowledging that some of the recommendations were politically challenging."It's the most comprehensive and balanced analysis I've seen on gun violence in America, and it shows just how hard this problem is and how difficult it will be to solve," said J. Reid Meloy, a forensic psychologist at the University of California, San Diego, and editor of the International Handbook of Threat Assessment.One of the newer interventions that the report highlights is called behavioral threat assessment, which is used at an increasing number of schools and workplaces around the country. When a student or employee openly threatens others or shows evidence of planning an attack — researching it online, buying supplies — a behavioral assessment team gets the person help immediately, whether through counseling or more intensive therapy, and monitors the progress.On campuses, that team typically includes an administrator, a member of the mental health staff and someone from school security. When necessary, the team coordinates with the local police to have the person involuntarily hospitalized.In the wake of mass shootings, states like Virginia and Illinois have mandated that universities assemble threat assessment teams; Virginia just passed a law to mandate such services in schools at all levels.This is considered secondary prevention — intervening if troubling behavior is noticed. So-called primary prevention includes conflict resolution programs, which have significantly reduced fights at some schools, and mental health screening, to try to identify young people who are at risk of depression.The authors acknowledge that such measures will not catch everyone before an action. The Newtown gunman, for instance, lived and plotted in his basement, and it is not clear whether he qualified for any psychiatric diagnosis, as troubled as he was. But a commitment to preventive measures, Dr. Cornell said, would reduce the overall number of cases in the same way that such measures have worked to reduce smoking and drunken driving.The panel called for a number of changes to gun laws, including prohibitions on ownership for domestic violence offenders, people convicted of violent misdemeanors, and those with mental disorders who are thought to be a threat to themselves or others."It really comes down to a question of political will," Dr. Meloy said. "Until we have the political will to move legislation and a commitment on the part of the general public to do so, these changes are not going to occur."
GREELEY, Colo. — When Sheriff John Cooke of Weld County explains in speeches why he is not enforcing the state's new gun laws, he holds up two 30-round magazines. One, he says, he had before July 1, when the law banning the possession, sale or transfer of the large-capacity magazines went into effect. The other, he "maybe" obtained afterward.He shuffles the magazines, which look identical, and then challenges the audience to tell the difference."How is a deputy or an officer supposed to know which is which?" he asks.Colorado's package of gun laws, enacted this year after mass shootings in Aurora, Colo., and Newtown, Conn., has been hailed as a victory by advocates of gun control. But if Sheriff Cooke and a majority of the other county sheriffs in Colorado offer any indication, the new laws — which mandate background checks for private gun transfers and outlaw magazines over 15 rounds — may prove nearly irrelevant across much of the state's rural regions.Some sheriffs, like Sheriff Cooke, are refusing to enforce the laws, saying that they are too vague and violate Second Amendment rights. Many more say that enforcement will be "a very low priority," as several sheriffs put it. All but seven of the 62 elected sheriffs in Colorado signed on in May to a federal lawsuit challenging the constitutionality of the statutes.The resistance of sheriffs in Colorado is playing out in other states, raising questions about whether tougher rules passed since Newtown will have a muted effect in parts of the American heartland, where gun ownership is common and grass-roots opposition to tighter restrictions is high.In New York State, where Gov. Andrew M. Cuomo signed one of the toughest gun law packages in the nation last January, two sheriffs have said publicly they would not enforce the laws — inaction that Mr. Cuomo said would set "a dangerous and frightening precedent." The sheriffs' refusal is unlikely to have much effect in the state: According to the state's Division of Criminal Justice Services, since 2010 sheriffs have filed less than 2 percent of the two most common felony gun charges. The vast majority of charges are filed by the state or local police.In Liberty County, Fla., a jury in October acquitted a sheriff who had been suspended and charged with misconduct after he released a man arrested by a deputy on charges of carrying a concealed firearm. The sheriff, who was immediately reinstated by the governor, said he was protecting the man's Second Amendment rights.And in California, a delegation of sheriffs met with Gov. Jerry Brown this fall to try to persuade him to veto gun bills passed by the Legislature, including measures banning semiautomatic rifles with detachable magazines and lead ammunition for hunting (Mr. Brown signed the ammunition bill but vetoed the bill outlawing the rifles)."Our way of life means nothing to these politicians, and our interests are not being promoted in the legislative halls of Sacramento or Washington, D.C.," said Jon E. Lopey, the sheriff of Siskiyou County, Calif., one of those who met with Governor Brown. He said enforcing gun laws was not a priority for him, and he added that residents of his rural region near the Oregon border are equally frustrated by regulations imposed by the federal Forest Service and the Environmental Protection Agency.This year, the new gun laws in Colorado have become political flash points. Two state senators who supported the legislation were recalled in elections in September; a third resigned last month rather than face a recall. Efforts to repeal the statutes are already in the works.Countering the elected sheriffs are some police chiefs, especially in urban areas, and state officials who say that the laws are not only enforceable but that they are already having an effect. Most gun stores have stopped selling the high-capacity magazines for personal use, although one sheriff acknowledged that some stores continued to sell them illegally. Some people who are selling or otherwise transferring guns privately are seeking background checks.Eric Brown, a spokesman for Gov. John W. Hickenlooper of Colorado, said, "Particularly on background checks, the numbers show the law is working." The Colorado Bureau of Investigation has run 3,445 checks on private sales since the law went into effect, he said, and has denied gun sales to 70 people.
